51 






THE LIBRARY 

of 
VICTORIA UNIVERSITY 

Toronto 



BY THE SAME AUTHOR 

THE QUEST OF THE 
HISTORICAL JESUS 

TRANSLATED BY 

W. MONTGOMERY, B.A., B.D. 

WITH A PREFACE BY 

F. C. BURKITT, M.A., U.D. 

NORRISIAN PROFESSOR OF DIVINITY IN THE UNIVERSITY 
OF CAMBRIDGE 

SECOND EDITION 1911 
Demy Svo. Cloth. Price los. 6d. net (Post free, us.) 



" The most remarkable theological work which has appeared 
in recent years in Germany ... a book of the highest interest." 
The Times. 

"This remarkable book. . . must play an important part 
in the history of the Higher Criticism of the Gospels." The 
Cambridge Revieiv. 



A. AND C. BLACK, SOHO SQUARE, LONDON, W. 



AGENTS 

AMERICA . THE MACMII.LAN COMPANY 

64 & 66 FIFTH AVENUE, NEW YORK 

AUSTRALASIA THE OXFORD UNIVERSITY PRESS 

205 FLINDERS LANE, MELBOURNE 

CANADA. . THE MACMILLAN COMPANY OF CANADA, LTD. 

ST. MARTIN S HOUSE, 70 BOND STREET, TORONTO 

INDIA . . MACMILLAN & COMPANY, LTD. 

MACMILI.AN BUILDING, BOMBAY 

309 Bow BAZAAR STREET, CALCUTTA 



PAUL 
AND HIS INTERPRETERS 



PAUL 



AND 



HIS INTERPRETERS 

A CRITICAL HISTORY 



BY 

ALBERT SCHWEITZER 

PRIVATDOZENT IN NEW TESTAMENT STUDIES IN THE UNIVERSITY OF STRASSBURG 
AUTHOR OF "THE Q_UEST OF THE HISTORICAL JESUS" 



TRANSLATED BY 

W. MONTGOMERY, B.A., B.D. 



LONDON 

ADAM AND CHARLES BLACK 
1912 






EMMANUEL 



31- ^ /if. 



PREFACE 

THE present work forms the continuation of my History of 
the Critical Study of the Life of Jesus, which appeared in 
1906 under the title " Von Reimarus zu Wrede." l 

Any one who deals with the teaching and the life and work 
of Jesus, and offers any kind of new reading of it, ought 
not to stop there, but must be held under obligation to 
trace, from the stand-point at which he has arrived, the 
pathway leading to the history of dogma. Only in this 
way can it be clearly shown what his discovery is worth. 

The great and still undischarged task which confronts 
those engaged in the historical study of primitive Christianity 
is to explain how the teaching of Jesus developed into the 
early Greek theology, in the form in which it appears in the 
works of Ignatius, Justin, Tertullian and Irenaeus. How 
could the doctrinal system of Paul arise on the basis of the 
life and work of Jesus and the beliefs of the primitive com 
munity ; and how did the early Greek theology arise out of 
Paulinism ? 

Strauss and Renan recognised the obligation, and each 
endeavoured in a series of works to trace the path leading 
from Jesus to the history of dogma. Since their time no 
one who has dealt with the life of Jesus has attempted to 
follow this course. 

Meanwhile the history of dogma, on its part, has come to 
place the teaching of Jesus, as well as that of Paul, outside 
the scope of its investigations and to regard its own task as 

1 Sub-title : " Eine Geschichte der Leben-Jesu-Forschung." English 
translation " The Quest of the Historical Jesus." London, A. &lt;& C. Black, 
1910, 2nd ed. 1911. 

V 



vi PREFACE 

beginning at the point where the undisputed and general 
Hellenisation of Christianity sets in. It describes therefore 
the growth of Greek theology, but not of Christian theology as 
a whole. And because it leaves the transition from Jesus to 
Paul, and from Paul to Justin and Ignatius, unexplained, 
and therefore fails to arrive at any intelligible and consistent 
conception of Christian dogma as a whole, the edifice which 
it erects has no secure basis. Any one who knows and 
admires Harnack s " History of Dogma" is aware that the 
solid mason-work only begins in the Greek period ; what 
precedes is not placed on firm foundations but only supported 
on piles. 

Paulinism is an integral part of the history of dogma ; 
for the history of dogma begins immediately upon the death 
of Jesus. 

Critical theology, in dividing up the history of the develop 
ment of thought in primitive Christianity into the separate 
departments, Life of Jesus, Apostolic Age, History of 
Dogma, and clinging to this division as if it were something 
more than a mere convention of the academic syllabus, 
makes a confession of incompetence and resigns all hope of 
putting the history of dogma on a secure basis. Moreover, 
the separate departments thus left isolated are liable to fall 
into all kinds of confusions and errors, and it becomes a 
necessity of existence to them not to be compelled to follow 
their theories beyond the cunningly placed boundaries, or to 
be prepared to show at any moment how their view accords 
with the preceding and following stages in the development 
of thought. 

This independence and autonomy of the different de 
partments of study begins with the downfall of the edifice con 
structed by Baur. He was the last who dared to conceive, 
and to deal with, the history of dogma in the large and 
general sense as the scientific study of the development of the 
teaching of Jesus into the early Greek theology. After him 
begins, with Ritschl, the narrower and more convenient con 
ception of the subject, which resigns its imperial authority 
over the departments of study dealing with the Life of Jesus, 



PREFACE vii 

Primitive Christianity and Paulinism, and allows these to be 
come independent. In the works of Ritschl himself this new 
departure is not clearly apparent, because he still formally 
includes the teaching of Jesus, of Paul, and of primitive 
Christianity within the sphere of the history of dogma. 
But instead of explaining the differences between the various 
types of belief and doctrine, he glosses them over in such a 
way that he practically denies the development of the thoughts, 
and makes it impossible for a really scientific study of the 
teaching of Jesus and of Paulinism to fit into the ready- 
made frame which he provides. 

Ritschl shares with Baur the presupposition that primitive 
dogma arose out of the teaching of Jesus by an organic 
and logical process. The separate disciplines which began 
after them have shown that this assumption is false. Of a 
" development " in the ordinary sense there can be no 
question, because closer investigation has not confirmed the 
existence of the natural lines of connexion which might 
a priori have been supposed to be self-evident, but reveals 
instead unintelligible gaps. This is the real reason why the 
different departments of study maintain their independence. 

The system of the Apostle of the Gentiles stands over AJ ( 
against the teaching of Jesus as something of an entirely 
different character, and does not create the impression of 
having arisen out of it. But how is such a new creation of 
Christian ideas and that within a bare two or three decades 
after the death of Jesus at all conceivable ? 

From Paulinism, again, there are no visible lines of 
connexion leading to early Greek theology. Ignatius and 
Justin do not take over his ideas, but create, in their turn, 
something new. 

According to the assumption which in itself appears 
most natural, one would be prepared to see in the teaching 
of Jesus a mountain-mass, continued by the lofty summits 
of the Pauline range, and from these gradually falling away 
to the lower levels of the early Catholic theology. In reality 
the teaching of Jesus and that of the great Apostle are like 
two separate ranges of hills, lying irregularly disposed in 



viii PREFACE 

front of the later " Gospel." Even the relation which each 
severally bears to primitive Christianity remains uncertain. 

This want of connexion must have some explanation. 
The task of historical science is to understand why these 
two systems of teaching are necessarily independent, and at 
the same time to point out the geological fault and dislocation 
of the strata, and enable us to recognise the essential continuity 
of these formations and the process by which they have 
taken their present shape. 

The edifice constructed by Baur has fallen ; but his 
large and comprehensive conception of the history of dogma 
ought not to be given up. It is wholly wrong to ignore 
the problem at which he laboured and so create the false 
impression that it has been solved. Present day criticism 
is far from having explained how Paulinism and Greek 
theology have arisen out of the teaching of Jesus. All it 
has really done is to have gained some insight into the 
difficulties, and to have made it increasingly evident that 
the question of the Hellenisation of Christianity is the 
fundamental problem of the history of dogma. 

It could not really hope to find a solution, because it is 
still working away with the presuppositions of Baur, 
Ritschl, and Renan, and has already tried three or four times 
over all the experiments which are possible on this basis, 
without ever attaining to a real insight into the course of the 
development. It has approached this or that problem 
differently, has given a new version not to say in some 
cases a perversion of it ; but it has not succeeded in giving 
a satisfactory answer to the question when and how the 
Gospel was Hellenised. 

It has not even attained to clearness in regard to the 
condition in which the Gospel existed prior to its Hellenisa 
tion. It has not ventured to mark off with perfect distinctness 
the two worlds of thought with which the process is concerned, 
and to formulate the problem as being that of explaining 
how the Gospel, which was originally purely Jewish and 
eschatological, became Greek in form and content. That 
this could really have come about, it takes to be a priori 



PREFACE ix 

impossible. It therefore seeks to soften down the antitheses 
as much as possible, to find in the teaching of Jesus thoughts 
which force their way out of the frame of the Jewish eschato- 
logical conceptions and have the character of universal 
religion, and in the teaching of Paul to discover a " genuinely 
Christian," and also a Hellenic element, alongside of the 
Rabbinic material. 

Theological science has in fact been dominated by the 
desire to minimise as much as possible the element of Jewish 
Apocalyptic in Jesus and Paul, and so far as possible to 
represent the Hellenisation of the Gospel as having been 
prepared for by them. It thinks it has gained something 
when in formulating the problem it has done its best to 
soften down the antitheses to the utmost with a view to 
providing every facility for conceiving the transition of the 
Gospel from one world of thought to the other. 

In following this method Baur and Renan proceed with a 
simple confidence which is no longer possible to present day 
theology. But in spite of that it must still continue to follow 
the same lines, because it has still to work with the old pre 
suppositions and the weakening down of the problem which 
they imply. The result is in every respect unsatisfactory. 
The solution remains as impossible as it was before, and the 
simplifications which were supposed to be provided in the 
statement of the problem have only created new difficulties. 

The thoroughgoing application of Jewish eschatology to 
the interpretation of the teaching and work of Jesus has 
created a new fact upon which to base the history of dogma. 
If the view developed at the close of my " Quest of the Histori 
cal Jesus " is sound, the teaching of Jesus does not in any of 
its aspects go outside the Jewish world of thought and project 
itself into a non- Jewish world, but represents a deeply 
ethical and perfected version of the contemporary Apocalyptic. 

Therefore the Gospel is at its starting-point exclusively 
Jewish-eschatological. The sharply antithetic formulation of 
the problem of the Hellenisation of Christianity, which it 
was always hoped to avoid, is proved by the facts recorded in 
the Synoptists to be the only admissible one. Accordingly, 



x PREFACE 

the history of dogma has to show how what was originally 
purely J ewish-eschatological has developed into something 
that is Greek. The expedients and evasions hitherto current 
have been dismissed from circulation. 

The primary task is to define the position of Paul. Is 
he the first stage of the Hellenising process, or is his system 
of thought, like that of primitive Christianity, to be con 
ceived as purely J ewish-eschatological ? Usually the former 
is taken for granted, because he detached Christianity from 
Judaism, and because otherwise his thoughts do not seem to 
be easily explicable. Besides, it was feared that if the 
teaching of the Apostle of the Gentiles, as well as primitive 
Christianity, were regarded as purely J ewish-eschatological, 
the problem of the Hellenisation of the Gospel would become 
so acute as to make the possibility of solving it more remote 
than ever. 

Moreover, the theological study of history is apt, even 
though unconsciously, to give ear to practical considerations. 
At bottom, it is guided by the instinct that whatever in the 
primitive Gospel is capable of being Hellenised may also 
be considered capable of being modernised. It therefore 
seeks to discern in Paul s teaching as also in that of 
Jesus as much as possible that " transcends Judaism," 
that has the character of" universal religion " and " essential 
Christianity." It is haunted by the apprehension that the 
significance of Christianity, and its adaptation to our times, 
is dependent on justifying the modernisation of it on the 
lines hitherto followed and in accordance with the historical 
views hitherto current. 

Those who have faced the recognition that the teaching 
of Jesus is eschatologically conditioned cannot be brought 
by considerations of this kind, scientific or unscientific, 
to entertain any doubt as to the task which awaits them. 
That is, to apply this new view to the explanation of the 
transition to the history of dogma, and as the first step in 
that direction, to undertake a new formulation of the problem 
of Paulinism. They will naturally endeavour to find out 
how far the exclusively eschatological conception of the 



PREFACE xi 

Gospel manifests its influence in the thoughts of the Apostle 
of the Gentiles, and will take into account the possibility 
that his system, strange as this may at first sight appear, 
may have developed wholly and solely out of that conception. 

As in the case of the study of the life of Jesus, the problem 
and the way to its solution will be developed by means of a 
survey of what has hitherto been done. At the same time 
this method of presentation will serve to promote the knowledge 
of the past periods of the science. Since it is impossible for 
students, and indeed for the younger teachers, to read for 
themselves all the works of earlier times, the danger arises 
that on the one hand the names will remain mere empty 
names, and on the other that, from ignorance, solutions will 
be tried over again which have already been advanced and 
have proved untenable. An attempt has therefore been made 
in this book to give a sufficient insight into what has been 
done so far, and to provide a substitute for the reading of such 
works as are not either of classical importance or still gener 
ally accessible. 

For practical reasons the method adopted in my former 
book, of attaching the statement of the new view to the history 
of earlier views, has not been followed here. This view will 
be developed and defended in a separate work bearing the 
title " The Pauline Mysticism " (" Die Mystik des Apostels 
Paulus "), which will appear at an early date. 

The English and American literature of the subject has 
not been included in this study, since the works in question 
were not in all cases accessible to me, and an insufficient 
acquaintance with the language raised a barrier. 

Nor have I aimed at giving, even with this limitation, a 
complete enumeration of all the studies of Paul s teaching. 
I have only desired to cite works which either played a part 
of some value in the development of Pauline study, or were 
in some way typical. The fact that a work has been left 
unmentioned does not by any means necessarily imply that 
it has not been examined. 

ALBERT SCHWEITZER. 

igth Sept. 1911. 



CONTENTS 

CHAPTER I 



PAGE 

THE BEGINNINGS OF THE SCIENTIFIC METHOD . i 



CHAPTER II 

BAUR AND HIS CRITICS . . . .12 

CHAPTER III 

FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN . . . .22 

CHAPTER IV 

H. J. HOLTZMANN . . . . .100 

CHAPTER V 

CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES . . 1 1 7 

CHAPTER VI 

THE POSITION AT THE BEGINNING OF THE TWENTIETH 

CENTURY . . . . . -151 

CHAPTER VII 

PAULINISM AND COMPARATIVE RELIGION . . .179 

CHAPTER VIII 

SUMMING-UP AND FORMULATION OF THE PROBLEM . 237 

INDEX ..... .251 

xiii 



PAUL 
AND HIS INTERPRETERS 

i 

THE BEGINNINGS OF THE SCIENTIFIC METHOD 

Hugo Grotius. Annotationes in Novum Testamentum. 1641-1646. 
Johann Jakob Rambach. Institutiones hermeneuticae sacrae. 1723. 

Siegmund Jakob Baumgarten. Unterricht der Auslegung der heiligen 
Schrift. (Instructions in the art of Expounding Holy Scripture.) 
1742. 

Johann Christoph Wolf. Curae philologicae et criticae. 1741. 

Johann August Ernesti. Institutio interpretis Novi Testamenti. 1762. 
(Eng. Trans., Biblical Interpretation of the New Testament, 
Edinburgh, 1832-1833.) 

Johann Salomo Semler. Vorbereitung zur theologischen Hermeneutic. 

(Introduction to Theological Hermeneutic.) 1760-1769. 
Abhandlung von freier Untersuchung des Canons. (Essay on the free 

Investigation of the Canon.) 1771-1775. 
Neuer Versuch die gemeinniitzige Auslegung und Anwendung des 

Neuen Testaments zu befordern. (A New Attempt to Promote 

a Generally Profitable Exposition and Application of the New 

Testament.) 1786. 
Latin Paraphrases of the Epistles to the Romans (1769) and Corinthians 

(1770, 1776). 

Johann David Michaelis. Einleitung in die gottlichen Schriften des 
Neuen Bundes. (Introduction to the Divine Scriptures of the New 
Covenant.) 1750. (Eng. Trans, by H. Marsh, Cambridge, 1793.) 

Ubersetzung des Neuen Testaments. (Translation of the New Testa 
ment.) 1790. 

Anmerkungen fur Ungelehrte zu seiner Ubersetzung des Neuen Testa 
ments. (Notes for Unlearned Readers on his Translation of the 
New Testament.) 1790-1792. 

Friedrich Ernst David Schleiermacher. Uber den sogenannten ersten 
Brief des Paulus an den Timotheus. (On the so-called First Epistle 
of Paul to Timothy.) 1807. 

Johann Gottfried Eichhorn. Historisch-kritische Einleitung in das 
Neue Testament. (Historical and Critical Introduction to the New 
Testament.) 3 vols. 1814. 



2 BEGINNINGS OF THE SCIENTIFIC METHOD 

Oottlob Wilhelm Meyer. Entwicklung des paulinischen Lehrbegriffs. 
(The Development of the Pauline System of Doctrine.) 1801. 

Leonhard Usteri. Entwicklung des paulinischen Lehrbegriffs. (The 
Development of the Pauline System of Doctrine.) 1824. 

August Ferdinand Dahne. Entwicklung des paulinischen Lehrbe 
griffs. (The Development of the Pauline System of Doctrine.) 1835. 

Karl Schrader. Der Apostel Paulus. 1830-1836. 

J. A. W. Neander. Geschichte der Pflanzung und Leitung der christ- 
lichen Kirche durch die Apostel. (History of the Planting and 
Guidance of the Christian Church by the Apostles.) 1832. (Eng. 
Trans, by J. E. Ryland, 1851.) 

W. M. Leberecht De Wette. Erklarung der Briefe an die Romer, 
Korinther, Galater und Thessalonicher. (Exposition of the Epistles 
to the Romans (2nd ed., 1838), Corinthians, etc. (1841).) 

H. E. G. Paulus. Des Apostels Paulus Lehrbriefe an die Galater- und 
Romer-Christen. (The Apostle Paul s Doctrinal Epistles to the 
Galatian and Roman Christians.) 1831. 

THE Reformation fought and conquered in the name of 
Paul. Consequently the teaching of the Apostle of the 
Gentiles took a prominent place in Protestant study. 
Nevertheless the labour expended upon it did not, to 
begin with, advance the historical understanding of his 
system of thought. What men looked for in Paul s 
writings was proof-texts for Lutheran or Reformed 
theology ; and that was what they found. Reformation 
exegesis reads its own ideas into Paul, in order to receive 
them back again clothed with Apostolic authority. 

Before this could be altered, the spell which dogma 
had laid upon exegesis needed to be broken. A very 
promising beginning in this direction was made by Hugo 
Grotius, who in his Annotationes in Novum Testamentum l 
rises superior to the limitations of ecclesiastical dogma. 
This work appeared in 1641-1646. The Pauline Epistles 
are treated with especial gusto. The great Netherlander 
makes it his business to bring out by patient study the 
simple literal meaning, and besides referring to patristic 
exegesis, cites parallels from Greek and Roman literature. 
He does not, however, show any special insight into the 
peculiar character of the Pauline world of thought. 

1 In the Amsterdam edition of the whole in 1679, the Annotationes 
on the Pauline Epistles (1009 pp.), with those on the other Epistles 
and the Apocalypse, form vol. iii. 



THE RIGHTS OF EXEGESIS 3 

In the ensuing period the principle gradually became 
established that exegesis ought to be independent of 
dogma. Pietism and Rationalism had an equal interest 
in promoting this result. The accepted formula was 
that Scripture must be interpreted by Scripture. This 
thought is common ground to the two famous works on 
exegesis which belong to the first half of the eighteenth 
century, the Institutiones hermeneuticae sacrae l of Johann 
Jakob Rambach, which is written from the stand-point 
of a moderate pietism, and Siegmund Jakob Baumgarten s 
rationalistically inclined " Instruction in the art of ex 
pounding Holy Scripture." 

On the soil thus prepared by pietism and rationalism 
it was possible for a philologically sound exegesis to thrive. 
One of the most important attempts in this direction is 
Johann Christoph Wolf s Curae philologicae et criticae? 
This was regarded as authoritative for several decades, 
and even later is frequently drawn on by exegetes, either 
with or without acknowledgment. The merit of having 
gained the widest recognition for the principles of philo 
logical exegesis belongs to Johann August Ernesti, the 
reformer of the St. Thomas s School at Leipzig and 
the determined opponent of its famous " Precentor," 
Johann Sebastian Bach. His Institutio interprets Novi 
Testament* appeared in 1762. 4 It is on the plan of the 
" Hermeneutics " of Rambach and Baumgarten, and 
deals with grammar, manuscripts, editions, translations, 
patristic exegesis, history and geography as sciences 
ancillary to exegesis. 

But Ernesti s work suffices to show that the undog- 
matic philological method did not in itself lead to any 

1 1723, 822 pp. 

2 ist ed. 1742 ; 2nd, 1745, 232 pp. (For title see head of chapter.) 

3 Bale, 1741. Five vols., covering the whole of the New Testament. 
The Pauline Epistles are treated in the 3rd (820 pp.) and 4th (837 pp.)- 
The full title is : Curae philologicae et criticae . . . quibus integritati 
contextus Graeci consulitur, sensus verborum ex praesidiis philologicis 
illustratur, diversae Interpretum Sententiae summatim enarrantur et 
modesto examini subjectae vel approbantur vel repelluntur. 

4 135 pp. Later editions 1765, 1774, 1792, 1809. The last two 
were brought out under the care of Ammon. 



4 BEGINNINGS OF THE SCIENTIFIC METHOD 

result. Its author is in reality by no means free from 
dogmatic prepossessions, but he skilfully avoids those 
questions which would bring him into conflict with 
Church doctrine. In fact the use he makes of philology 
is more or less formal. He does not venture to treat the 
books of the New Testament without prepossession as 
witnesses from the literature of a distant period, and to 
show the peculiar mould in which Christian ideas are 
there cast in comparison with subsequent periods and 
with the period for which he writes. He did not realise 
that the undogmatic, philological method of exegesis 
must logically lead to a method in which philology is 
the handmaid of historical criticism. 

His great contemporary, Johann Salomo Semler, 
ventures to give expression to this truth, and so becomes 
the creator of historical theology. In his theoretical 
works on the Scriptures and on exegesis " Introduction 
to theological Hermeneutics " (1760-1769) , l "Essay on 
the free Investigation of the Canon" (1771-1775) , 2 
" A new attempt to promote a generally profitable 
Exposition and Application of the New Testament " 
(1786) 3 the Halle professor explains again and again 
what is to be understood by a " historical " method of 
exegesis. He demands that the New Testament shall 
be regarded as a temporally conditioned expression of 
Christian thought, and examined with an unprejudiced 
eye. In making this claim he does not speak as a 

1 Four parts. Parts i. and ii. form the first volume (424 pp.), 
part iii. = vol. ii. (396 pp.), part iv.= vol. iii. (396pp.). Part i. is occupied 
with the general principles of exegesis, part ii. with the text of the Old 
Testament, parts iii. and iv. with that of the New Testament. 

2 Four volumes. The first (in the reprint of 1776, 333 pp.) : 
On the natural conception of Scripture. The second (in the first 
edition, 1772, 608 pp.) : On Inspiration and the Canon, Answers to 
criticisms and attacks. Third (ist ed., 1773, 567 pp.) : On the History 
of the Canon, Answers to criticisms and attacks. The fourth (1775, 
460 pp.) is wholly occupied by an answer to the work of a certain Dr. 
Schubert. 

This often mentioned but little read work does not therefore present 
exactly the appearance that might be expected from its title. The 
polemical replies occupy a much larger space than the orginal argu 
ments. 

3 298 pp. A striking and brilliantly written work. 



THE CLAIMS OF CRITICISM 5 

disinterested representative of historical science, but 
makes it in the name of religion. If religion is to develop 
progressively and purify itself into an ethical belief, the 
special embodiments which it has received in the past 
must not lay the embargo of a false authority upon its 
progress. We must acknowledge to ourselves that 
many conceptions and arguments, not only of the Old 
Testament but also of the New, have not the same sig 
nificance for us as they had for the early days of Chris 
tianity. In his work of 1786, Semler even demands that 
" for present day Christians there should be made a 
generally useful selection from the discourses of Jesus 
and the writings of the Apostles, in which the local refer 
ence to contemporary readers shall be distinguished or 
eliminated." 

This theory of historical exegesis is carried out in 
dealing with the great Pauline Epistles. Semler points 
the way to the critical investigation of the Apostle s 
thought. He gives paraphrases of the Epistle to the 
Romans and the Epistles to the Corinthians, and 
attempts to make clear the content and the connection 
of thought by a paraphrastic and expanded rendering 
of each individual verse. 1 Exegesis is no longer to be 
encumbered with a panoply of erudition ; it is no 
longer to be interpenetrated with homiletic and dog 
matic considerations, and to defer to the authority of 
the old Greek expositors, who, " when it is a question of 
historical arguments, had no better or clearer knowledge 
than we have ourselves." It must let the Scriptural 

1 Paraphrasis Epistolae ad Romanes . . . cum Dissertatione de 
Appendice, capp. xv. et xvi., 1769, 311 pp. (Dedicated to Johann 
August Ernesti.) 

Paraphrasis in Primam Pauli ad Corinthios Epistolam, 1770, 540 pp. 
(Dedicated to Johann David Michaelis.) 

Paraphrasis II. Epistolae ad Corinthios, 1776, 388 pp. Each of these 
works contains a preface of some length on the principles of historical 
exegesis. As a specimen of the paraphrase we may quote that of 
Rom. vi. i : Jam si haec est Evangelii tarn exoptata hominibusque 
cunctis tarn frugifera doctrina, num audebimus statuere, perseverare 
nos tamen posse in ista peccandi consuetudine, ut quasi eo fiat amplior 
gratiae divinae locus ? 



6 BEGINNINGS OF THE SCIENTIFIC METHOD 

phrases say openly and freely what they mean in their 
literal sense, and devote itself simply to that dispassionate, 
objective study of facts which has hitherto been too 
much neglected. 

The importance of the paraphrases does not however 
consist, as might be supposed, in their exhibiting the 
distinctive character of the Pauline trains of thought in 
comparison with the views of the other New Testament 
writers. By his use of a paraphrastic rendering of the 
text Semler puts an obstacle in the way of his gaining an 
insight into the specifically Pauline reasoning, and un 
consciously imports his own logic into the Apostle s 
arguments. 

On the other hand, his brilliant powers of observation 
enable him to call attention to some fundamental prob 
lems of literary criticism. He is the first to point out 
that we do not possess the Pauline Epistles in their original 
form, but only in the form in which they were read in the 
churches. The canonical Epistle is therefore not, as a 
matter of a priori certainty, identical with the historical 
letter. It is quite possible, he argues, that the letters as 
read in the churches were produced by joining together, 
or working up together, different letters, and also that 
written directions and messages, which originally existed 
in a separate form, were attached in later copies to the 
Epistles in order that no part of the heritage left by the 
Apostle might be lost. 

On the basis of considerations of this kind Semler 
arrives at the result that the fifteenth and sixteenth 
chapters of Romans did not belong to the original Epistle. 
The sixteenth is, in his view, a series of greetings which 
Paul who, it is assumed, was writing from Ephesus 
gave to the bearers of the Epistle to be conveyed to the 
churches which they would visit on their way through 
Macedonia and Achaia. In the ninth chapter of 2 Cor 
inthians there is preserved, he thinks, a writing in 
tended for another city in Achaia, which was only later 
welded into the Epistle to the Corinthians. From the 



THE QUESTION OF THE PASTORALS 7 

fourteenth verse of the twelfth chapter of 2 Corinthians 
to the close of the thirteenth chapter we have to assume 
the presence of a separate writing, of later date than the 
original Second Epistle to the Corinthians. Thus Semler 
takes the first steps upon the road of literary hypothesis. 
Theology at first took little notice of these investigations. 
In the third edition of his " New Testament Introduction " 
(1777) , l the great Gottingen philologist and theologian 
J. D. Michaelis treats the letters of the Apostle in a quite 
uncritical spirit, and does not enter at all into the literary 
problems ; in his " Translation " and " Exposition " of 
the New Testament 2 he follows the old tracks and makes 
no attempt to carry out the task which Semler had assigned 
to historical exegesis. In general the eighteenth century, 
after Semler, contributed very little to the investigation 
of Paulinism. Schleiermacher was the first to take a step 
forward, when, in a letter to Gass, he expressed his doubts 
as to the genuineness of I Timothy. 3 

Shortly before the battle of Jena so he recounts in 
the preface he had communicated his doubts to his 
friend, but had not got the length of setting them forth in 
a reasoned argument. " The battle though indeed it 
ended all too quickly the consequent unrest in the town, 
and even in the house, the confused hurrying to and fro, 
the sight of the French soldiers, which was interesting in 
so many ways . . . the still incomprehensible blow which 
struck our University even before you left, and the sad 
sight of the students saying their farewells and taking 
their departure, these were certainly not the surroundings 

1 Johann David Michaelis, Einleitung in die Schriften des Neuen 
Bundes, ist ed., 1750. In its successive editions this work dominates 
the theology of all the latter half of the eighteenth century ; at the 
beginning of the nineteenth it is superseded by Eichhorn s Introduction. 
The third edition (1777) contains 1356 pp. The Pauline Epistles 
occupy pp. 1001-1128. 

J Ubersetzung des Neuen Testaments, 1790, 566 pp. Anmerkungen 
fiir Ungelehrte zu seiner Ubersetzung des Neuen Testaments, 4 vols., 
1790-92. The Pauline Epistles are treated in vols. iii. and iv. 

3 Friedrich Ernst David Schleiermacher, Uber den sogenannten 
ersten Brief des Paulus an den Timotheus. Ein kritisches Sendschreiben 
an Joachim Christian Gass, 1807. In his complete works this is to be 
found in the second volume of the first division, 1836, pp. 223-320. 



8 BEGINNINGS OF THE SCIENTIFIC METHOD 

in which to set up a critical judgment-seat. Although, 
on the other hand, you would perhaps have been more 
ready then, when all seemed lost, to give up a New 
Testament book, than you are now." The verbal promise 
then given but not fulfilled is now discharged in writing. 

Schleiermacher bases his argument against I Timothy 
upon 2 Timothy and Titus. While the same general 
conceptions are present in the longer letter as in the two 
shorter ones, they are not there found in the natural 
connections in which they occur in the others. It makes 
the impression of being a composite structure, and in its 
vocabulary, too, shows remarkable differences from the 
remaining letters taken as a whole. 

Strictly speaking it was not Schleiermacher the critic, 
but Schleiermacher the aesthete who had come to have 
doubts about 2 Timothy. The letter does not suit his 
taste. He fails to perceive that, so far as the language goes, 
the two other letters diverge from the rest of the Pauline 
Epistles in the same way as I Timothy, and that they also 
show the same looseness and disconnectedness ; only that, 
in consequence of their smaller extent, it is not so striking. 
And, most important of all, it escapes him that as regards 
their ideas aU_ three .letters agree in diverging from the 
remainder of the Pauline Epistles. 

Schleiermacher s omissions are supplied by Eichhorn 
in his well-known Introduction. 1 He lays it down that 
the three Epistles are all by the same author, and are all 
spurious. His criticism deals first with the language and 
thought of the letters, which he shows to be un-Pauline ; 
then he argues that the implied historical situations 
cannot be fitted into the life of the Apostle, as known to us 
from the remaining letters and the Acts of the Apostles ; 
finally, he points to the unnaturalness of the relation 

1 Johann Gottfried Eichhorn, Historisch-kritische Einleitung in das 
Neue Testament, ist ed., vol. iii., second half (1814), pp. 315-410. 

Eichhorn points out that he had recognised the spuriousness of the 
three Pastoral Epistles, and had expressed his conviction in his Uni 
versity lectures before Schleiermacher published his criticisms of the 
First Epistle of Timothy. 



STUDY OF PAULINE THEOLOGY 9 

between Paul and his helpers as it is represented by these 
Epistles. 

The Apostle, he points out, gives them in writing 
exhortations and directions which on the assumption of a 
real personal acquaintance and a long period of joint 
work with them are in any case unnecessary, and become 
much more so from the fact that the letters look forward 
to an early meeting. From this Eichhorn concludes that 
" some one else has put himself in Paul s place," and he 
sees no possibility of the success of any attempt to defend 
the genuineness of the Epistles against the arguments which 
he has brought forward. In particular he gives a warning 
against the seductive attempt to save the genuineness of 
2 Timothy by the assumption of a second imprisonment. 
No hypothesis, he declares, can in any way help the 
Pastorals, since they must be pronounced from internal 
evidence because of their divergence from the remain 
ing Epistles not to be by the Apostle. This was a long 
step forward. The circle of writings which have come 
down under the name of Paul had undergone a restriction 
which made it possible to give an account of his system of 
thought without being obliged to find a place in it for 
ideas which already have a quite early-Catholic ring. 

Ten years after Eichhorn s literary achievement, in 
the year 1824, the Swiss theologian Leonhard Usteri, a 
pupil of Schleiermacher s, published his " Development 
of the Pauline System of Doctrine," x which is generally 
regarded as the starting-point of the purely historical 
study of Paulinism, the first attempt to give effect to the 
demands of Semler. 2 

Usteri wishes to show the subjective imprint and 

1 Leonhard Usteri, Die Entwicklung des paulinischen Lehrbegriffs , 
1824, 191 pp. The editions of 1829, 1830, and 1832 were revised by 
the author, who died in 1833. After his death two more appeared 
(1834, 1851). Reference may be made also to Usteri s " Commentary 
on the Epistle to the Galatians," 1833, 252 pp. 

2 The first work which undertook to give an account of the Apostle s 
system of thought as such is Gottlob Wilhelm Meyer s Entwicklung des 
paulinischen Lehrbegriffs, 1801, 380 pp. The author has collected the 
material well, but does not know in what direction Paul s peculiarity 
lies. 



io BEGINNINGS OF THE SCIENTIFIC METHOD 

enrichment which ordinary Christianity received at the 
hands of the Apostle, and he sees in the Epistle to the 
Galatians the outline of his whole doctrine. He does not, 
however, venture to give full recognition to the idea of a 
real antithesis between the Pauline conceptions and those 
of the primitive Apostles, and consequently is led to 
soften down the peculiarities of the former so far as 
possible. The spirit of Schleiermacher, which tended to 
level down everything of a historical character, influences 
the book more than the author is aware. 1 A peculiar 
interlude in the investigation of Paulinism was due to 
the Heidelberger H. E. G. Paulus. 2 He published, in the 
year 1831, a study of the Epistles to the Galatians and 
Romans, which was in reality an essay on the Apostle s 
system of doctrine. The work is undertaken entirely in 
the interests of a rationalism bent on opposing the 
reaction to orthodoxy. 

According to the arguments of Paulus it is not the case 
that the letters speak of expiatory suffering and imputed 
righteousness. Paul cannot have upheld " legality " as 
against " morality " and have maintained an " unpurified 
conception of religion." The " chief sayings," the 
characteristic terms, are to be given a purely moral 
interpretation. The Apostle means that " faith in Jesus " 
must become in us " the faith of Jesus," and the narrower 
conception of righteousness must be enlarged into the 

1 Of the works which criticise Usteri and mark an advance in 
Pauline study the following may be named : 

Karl Schrader, Der Apostel Paulus ; vols. i., 1830 (264 pp.), and ii., 
J 832 (373 pp.)&gt; deal with the life of the Apostle Paul; vol. iii., 1833 
(331 pp.), with the doctrine; vols. iv., 1835 (490 pp.), and v., 1836 
(574 pp.), contain the exposition of the Epistles. 

August Ferdinand Dahne, Entwicklung des paulinischen Lehrbegriffs, 
1835, 211 pp. 

Mention may also be made of the chapter on Paulinism in J. A. W. 
Neander s Geschichte der Pflanzung und Leitung der christlichen Kirche 
durch die Apostel, ist ed., 1832 ; 2nd ed., ist vol., 1838 (433 pp.). 
Paul is treated in pp. 102-433 4 tn e ^-&gt; ^47 5th, 1862. As typical 
of the exegesis of the period prior to Baur may be mentioned the 
Commentaries of W. M. L. de Wette on Romans (2nd ed.), 1838 ; i and 2 
Corinthians, 1841 ; Galatians and Thessalonians, 1841. 

2 H. E. G. Paulus, Des Apostels Paulus Lehrbriefe an die Galater- 
und Romer- Christen, 1831, 368 pp. 



A SIGNIFICANT ANTITHESIS n 

conception of " the righteousness of God." The 
" righteousness of God " betokens righteousness such as ^ 
it exists in God, and is demanded by Him in man s spirit 
as its " true good," " the only real atonement which 
brings us into harmony with the Deity." Thus a proper 
interpretation enables us to discover in these writings 
" the agreement between the Gospel and a rational faith." 

The book appeared two or three decades too late. 
The rationalism which it represents had had its day. 
But there is something imposing in this determined 
wresting of the Apostle s views. It is parallel to that 
which was practised by the Reformation. The latter 
interpreted the whole of Paulinism by the passages "&gt; 
on the atoning death, and ignored the other thoughts in 
the Epistles. The Heidelberg rationalist starts from the 
conceptions connected with the " new creature," which 
were later to be described as the ethical system of the 
Apostle, and interprets everything else by them. 

The fact that the two views the only ones which 
endeavoured to grasp Paulinism as a complete, articulated 
system thus stand over against each other antithetically 
is significant for the future. Critical study in the course 
of its investigations was to come to a point where it would 
have to recognise both views as justified, and to point out 
the existence in Paul of a twofold system of doctrine 
a juridical system based on the idea of justification, 
and an ethical system dominated by the conception of 
sanctification without at first being able to show how 
the two are interrelated and together form a unity. 



II 

BAUR AND HIS CRITICS 

Ferdinand Christian Baur. Die Christuspartei in der korinthischen 
Gemeinde. (The Christ-party in the Corinthian Church.) Ap 
peared in the Tubinger Zeitschrift fur Theologie, 1831 and 1836. 
Uber Zweck u. Veranlassung des Romerbriefs (Purpose and occasion 
of Rom. ),* &. 1836. Die sogenannten Pastoralbriefe. (The so-called 
Pastoral Epistles.) 1835. 

Paulus der Apostel Jesu Christi (ist ed., 1845; 2nd ed., 1866-67). 
(Eng. Trans, by " A. P. " and A. Menzies, 1873-75.) 

Beitrage zu den Briefen an die Korinther, Thessalonicher und Romer. 
(Contributions to the elucidation of the Epistles to the Corinthians, 
Thessalonians and Romans.) Tubinger Jahrbucher fur Theologie. 
1850-57- 

Vorlesungen uber neutestamentliche Theologie. 1864. (Lectures on 
New-Testament Theology.) 

Vorlesungen uber die christliche Dogmengeschichte. (Lectures on 
the History of Dogma.) Vol. i., 1865. 

Albert Schwegler. Das nachapostolische Zeitalter. 1846. (The 
Post-Apostolic Age.) 

Carl Wieseler. Chronologic des apostolischen Zeitalters. 1848. 
(The Chronology of the Apostolic Age.) On the Pauline Epp., 
225-278. 

Albrecht Ritschl. Die Entstehung der altkatholischen Kirche. (The 
Origin of the Early Catholic Church.) ist ed., 1850; 2nd ed., 1857. 

Gotthard Viktor Lechler. Das apostolische und nachapostolische 
Zeitalter. (The Apostolic and Post-Apostolic Age.) 1852. (Eng. 
Trans, by A. J. K. Davidson, Edinburgh, 1886.) 

Richard Adalbert Lipsius. Die paulinische Rechtfertigungslehre. 
(The Pauline Doctrine of Justification.) 1853. 

IN the fourth number of the Tubinger Zeitschrift fur 
Theologie for the year 1831, F. C. Baur gave to the study 
of Paulinism a new direction, by advancing the opinion 
that the Apostle had developed his doctrine in complete 
opposition to that of the primitive Christian community, 
and that only when this is recognised can we expect to 
grasp the peculiar character of the Pauline ideas. 



BAUR S " POSITIVE CRITICISM " 13 

The great merit of the Tubingen critic was that he 
allowed the texts to speak for themselves, to mean what 
they said. On the ground of the striking difference 
between Acts and Galatians regarding Paul s relation to 
the original Apostles, and in view of the divisions and 
contentions which reveal themselves in the Epistles to 
the Corinthians, Baur concludes that in the early days of 
Christianity two parties a Petrine party or party of the 
original Apostles, and a Pauline party stood opposed to 
one another, holding divergent views on the subject of the 
redemption wrought by Christ. 

In the gradual adjustment of these differences he sees 
the development which led up to the formation of the 
early Catholic Church, and he traces the evidence for this 
process in the literature. He thinks he can show that the 
two parties gradually approached each other, making 
concessions on the one side and the other, and finally, 
under the pressure of a movement which was equally 
inimical to both of them the Gnosticism of the early part 
of the second century they coalesced into a single 
united Church. 

The recognition of the character and significance of 
Gnosticism makes it possible for Baur to introduce a new 
kind of criticism. Before him it was only possible to 
arrive at the negative result that a writing was not by 
the author to whom it was traditionally ascribed. Now, 
according to him, it is possible to determine to what 
period it belongs. It is only necessary to show what 
position it occupies in the process of reconciliation of the 
two parties, and, especially, whether it deals with specula 
tive error. This Baur calls " positive " criticism. 

He applies it in the first place to the Pastoral Epistles, 
and argues that the heretics combated in them do not 
belong to primitive Christianity but are representatives 
of the Gnostic movement of the second century. By 
the " myths and genealogies " here mentioned are meant 
the great speculative systems which are known from 
Church history. The description given of the heretics is 



14 BAUR AND HIS CRITICS 

intentionally couched in terms which are neither too 
general nor too special, in order to sustain the fiction that 
the false doctrine arising at this later period only revives 
a movement which had already been attacked and 
defeated by Paul. 

That neither the assumption of a second imprisonment, 
nor any other possible or impossible hypothesis, can 
restore to the Pastorals their lost genuineness is as firm 
a conviction with Baur as it was with Eichhorn. 

In the course of his study of the Pastoral Epistles the 
Tubingen master had expressed the opinion that the 
criticism of the Pauline writings would probably not 
" come to a halt " with these Epistles. The results of 
his further study were offered ten years later (1845) in 
the brilliantly written work, " Paul the Apostle of Jesus 
Christ." He here treats first the life and work, then the 
letters, and lastly the system of doctrine. The result 
arrived at in his investigation of the documents is that 
only the Epistles to the Galatians, Corinthians, and 
Romans can be confidently used as sources. Compared 
with these four, all the others must be classed as " anti- 
legomena," " which does not at all imply the assertion 
that they are not genuine, but only indicates the opposition 
to which their claim to genuineness is in some cases 
already exposed, in others, may be exposed in the future, 
since there is not a single one of the smaller Pauline 
epistles against which, if the four main epistles are taken 
as the standard, there cannot be raised some objection or 
other." There are strong grounds for questioning the 
. Epistles to the Ephesians and Colossians ; those to the 
Thessalonians and Philippians are to be suspected because 
of the small amount of dogma they contain. Baur s 
reason for taking up such a critical attitude towards the 
" smaller epistles " is that he is bound to see in the 
heritage which has come down to us from the Apostle, 
writings " which belong to the history of the party which 
based itself on his name, and refer to the relations of 
the various parties," and show us how Gentile Christianity 






A HEGELIAN PAULIN1SM 15 

softens down its principles and its peculiarities in order to 
meet the Jewish Christianity, which on its part was going 
through a similar process, in the unity of the early Catholic 
Church. 

This radical view was attacked on all sides. It gave 
rise to a kind of reaction even within the sphere of scien 
tific theology, and led to the calling in question of results 
which the labours of Eichhorn had brought into general 
acceptance. Thus Carl Wieseler prefaces his detailed 
study on the date of composition of the Pauline letters 
with the remark that he held all the thirteen letters which 
are attributed to the Apostle in the Canon to be authentic. 

The Apostle s system of doctrine culminates, according 
to Baur s representation, in the doctrine of the Spirit. 
In the brilliant disquisitions of this section it is not so 
much the historian who speaks as the pupil of Hegel. 
Paulinism is in its own way an announcement of the 
unity of the subjective spirit with the objective spirit. 
It is only from this point of view that a consciousness of 
freedom such as is found in the Apostle of the Gentiles can 
exist. His doctrine is concerned with union with Christ 
and witlT GbcI by faith, from which comes Spirit. 
" Righteousness " is " the proper relation towards God, 
to place men in which is the highest duty of all religion." 

Baur does not enter into the details of the Pauline 
doctrine of justification. Detail is in fact somewhat 
neglected in his treatment. Strictly speaking, he only 
includes that which can be in some way or other expressed 
in Hegelian thought-forms, and that in which Paulinism 
may be exhibited as representing absolute religion. 
Everything else is thrown into the background, and 
receives only a partial appreciation or depreciation 
in a separate chapter entitled " A special discussion of 
some subsidiary dogmatic questions." The characteristic 
stamp of the Pauline doctrine is largely obliterated. In 
particular, Paul s views about the " last things " and the 
angels are not allowed to become disturbingly prominent. 
Baur does not, indeed, hesitate practically to eliminate 



16 BAUR AND HIS CRITICS 

them. The angelology he dismisses with the following 
remark : "Of the angels the Apostle says little in the 
letters which we have here to take into consideration, 
and that little not dogmatically, but only metaphorically 
and in current popular phraseology." 

The Tubingen scholar, in fact, uses the language of 
Paul in order to set forth an imposing philosophy of 
religion instinct with Hegelian influence. He gives no 
authentic account of the Apostle s thought. Neverthe 
less this book breathes the spirit of Paul the prophet of 
freedom more fully than almost any other which has been 
devoted to him. That is what gives it its remarkable 
attractiveness. 

A year after the appearance of Baur s " Paulus " in 
1846 Albert Schwegler published his work on the post- 
apostolic age. 1 The founder of the Tubingen School had 
hitherto only, so to speak, hinted at the phases of develop 
ment by which the early Church grew up out of the 
controversy between the two parties. Schwegler under 
takes a more detailed description, and in doing so draws 
the lines so sharply that, along with the greatness of the 
construction, its faults become obvious. He has no 
deeper knowledge of Paulinism to impart. 

Schwegler s work had made it apparent from what side 
the Tubingen position was open to attack, and on this side 
Albrecht Ritschl proceeded to attack it in his well-known 
work on the origin of the early Catholic Church. 2 The 
first edition (1850) is primarily directed against Schwegler 
only ; in the second (1857) ne develops his opposition of 

1 Albert Schwegler, Das nachapostolische Zeitalter in den Haupt- 
momenten seiner Entwicklung (" The Post- Apostolic Age in the main 
Features of its Development"), 1846, vol. i. 522 pp., vol. ii. 392 pp. 
In the writings which mark the course of the development of Paulinism 
three groups are distinguished. To the first, the apologetic group, 
belongs the First Epistle of Peter ; to the second, the conciliatory 
writings, are to be reckoned the Gospel of Luke, the Acts of the Apostles, 
the First Epistle of Clement, and the Epistle to the Philippians ; the 
third is represented by the catholicising writings, the Pastorals, the 
Letter of Polycarp, and the Ignatian Letters. 

2 Albrecht Ritschl, Die Entstehung der altkatholischen Kirche, eine 
kirchen- und dogmengeschichtliche Monographic, 1850, 622 pp. ; 2nd ed., 
1857. 605 pp. 



&lt;r 



RITSCHL S FUNDAMENTAL CRITICISM 17 

principle to Baur. He offers proof that the earliest 
literature is not dominated by the negotiations for a 
compromise between the two parties which was postu 
lated by the Tubingen School, and at the same time he 
attacks the basis of the whole hypothetical construction. 
Baur, he urges, must have formed a false conception of 
Jewish Christianity and Gentile Christianity, since, on 
his view, it cannot be explained what was the common 
element that held the two together. Had they only, as 
the Tubingen School was obliged to assume, had 
the external bond of profession of faith in Christ, it 
would never be possible to explain why both parties felt 
the need of approaching one another by mutual con 
cessions until finally they coalesced in a single united 
Church. 

The extent of the doctrinal material common to both 
must, Ritschl argues, have been much greater than Baur 
represents. He has not discharged the first duty of a 
historian of the Apostolic age, for this requires " that the 
points should be clearly shown in which Jewish Christi 
anity and Paulinism coincide." Baur had only given a 
negative description of the Apostle s doctrine, because 
he never gives any hint " that Paul in very essential 
points held views which were common also to Jewish 
Christianity." 

The problem regarding the nature of the unity between 
Paulinism and primitive Christianity is thus recognised 
and formulated. 

But it was not so easy for Ritschl to say exactly what 
constituted the common element of doctrine, the existence 
of which he postulated. That is especially evident in the 
second edition of " The Origin of the Early Catholic 
Church." He is then only willing to admit an " opposi 
tion of practice " between Paul and the original apostles ; 
the area of this opposition is so restricted that " the 
essential agreement in the leading ideas laid down by 
Christ will be only the more clearly evident." But since 
in Paulinism little enough is to be found of the " leading 



i8 BAUR AND HIS CRITICS 

ideas laid down by Christ " the proof of the " essential 
agreement " remains a pious aspiration. 

The only solid fact which Ritschl is able to adduce 
is the expectation of the parousia. He assumes that 
it formed a very important part of the common doctrinal 
material, and inclines to believe that Paulinism arid Jewish 
Christianity agreed in an ideal-real expectation of the 
Second Coming in order to make common cause against ( 
Chiliasm, though the latter in its coarser form only 
appeared later. 

But in thus recognising eschatology Ritschl did not 
take the matter very seriously. He uses the eschatology, 
in fact, only in order to score a dialectical point against 
Baur, who had taken too little account of it. In Ritschl s 
" Justification and Reconciliation," where he later on 
had occasion to give a positive description of Paulinism, 
he avoided the faintest hint of any eschatological colouring 
of the Apostle s ideas. 

Another work which is occupied with the question of 
the unity between Paulinism and primitive Christianity 
is Lechler s " Apostolic and Post- Apostolic Age." l The 
work is a prize essay in answer to the problem proposed by 
the Teylerian Society in Holland, as to what constituted 
" the absolute difference between the doctrine and attitude 
of the Apostle Paul and that of the other Apostles," by 
which the " so-called Tubingen School endeavours to 
justify its hostile treatment of Christianity." Lechler 
opposes his teacher, but is not able to make any advance 
upon Ritschl in producing evidence of the common 
elements in the two doctrinal systems. 

^ 1 Gotthard Viktor Lechler, Das apostolische und das nachaposto- 
lische Zeitalter mit Riicksicht auf Unterschied und Einheit in Lehre und 
Leben ( . . . with special reference to their difference and unity in 
life and doctrine), ist ed., 1852 ; 2nd ed., 1857, 536 pp. The portion 
dealing with Paul is pp. 33-154 ; in the 3rd ed., 1885 (635 pp.) Paul is 
treated on pp. 269-407. 

In the first two editions the whole of the Pauline epistles are re 
garded as genuine ; in the third the author no longer ventures to treat 
the Pastorals as on the same footing with the other Epistles. The 
very clearly and comprehensively stated problem is printed at the 
beginning. 



LIPSIUS ON JUSTIFICATION 19 

Among the works which controverted the Tubingen 
view of Paulinism a prominent place belongs to an early 
work of Richard Adalbert Lipsius on " the Pauline 
doctrine of Justification." l Along with his scientific 
purpose the author also pursues a practical aim. He 
puts himself at the service of the anti-rationalistic reaction 
which aimed at restoring the old evangelical ideas to 
a position of honour, but in doing so did not grasp hands 
with the orthodoxy of the seventeenth and eighteenth 
centuries, but took as its starting-point the ideas which 
it finds present in the New Testament. In giving an 
objective presentation of the central Pauline doctrine 
of justification he believes that he is offering to the 
Protestantism of his time a view which it can adopt as 
its own. 

For the Apostle of the Gentiles, he argues, justification 
is not a purely legal, forensic act, but also an ethical 
experience. Faith is an ethical attitude which produces 
an inward righteousness. What is really effectual in 
redemption is the fellowship with Christ in life and death. 
It is brought about by the Spirit of God and of Christ, 
who unites himself with the believer and transforms his 
personality. 

J-,ipsius is the first to recognise the two trains of thought 
in Paulinism, and to remark that the one is based upon 
the juridical idea of justification, while the other has its 
starting-point in the conception of sanctification of the 
real ethical new creation by the Spirit. He does not, as 
had always previously been done, make everything of 
the one and nothing of the other, but aims at showing 
how they are brought together in the Apostle s thought. 

The importance of the eschatological passages does not 
escape him. He assumes that the thought of the parousia 
gives an inner unity to the Apostle s ideas. 

It is true that Lipsius did not succeed in fully dis 
charging the task which he laid upon himself. He 
weakens down one set of ideas in the interests of the other, 

1 Die paulinische Rechtfertigungslehre, 1853, 219 pp. 



20 BAUR AND HIS CRITICS 

and solders the two together externally by the use of 
skilfully chosen expressions ; but it remains his great 
merit that he was the first to recognise this duality in 
Paul s thought. Had he not been pursuing a dogmatic 
interest alongside of his scientific investigations he would 
doubtless have come to still closer quarters with the 
problem. 

While his critics were at work Baur had not been idle. 
From 1850 onwards he published in the Tilbinger 
Jahrbticher fur Theologie, which had superseded the 
Tiibinger Zeitschrift fur Theologie, a series of separate 
investigations of the Pauline Epistles. 1 He had resolved 
that the final results of his study of the Apostle of the 
Gentiles, with which he had begun his work, and which 
throughout his whole lifetime had been his favourite 
study, should be set forth in a new edition of his Paulus. 
This was to be the crown of his work. 

But it was not to be. Death snatched him away from 
his task when he had only just cast the first part into its 
new shape. The second and most important, which was 
to treat the " system of doctrine," he did not reach. 2 

To a certain extent a substitute for what was thus 
lost was furnished by the " Lectures on New Testament 
Theology," published by the master s son in i864. 3 The 
chapter on Paulinism is very striking in its brevity and 
clearness, and shows a great advance on the work of 1845. 
At that time Baur had examined and interpreted Paul s 

1 In 1850, Beitrdge zur Erkldrung der Korinthesbriefe, pp. 139-185. 
Continued in 1852, pp. 1-40 and 535-574. In 1855, Die beiden Briefe 
an die Thessalonicher ; ihre Achtheit und Bedeutung fur die Lehre der 
Parusie Christi, pp. 141-168 ( . . . their genuineness and their signi 
ficance for the doctrine of the parousia of Christ). In 1857, fiber 
Zweck und Gedankengang des Romerbriefs nebst der Erdrterung einiger 
paulinischen Begriffe, pp. 60-108 and 184-209 ("On the Purpose and 
the Argument of Romans, with a Discussion of certain Pauline Con 
ceptions.") 

2 Paulus der Apostel Jesu Christi, 2nd ed., edited by Zeller, 1866- 
1867, vol. i. 469 pp., revised by Baur ; vol. ii. 376 pp. contains a reprint 
of the chapter on Paul s doctrine from the first edition. 

3 Vorlesungen iiber neutestamentliche Theologie. Published by 
Ferdinand Friedrich Baur, 1864, 407 pp. Pages 128-207 deal with the 
doctrinal system of Paul. 



BAUR S RECOGNITION OF ESCHATOLOGY 21 

teaching by the light of the Hegelian Intellectualism. 
Now he tries to grasp his ideas historically and empiri 
cally, and to describe them accordingly. 

He discusses successively the Pauline views on : 
sin and flesh ; law and sin ; faith in the death of Christ ; 
law and promise ; law and freedom ; the righteousness 
of faith ; faith and works ; faith and predestination ; 
Christology ; baptism and the Lord s Supper ; the 
parousia of Christ. 

Eschatology, which in the first edition was quite 
overlooked, receives here abundant recognition. Baur 
admits that the Apostle fully shared the faith of the 
primitive community in the nearness of the parousia, 
and was at one with it in all the conceptions referring to 
the End. 

The Pauline theology as thus empirically apprehended 
has no longer the bold effectiveness of the speculatively 
constructed system of the year 1845. It becomes ap 
parent in Baur, and increasingly evident in the work of 
subsequent investigators, that the self -consistency and 
logical concatenation of the system become obscured 
and disturbed in proportion as progress is made in the 
exact apprehension of the individual concepts and ideas. 



Ill 

FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

MONOGRAPHS UPON PAUL 

Adolf Hausrath. Der Apostel Paulus (1865, 172 pp. ; biographical. 
2nd ed., 1872, 503 pp.). 

Ernest Kenan. St. Paul (1869, 570 pp. ; biographical and theological). 

Auguste Sabatier. L Apotre Paul (1870, theological). (E.T. by 
A. M. Hellier, 1891.) 

Otto Pfleiderer. Der Paulinismus (1873 ; 2nd ed., 1890; theological). 
(E.T. by E. Peters, 1877.) 

Carl Holsten. Das Evangelium des Paulus (ist pt., 1880 ; 2nd pt., 
1898). 

NEW TESTAMENT INTRODUCTIONS 

Eduard Reuss. Geschichte der heiligen Schriften Neuen Testamentes 
(5th ed., 1874). (E.T. History of the Sacred Scriptures of the 
New Testament, by E. L. Houghton. Edin. 1884.) 

Christian Karl von Hofmann. Pt. ix. of " Die Heilige Schrift." 1881. 
Heinrich Julius Holtzmann. Einleitung in das Neue Testament. 1885. 

Bernhard Weiss. (Same title.) 1886. (E.T. by A. J. K. Davidson, 
1887). 

Fre de ric Godet. Introduction au Nouveau Testament. 1893. 

Adolf Jiilicher. Einleitung in das Neue Testament. 1894. (E.T. by 
J. P. Ward, 1904.) 

Theodor Zahn. (Same title.) 1897. (E.T. of 3rd ed. 1909). 

WORKS ON NEW TESTAMENT THEOLOGY 

Eduard Reuss. Histoire de la theologie chretienne au siecle apostolique. 
3rd ed., 1864. (E.T. by A. Harwood, 1872.) 

Bernhard Weiss. Lehrbuch der biblischen Theologie des Neuen 
Testaments, ist ed., 1868 ; 6th ed., 1895. (E.T. Edin. 1882.) 

Christian Karl von Hofmann. Pt. xi. of " Die Heilige Schrift." 1886. 

Willibald Beyschlag. Neutestamentliche Theologie. 1891. 2nd ed., 
1896. (E.T. Edin. 1895.) 



THE LITERATURE 23 

GENERAL WORKS ON PRIMITIVE CHRISTIANITY 

Ernest Havet. Le Christianisme et ses engines (4 vols., 1884). 

Karl von Weizsacker. Das apostolische Zeitalter. 1886. (E.T. The 
Apostolic Age, 1894.) 

Otto Pfleiderer. Das Urchristentum. 1887. (E.T. of 2nd. altered ed., 
see later.) 

STUDIES ON SPECIAL POINTS 

Carl Holsten. Zum Evangelium des Paulus und Petrus. 1868. 
Fr. Th. L. Ernesti. Die Ethik des Apostels Paulus. 1868. 

Emmanuel Friedrich Kautzsch. De Veteris Testament! locis a Paulo 
apostolo allegatis. 1869. 

Franz Delitzsch. Paulus des Apostels Brief an die Romer in das 
Hebraische ubersetzt und aus Talmud und Midrasch erlautert. 
1870. (The Epistle of Paul the Apostle to the Romans translated 
into Hebrew and illustrated from Talmud and Midrash.) 

Hermann Ludemann. Die Anthropologie des Apostels Paulus. 1872. 

Albrecht Ritschl. Die christliche Lehre von der Rechtfertigung und 
Versohnung, vol. ii., 1874. (The Christian Doctrine of Justifica 
tion and Reconciliation.) (E.T. of vols. i. and iii. only). 

H. H. Wendt. Die Begriffe Fleisch und Geist bei Paulus. 1878. 
(The Meaning of the Terms Flesh and Spirit in Paul s Writings.) 

Louis Eugene Me"ne"goz. Le Peche et la redemption d apres St Paul. 
1882. 

Eduard Grafe. Die paulinische Lehre vom Gesetz. 1884. (The 
Pauline Teaching about the Law.) 

Gustav Volkmar. Paulus von Damaskus zum Galaterbrief. 1887. 
(Paul, from Damascus to Galatians). A biographical study, with 
a critical comparison between the data of Galatians and Acts. 

Alfred Resch. Agrapha. Ausserkanonische Evangelienfragmente. 
1888. On the Question whether Sayings of Jesus have been pre 
served in Paul s Writings. 

Otto Everling. Die paulinische Angelologie und Damonologie. 1888. 

Johann Gloel. Der Heilige Geist in der Heilsverkundigung des Paulus. 
1888. (The Holy Spirit in Paul s Preaching of Salvation.) 

Hermann Gunkel. Die Wirkungen des Heiligen Geistes nach der 
popularen Anschauung der apostolischen Zeit und nach der Lehre 
des Apostels Paulus. 1888. (The Manifestations of the Holy 
Spirit according to the Popular View of the Apostolic Age and 
according to the Teaching of Paul.) 

Eduard Grafe. Das Verhaltnis der paulinischen Schriften zur Sapientia 
Salamonis. 1892. (The Relation of the Pauline Writings to the 
Book of Wisdom.) 

Adolf Deissmann. Die neutestamentliche Formel " in Christo Jesu." 
1892. (The New Testament Formula " in Christ Jesus.") 

Richard Kabisch. Die Eschatologie des Paulus in ihren Zusammen- 
hangen mit dem Gesamtbegriff des Paulinismus. 1893. (Paul s 
Eschatology in Relation to his General System.) 



24 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

W. Brandt. Die evangelische Geschichte und der Ursprung des 
Christentums. 1893. (The Gospel History and the Origin of 
Christianity.) 

Ernst Curtius. Paulus in Athen. 1894. 

E. Bruston. La Vie future d apres St Paul. 1894. 

Hans Vollmer. Die alttestamentlichen Zitate bei Paulus. 1895. 

Ernst Teichmann. Die paulinischen Vorstellungen von Auferstehung 
und Gericht und ihre Beziehung zur jiidischen Apokalyptik. 
1896. (The Pauline Views of Resurrection and Judgment and 
their Relation to the Jewish Apocalyptic.) 

Theodor Simon. Die Psychologic des Apostels Paulus. 1897. 

Paul Wernle. Der Christ und die Siinde bei Paulus. (The Christian 
and Sin in Paul s Writings.) 1897. 

CRITICISM AND EXEGESIS 
Bruno Bauer. Kritik der paulinischen Brief e. 1850-1851-1852. 

Christian Hermann Weisse. Beitrage zur Kritik der paulinischen 
Brief e. 1867. (Contributions to the Criticism of the Pauline 
Epistles.) 

H. J. Holtzmann. Kritik der Epheser und Kolosserbriefe. 1872. 
Die Pastoralbriefe. 1880. 

Eduard Eeuss. Les Epitres pauliniennes (" La Bible," pt. iii.). 1878. 

Georg Heinrici. Das erste Sendschreiben des Apostels Paulus an die 
Korinther. 1880. Das zweite, etc. 1887. 

P. W. Schmiedel. Auslegung der Briefe an die Thessalonicher und 
Korinther in Holtzmann s " Handkommentar." 1891. (Ex 
position of the Epistles to the Thessalonians and Corinthians in 
Holtzmann s " Handkommentar.") 

R. A. Lipsius. Auslegung der Briefe an die Galater, Romer und 
Philipper in Holtzmann s " Handkommentar." 1891. 

WORKS OF A GENERAL CHARACTER, OR DEALING WITH COGNATE 
SUBJECTS 

Emil Schiirer. Neutestamentliche Zeitgeschichte. 1873. From the 
2nd ed. (1886) onwards the work bears the title: Geschichte des 
jiidischen Volkes im Zeitalter Jesu Christi. (E.T. History of the 
Jewish People in the time of Jesus Christ. Edin. 1885.) 

Karl Siegfried. Philo von Alexandrien als Ausleger des alten Testa 
ments an sich selbst und nach seinem geschichtlichen Einfluss 
betrachtet. 1875. (Philo of Alexandria as an Expositor of the 
Old Testament, considered both in himself and in regard to his 
historical influence.) 

Ferdinand Weber. System der altsynagogalen palastinenschen 
Theologie. 1880. The second edition (1897) bears the title 
Jiidische Theologie auf Grund des Talmud und verwandter 
Schriften. (Jewish Theology exhibited on the basis of the Talmud 
and allied writings.) 

W. Gass. Geschichte der christlichen Ethik. 1881. 
Theobald Ziegler. Geschichte der christlichen Ethik. 1886. 



THE CRITICAL CONSENSUS 25 

Edwin Hatch. The Influence of Greek Ideas and Usages upon the 
Christian Church (Hibbert Lectures for 1888). 

Theodor Zahn. Der Stoiker Epiktet und sein Verhaltnis zum 
Christen turn. 1894. 

Adolf Harnack. Dogmengeschichte, 3rd ed., 1894. (E.T. History of 
Dogma, 1894-1899). Die Chronologic der altchristlichen Literatur 
bis Eusebius. Vol. i., 1897. 

PROBLEMS many and various confronted theological 
science when it attempted to carry forward Pauline 
studies from the position in which they had been left by 
Baur. 

It was needful to clear up once for all the questions of 
literary criticism, to examine in detail the individual 
conceptions and trains of thought, to make clear the 
unity and inner connexion of the system, to show what 
rdle Paulinism had played in the development of early 
Catholic theology, and how far it was at one with primi 
tive Christianity, and to solve the question whether 
the material employed in its construction was of purely 
Jewish, or in part of Greek origin. 

In regard to the literary question a certain measure 
of agreement was in course of time attained. Baur had 
distinguished three classes of Epistles. In the first he 
placed, as beyond doubt genuine, Galatians, Corinthians, 
and Romans ; Ephesians, Colossians, Philippians, Thes- 
salonians, and Philemon formed the second class, being 
considered uncertain ; the Pastoral Epistles formed the 
third class, and were regarded as proved to be spurious. 

The views of the Tubingen master regarding the first 
class and the third were adopted by the majority of 
scholars of the next generation. No doubts were raised 
against the great Epistles ; the Pastoral Epistles were 
rejected. Holtzmann, in his work on the Letters to 
Timothy and Titus, 1 supplied a detailed argument in 
favour of this conclusion. 

1 Die Pastor albriefe kritisch und exegetisch behandelt, 1880, 504 pp. 
Adolf Harnack (in Die Chronologic der altchristlichen Literatur bis 
Eusebius, vol. i., 1897, 732 pp. on Paul, 233-239) is disposed to regard 
the personal notices of the Pastorals as genuine with the aid of the 
hypothesis of the second imprisonment. 



26 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

Of the letters of the intermediate class, the first to the 
Thessalonians and that to the Philippians were by many 
rehabilitated as Pauline. The second to the Thessalonians 
was rejected with increasing confidence. A special 
problem was presented by the letters to the Colossians 
and Ephesians, both because of their evident mutual 
relationship and particularly in regard to certain parts 
of the Epistle to the Colossians which made a strong 
impression of genuineness. Holtzmann offered a solution 
which gave general satisfaction. He adopted the 
hypothesis that Colossians was based upon a genuine 
Pauline letter which had been worked over by a later 
hand. 1 The redactor he identified with the author of the 
Epistle to the Ephesians. 

While there was this general consensus in the critical 
camp, which was ratified in Holtzmann s " Intro 
duction," 2 the most diverse opinions on special points 
are found. Some attempts were made to save the 

1 Kritik der Epheser- und Kolosserbriefe , 1872, 338 pp. 

2 Einleitung in das Neue Testament, 1885 ; 2nd ed., 1886 ; 3rd ed., 
1892. Second Thessalonians, Ephesians, and the Pastoral Epistles, 
spurious ; Colossians, worked over. A similar critical stand-point 
is occupied by Adolf Jiilicher, Einleitung in das Neue Testament, 1894, 
404 pp. The Pauline Epistles are treated in pp. 19-128. 

A mediating position is taken up by E. Reuss, Geschichte der heiligen 
Schriften Neuen Testaments (5th ed., 1874, 352 pp. ; 6th ed., 1887). 
All that can be said in favour of the genuineness of the Pastorals and 
2 Thessalonians is set forth with the greatest completeness, since the 
author is very reluctant to give up these writings. See the same 
author s Histoire de la theologie chretienne au siecle apostolique (1852 ; 
2nd ed., 1860, 2 vols., i. 489 pp., ii. 629 pp. Paulinism is treated in 
vol. ii., 3-262 ; 3rd ed., 1864). Mild polemic against Baur. Another 
mediating work is Willibald Beyschlag s Neutestamentliche Theologie, 
1891 ; 2nd ed., 1896. Only the Pastorals spurious. 

A conservative stand-point is occupied by Bernhard Weiss, Einleitung 
in das Neue Testament, 1886, 652 pp. Paul and his Epistles occupy 
pp. 112-332. The Pastoral Epistles are saved by the hypothesis of 
the second imprisonment. 2 Thessalonians and Ephesians are held to 
be genuine (3rd ed., 1897, 617 pp.). Conservative also is Theodor 
Zahn, Einleitung in das Neue Testament, ist ed., 1897, vol. i., 489 pp. 
Pauline Epistles, pp. 109-489. Ch. K. v. Hofmann in his Einleitung 
(pt. ix. of " Die Heilige Schrift," edited by Volck, 1881, 411 pp. 
Pauline Epistles, 1-200) proposes by means of the hypothesis of a 
liberation of the Apostle from his first imprisonment to make not only 
the Pastorals, but also the Epistle to the Hebrews genuine. That 
2 Thessalonians and Ephesians are genuine is for him self-evident. 
Frederic Godet too (Introduction au Nouveau Testament, 1893, 737 pp.) 
regards all thirteen Epistles as genuine. 



ISOLATION OF THE MAIN EPISTLES 27 

genuineness of the second Epistle to the Thessalonians. 
For some, the Epistles to the Colossians and Ephesians 
are genuine throughout and represent a later phase of the 
Pauline theology. Nor were there lacking attempts of 
all kinds to rehabilitate the Pastoral Epistles. Those 
who did not venture to defend them as wholes make a 
point of retaining at least the " personal references." 

The presentation of the Pauline teaching was, however, 
hardly affected by the literary divergences. Not even 
the most conservative of the critics had the boldness to 
place all the letters which have come down under the 
name of Paul on a footing of equality. Even those who 
regarded the Epistles to the Ephesians and Colossians as 
genuine did not fuse ideas of these Epistles with the system 
extracted from the four main Epistles, but presented 
them separately ; and any who were not converted 
to the rejection of the Pastorals at all events took the 
precaution to give a separate chapter to the Pauline 
theology of these writings. 1 If only the personal refer 
ences might be saved, these Epistles were as completely 
excluded from the presentation of the Pauline system as 
if they had been pronounced wholly spurious. 

Thus it continued to be the case, as it had been with 
Baur, that, generally speaking, only the four main epistles 
were taken into account in describing the Pauline system. 
The only significant change was that the epistle to the 
Philippians began to be put on the same footing, and, with 
a few exceptions, scholars no longer hesitated to regard 
as Pauline the conception of the pre-existence of Christ 
which is expressed in the section on the incarnation and 
obedience unto death. It was realised that the main 
epistles also presuppose this view, even if they do not 
state it so explicitly. 

There were, of course, as time went on, attempts to 

1 Typical in this respect is the procedure of Bernhard Weiss in his 
Neutestamentliche Theologie (1868). He treats the doctrine of the 
Epistles of the imprisonment and that of the Pastorals by themselves 
after he has developed that of the main Epistles, although he regards 
them all as Pauline. 



28 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

explain the composition of the four main epistles and 
Philippians as arising by the working up together in each 
single epistle of two or more originals, but these were not 
of any real importance for the study of the Pauline 
doctrine. It was only a carrying out of the task suggested 
by Semler, when he pointed out that we have not got the 
letters in their original form but only as prepared for 
public reading by the early Church. But the constitution 
of the Pauline material is scarcely affected by the attempts 
to reconstruct these originals. They have a purely 
literary interest. 

Theology, so far as it was occupied with the study of 
the Pauline system, did not allow itself to be at all dis 
quieted by the rejection of the whole of the Epistles 
proposed by Bruno Bauer in his " Criticism of the Pauline 
Letters." l Nor was its confidence shaken by the hypo 
thesis that the letters have been worked over to a very 
large extent and in a very thoroughgoing fashion. 
Christian Hermann Weisse s " Contributions to the Criti 
cism of the Pauline Epistles," 2 which appeared in 1867, 
where he sets forth the justification and the principles 
of this method, scarcely attracted any attention, as 
was indeed the case with almost all the theological work 
of this writer. 

The elucidation of the details of the Pauline doctrine 
is vigorously pursued. An empirical definition is at 
tempted of the terms sin, law, conscience, justification, 
redemption, election, and freedom. A special interest 
attaches to the study of the terms flesh and spirit. After 
Holsten had endeavoured to trace the significance of the 
word flesh, Ludemann in a brilliant work published in 
1872 endeavoured to arrive at a clear idea of the 
Apostle s anthropology and its place in his doctrine 
of salvation. 

There are, so runs his thesis, two conceptions of 

1 Kritik der paulinischen Brief e, 3 pts., 1850, 74 pp. ; 1851, 76 pp. ; 
1852, 129 pp.; Christus und die Cdsaren, 1877, 387 pp. 

2 Beitrdge zur Kritik der paulinischen Briefe an die Galater, Romer 
Philippe* und Kolosser. Edited by E. Sulze, 1867, 65 pp. 



LUDEMANN ON PAUL S ANTHROPOLOGY 29 

" flesh " in Paul. The one agrees with the naive, simple 
Jewish linguistic usage, and means only the natural being 
of man. The other is much more precise and belongs to a 
dualistic system of thought. In it the flesh is denned as 
the necessary cause of sin and corruption and as the 
absolute antithesis to spirit. On close examination it 
appears that not merely two conceptions of " the flesh " 
existing side by side, but two different doctrines of man s 
nature, and consequently two different conceptions of 
redemption, are found in Paul. 

According to the system which connects itself with the 
simpler, broader conception of the flesh, sin springs from 
the freedom of the will ; the law is assumed to be inherently 
possible of fulfilment ; redemption consists in a judgment 
of acquittal pronounced by God which has its ground 
solely in His mercy ; righteousness is imputed ; the 
act which brings redemption consists in faith. This 
circle of ideas, which forms a self-consistent whole, is 
described by Liidemann as the " Jewish-religious," the 
"juridical-subjective," doctrine of redemption. It has 
its source in reflection on the death of Jesus. 

The other system of ideas is defined as the "jethicp- 
dualistic." In contradistinction to the former it makes 
use of an " objectively real " conception of redemption. 
It presupposes the more precise, narrower conception of 
" the flesh," and regards sin as proceeding from it by a 
natural necessity. The law is the ferment of sin ; death 
the natural outcome of the flesh. Redemption can there 
fore only consist in the abolition of the flesh. It is 
based on the communication of the Spirit, which produces 
in the man a new creature and a real righteousness. 
The redemptive act takes place in baptism. The ideas 
of this second system are based on the Lord s resurrection. 

The coexistence of a juridical and an ethical system of 
thought in Paul had been held by others before Liidemann. 
What he did, however, was to follow out each separately 
into its details, and to endeavour to prove that all the 
contradictions and obscurities which are to be observed 



30 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

in the conceptions and statements of the Pauline theology 
find their ultimate explanation in the coexistence of two 
different doctrines of man s nature and two different 
doctrines of redemption. 

Hitherto the doctrine of redemption which appears 
alongside of the juridical had been described as " ethical." 
He remarks that it is conceived not merely ethically, but 
actually physically, and therefore defines it as ethico- 
physical. Further, he is of opinion that the two theories 
are not co-equal in importance. He holds that in the 
ethico-physical " the real view of the Apostle " is set 
forth, which only tolerates the other alongside of it, and 
more and more tends to push it aside wherever in the 
discussion Paul can count upon a thorough understanding 
of the real essence of the matter. 

In the Epistles the development, he thinks, takes the 
following course. The Letter to the Galatians knows only 
the primitive Jewish system of thought with reference 
to Christ s vicarious suffering and righteousness by faith ; 
it does not advance to the bolder realistic doctrine of 
righteousness. 

In the Epistles to the Corinthians, according to Liide- 
mann, the Apostle does not make much use of dogma. 
" The less advanced position of the church there may have 
been one cause of this." But the fundamental con 
ceptions of the ethico-physical series of ideas begin to 
appear in them. Later on they attain to " constitutive 
importance " and " force their way into the leading 
dogmatic statements." In the first four chapters of 
Romans the old view still finds expression. From the fifth 
onwards the new tenets are developed fully and clearly. 

This second series of ideas is not Jewish but Greek. 
Liidemann s view is that Paul, " in the attempt to give 
dogmatic fixity to the doctrine of salvation, presses on 
beyond the horizon of the Old Testament consciousness 
and is carried in the direction of Hellenism." l The latter 

1 Ludemann was opposed by H. H. Wendt in his work Die 
Begriffe Fleisch und Geist im biblischen Sprachgebrauch, 1878, 219 pp. 



DUAL ASPECT OF PAULINISM 31 

offered him a clearly-thought-out doctrine of man, in 
which the dominant idea was the antithesis of flesh and 
spirit, and made it necessary for him to think out a 
physically real doctrine of redemption. 

Pfleiderer l also works out the two series of ideas, 
separating them scarcely less sharply than Ludemann 
does. But he prefers to describe the series which runs 
parallel to the juridical, not as physico-ethical, but as 
mystico-ethical. Moreover, he does not admit that 
the ethical series expresses Paul s view more adequately 
than the other. He is of opinion also that the two sets of 
conceptions held an equal place in the consciousness of 
the Apostle from the first. By logically thinking out the 
Jewish idea of the atoning death, Paul was led according 
to Pfleiderer to the anti- Jewish conclusion that re 
demption is for all mankind, and that the law is conse 
quently invalidated. With this view there is united 
another, the source of which lies in the Hellenistic 
anthropology. This is that redemption consists in the 
influence exercised by the Holy Spirit upon the fleshly 
creatureliness, in consequence of which sin and death are 
abolished. The beginning of this process is to be sought 
in the resurrection of Jesus Christ. In the close connexion 
of the Pharisaic and Hellenistic elements " lies the 
characteristic peculiarity of the genuine Pauline theology, 
which can only be rightly understood when these two 
sides of it both receive equal attention. " 

That in Paulinism two lines of thought go side by side 
is recognised by almost all the investigators of this period. 
But in the importance assigned to each of them great 
divergences appear. Reuss makes the juridical ideas 
entirely subordinate to the ethical ; in Menegoz the former 
are more strongly emphasised than the latter. No one 
except Pfleiderer holds them to be on an exactly equal 

At the suggestion of Ritschl he undertook to prove that the meaning of 
these two words confined itself " within the boundaries set by Old 
Testament usage," and that therefore the assumption of Greek in 
fluence was unnecessary. 

1 Otto Pfleiderer, Das Urchristentum, 1887. 



32 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

footing. In general the ethical set of ideas is regarded as 
the original creation of the Apostle, and is assumed to 
represent the deepest stratum in his thought. Accord 
ingly, it is generally also held that the doctrine of the 
abolition of the flesh by the Spirit comes to its fuh 1 develop 
ment later than the other, which is based upon the 
atonement and imputed righteousness. Liidemann s 
theory of a development within the Pauline doctrine is 
adopted by the majority, though only in a less pronounced 
form. 

It should be mentioned that the first important 
attempt to prove the existence of different phases in the 
thought and life of Paul was made by Sabatier. 1 His 
work L Apotre Paul appeared in 1870, two years before 
Liidemann s study. At first the Apostle held, according 
to the French scholar, a simple doctrine which can be 
psychologically explained from his rabbinic training and 
his conversion. At the time of his great controversies he 
was compelled to work out for himself a philosophy of 
history which would enable him to prove that the law 
was only a passing episode in the history of salvation, and 
that justification by faith had always lain in the purpose 
of God. This doctrine takes a dominant position in the 
Epistles to the Galatians, Corinthians, and Romans. In 
the letters written during his imprisonment the Apostle 
advances to a speculative, gnostic development of his 
ideas. The coexistence of the juridical and ethical 
series of ideas does not receive the same prominence in 
Sabatier as in the later writers, who were influenced by 
Ludemann and Pfleiderer. 

When all is said and done, there is in the works of this 
period much assertion and little proof regarding the 
development within Paulinism. One almost gets the 
impression that the assumption of different stages of 
thought was chiefly useful as a way of escaping the 
difficulty about the inner unity of the system. This 

1 Auguste Sabatier, L Apdtre Paul, esquisse d une histoire de sa 
pensie, 1870, 296 pp. (2nd ed., 1881 ; 3rd ed., 1897). 



FAULTY ARRANGEMENT OF MATERIAL 33 

problem is, however, rather instinctively felt than clearly 
grasped. The scholars of this period do not feel it in 
cumbent upon them to trace out the connexion in. which 
these disparate sets of ideas must have stood in the view 
of Paul. They show no surprise at his passing so easily 
from the one to the other and arguing from each alter 
nately, and they do not ask themselves how he con 
ceived the most general ultimate fact of redemption which 
underlies both of them. They do not seek to arrive at a 
really fundamental view of the essence of Paulinism. 

Their method of procedure in their presentation of the 
doctrine is itself significant. They do not trace its 
development from one fundamental conception, but treat 
it under dogmatic loci, as Baur had done in his New 
Testament Theology. The scheme is more or less closely 
based on that of Reformation dogmatics. It is therefore 
assumed a priori that the Pauline theology can be divided 
into practically the same individual doctrines as that of 
Luther, Zwingli, and Calvin. Really, however, a pre 
liminary question arises whether this arrangement of 
the material does not introduce a wrong grouping and 
orientation into the Apostle s system, and whether it does 
not destroy the natural order and relative importance of 
the thoughts, falsify the perspective, tear asunder what 
ought not to be disjoined, and render impossible the 
discovery of the fundamental idea in which all the utter 
ances find their point of union. This procedure is inno 
cently supposed to be scientific ; as a matter of fact it 
leads to the result that the study of the subject continues 
to be embarrassed by a considerable remnant of the 
prepossessions with which the interpretation of Paul s 
doctrine was approached in the days of the Reformation. 

It is not less prejudicial when others, as for example 
Holsten, 1 adopt an arrangement of the material suggested 
by modern dogmatics. As the Pauline theology has, if 
possible, less affinity with the latter than with the Re 
formation theology, the error is almost more serious. 

1 Das Evangelium des Paulus,pt. 2 (edited by Mehlhorn), 1898, 172 pp. 

3 



34 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

In general these scholars are quite unconscious of the 
decisive importance which attaches to the arrangement 
and articulation of the material. It has, indeed, always 
been weakness of theological scholarship to talk much 
about method and possess little of it. 

Otto Pfleiderer, alone, is not entirely in this state of 
innocence. He has an inkling that the usual way of 
approaching the subject is not wholly free from objection. 
In the first edition of his Paulinism (1873) 1 he raises the 
question whether the " genetic method " is not demanded 
by the task of tracing out the organic progress of the 
development of dogma in its Pauline beginnings. Practical 
considerations, however, determine him " to arrange the 
matter very much according to the customary dogmatic 
loci, " while, however, at the same time giving as much 
attention as possible to the position of the dogma in the 
Pauline system." He fears that the carrying out of the 
genetic principle would lead to many repetitions, and 
would make it more difficult to get a general view of " the 
way in which the separate doctrines were connected with 
their bases." 

In order to salve his conscience he gives at the beginning, 
" by way of an introductory outline," a sketch of the 
" organic development of the Pauline gnosis from its 
single root." This general view it occupies twenty-seven 
pages is the most important part of the whole book. 
The succeeding chapters treat of sin, flesh, character 
of the law, aim of the law, Christ s atoning death, Christ s 
death as a means of liberation from the dominion of sin, 
the resurrection of Christ, the Person of Jesus Christ, the 
Son of David, the Son of God and heavenly Christ, 
the appearing of Christ in the flesh, faith, justification, 
sonship, the beginning and the progress of the new life, 
the Christian Church, the Lord s Supper, the election 
of grace, the parousia, and the end of the world. 

Liidemann was prevented by the task which he had set 
himself from adopting the division according to loci. 

1 P. 31- 



ELUSIVE DESCRIPTIONS 35 

His object was only to investigate Paul s conception of 
the fleshly man in its relation to his doctrine as a whole. 
In this way he was led to arrange the ideas in their natural 
order and, without strictly intending to do so, to give a 
general account of Paulinism, which is almost entirely 
free from the defective arrangement of other works, 
permits something of the logical articulation of the 
Apostle s circle of ideas to appear, and certainly penetrates 
more deeply than the rest into the Apostle s world of 
thought. 

As the works of Reuss, Weiss, Pfleiderer, Holsten, 
Renan, Sabatier, Menegoz, Weizsacker, do not aim at 
understanding and showing the development of this 
doctrine from a single fundamental thought, there are 
no real divergences in the general view which they take 
of the system. The differences of opinion with their 
predecessors which the authors express in their text and 
notes relate, in point of fact, only to details and minutiae, 
surprising as this may at first sight appear. The plan 
and design of the system are in general everywhere the 
same ; the differences regard only the mixing and applica 
tion of the colours, and the question how far Greek 
influences are to be recognised. 

In going through these works one after another, one is 
surprised to observe how great is their fundamental 
resemblance. At the same time there is something 
curiously " elusive " about them. At a given point 
one might be inclined to think that one of the authors 
was formulating a thought more clearly, or giving it 
more exclusive importance than the others ; and one is 
just about to note this as a special characteristic of his 
view. A few pages later, however, or in a following 
chapter, one finds additions or reservations which show 
that he does not really think differently from the rest. 
The differences lie not so much in the actual conception 
as in the literary presentation, and in the manner in which 
the material, which is essentially a whole, is parcelled out 
among the different loci. There is thus nothing to be 



36 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

gained by analysing the various conceptions one by 
one and comparing them with one another. Since 
there is no real difference of fundamental view, the 
comparison would lose itself in endless and unessential 
detail. 

To the general impression of monotony is to be added 
that of complexity. At the end of each of these works 
one is inclined to inquire whether the author really means 
to ask the reader to regard what is here offered as repre 
senting a system of thought which once existed in the 
brain of a man belonging to early Christianity, and was 
capable of being understood by his contemporaries. All 
the arts of literary presentation are employed to subtilise 
the conceptions, to describe the thoughts with exactitude, 
and to bring connexion and order into the chaos of ideas. 
But the result gives no satisfaction. No real elucidation 
and explanation of Paulinism is attained. The resulting 
impression is of something quite artificial. 

The welcome which these authors works received 
from their contemporaries shows that the latter saw in 
them an advance in the knowledge of Paulinism. They 
felt them to be satisfactory. That only means that the 
readers presuppositions and requirements lay within the 
same limitations as those of the authors. 

What had been the result arrived at ? A description 
of the Pauline doctrine, a remarkably detailed description, 
but nothing more. That doubtless implied a certain 
progress. It did not, however, extend so far as the 
authors and their readers assumed. Both innocently 
supposed that in the description they possessed at the 
same time an explanation as though the descriptive 
anatomy of this organism sufficed to explain its physiology. 
They were unconscious that they had so far only looked 
at Pauline thought from without, and had never gained 
any insight into the inner essence of the system. 

In these works the Apostle s statements are quoted one 
after another, and developed in his own words. The 
authors think they have discharged their task when they 



DIFFICULTIES GLOSSED OVER 37 

have so arranged the course of the investigation that all 
important passages can be respectably housed. 

The odd thing is that they write as if they understood 
what they were writing about. They do not feel com 
pelled to admit that Paul s statements taken by themselves 
are unintelligible, consist of pure paradoxes, and that the 
point that calls for examination is how far they are 
thought of by their author as having a real meaning, and 
could be understood in this light by his readers. They 
never call attention to the fact that the Apostle always 
becomes unintelligible just at the moment when he 
begins to explain something ; never give a hint that while 
we hear the sound of his words the tune of his logic 
escapes us. 

What is his meaning when he asserts that the law is 
abolished by the death of Jesus according to other 
passages, by His resurrection ? How does he represent 
to himself the process by which, through union with 
the death and resurrection of the Lord a new creaturehood 
is produced in a man, in virtue of which he is released 
from the conditions of fleshly existence, from sin and 
death ? How far is a union possible between the natural &lt; 
man, alive in this present world, and the glorified Christ &lt; 
who dwells in heaven ; and one, moreover, of such a kind 
that it has a retrospective reference to His death ? The 
authors we have named do not raise questions of this kind. 
They feel no need to trace out the realities which lie 
behind these paradoxical assertions. They take it for 
granted that Paul has himself explained his statements 
up to a certain point so far, in fact, as this is possible in 
the world of feeling to which religion belongs. 

This self-deception is made the more easy for them by 
the fact that they are accustomed to clothe their own 
religious views in Pauline phraseology, and consequently 
they come to treat as the authentic logic of Paul, arguments 
which they have unconsciously imported into their 
account of his teaching. They fail to reckon with the 
possibility that the original significance of his utterances 



38 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

may rest on presuppositions which are not present to our 
apprehension and conception. For the same reason they 
all more or less hold the opinion that what they have to do 
with is mainly a psychological problem. They assume 
that the Pauline system has arisen out of a series of re 
flexions and conclusions, and would be as a whole clear 
and intelligible to any one who could succeed in really 
thinking himself into the psychology of the rabbinic 
zealot who was overpowered by the vision of Christ on 
the road to Damascus. 

The writer who goes furthest in this direction is Holsten. 
In his work on the " Gospel of Paul and of Peter " l 
he describes how Paul, while he was persecuting the new 
faith, was, as a Jewish thinker, occupied with the thought 
of the offence of the cross and the alleged resurrection. 
While still a fanatical zealot " he constantly carried with 
him in his consciousness the elements of the Messianic 
faith, even though as negative and negated." By the 
keenness of his theological dialectic he was compelled to 
imagine what the alleged facts would really signify if 
the belief of the disciples were justified. The " principle 
of the Messianic faith " was, in him, " alive in greater 
defmiteness than even in the consciousness of the followers 
of the Messiah whom he persecuted." The Messiahship of 
Jesus could not for him take its place as a hope and faith 
within the Jewish system of thought and religious life, 

1 Zum Evangelium des Paulus und des Petrus, 1868, 447 pp. In 
this work the author collects some of his earlier and later essays. The 
following are its component parts, " Paul s Vision of Christ " (1861), 
" Peter s Vision of the Messiah " (1868), " Contents and Argument of 
the Epistle to the Galatians " (1859), " The Significance of the word 
&lt;rdp| (flesh) in Paul s System of Doctrine" (1855). The collection is 
dedicated to F. C. Baur, "who though dead yet lives." In the first 
part of the work Das Evangelium des Paulus, 1880, 498 pp., Holsten 
deals with the Epistle to the Galatians and the First to the Corinthians. 
The second part was intended to give an exposition of Romans and 2 
Corinthians and to close with a systematic account of the Pauline 
theology. At Holsten s death only the closing section was found to 
be ready for printing. It was published in 1898 under the editorship 
of Carl Mehlhorn, and bears the title " Carl Holsten, Das Evangelium 
des Paulus, part ii., Paulinische Theologie," 173 pp. What was thus 
published is based on a manuscript prepared for his lectures in the 
winter session of 1893-1894, and on students notes. 



PSYCHOLOGICAL EXPEDIENTS 39 

but necessarily implied the destruction of what he had 
hitherto held to be true. Thus the persecutor had in 
principle thought out for himself to its ultimate conse 
quences the revolution which would result from the 
acceptance of the Messiahship of Jesus. And this he 
translated into word and deed after he had experienced 
the vision on the Damascus road. 

Other writers take as the starting-point for their psycho 
logical arguments the passage in Romans vii., where Paul 
depicts the despair of the man who recognises that the 
law, although it is spiritual and was given with a view 
to life, can only in the fleshly man produce sin, condemna 
tion, and death. What we there read concerning the 
struggle between the natural, powerful will of the flesh 
and the law, is, they think, written from the point of 
view of the pre-Christian consciousness of the Apostle. 
He had experienced this agony of soul, and it was by this 
that the Jewish religious attitude had been broken down in 
him. Therefore in his Gospel he does not desire to retain 
anything from the faith of his fathers. 

These two main lines of psychological theory are 
followed for a longer or shorter distance in all the works 
of this period. Hand in hand with this psychologising 
goes a tendency to modernisation. The scholars of this 
period spiritualise Paul s thought. The transformation 
varies in extent for the different ideas. The statements 
about the atonement and imputed righteousness are 
the least affected by it. What is unintelligible in these 
is put down to the account of the Jewish Rabbinic mode 
of thought in which Paul is supposed to be held prisoner. 
On the other hand, the conceptions regarding union with 
Christ in his death and passion, and the new life in Him 
through the Spirit, are .subjected to paraphrase and 
explanation until nothing of the realistic sense is left 
remaining. The question is not faced why Paul, if he 
wanted to say anything so " spiritual " and general as 
this, should have adopted so exaggerated, paradoxical, 
and materialistic a method of expression. 



40 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

Whatever remains unexplained after the psycho- 
logising, the depotentiation, and modernisation, is re 
ferred to the peculiar character of the religious experience 
which the Apostle is supposed to have undergone in the 
vision on the Damascus road. What essential difference 
there was between this appearance of the Lord and 
those experienced by the other disciples is nowhere 
clearly worked out, not even by Holsten, who makes the 
most extensive use of this vision. It is simply taken for 
granted by them all that in the vision itself is to be found 
the explanation, not only of Paul s conversion, but also 
in some way or other of his call to be a missionary to the 
Gentiles and of the peculiar character of his doctrine. 

All these accounts of his teaching agree in assuming 
that Paul s system of doctrine was in the main a purely 
personal creation of his own, and is in some way to be 
explained by the special character of his religious ex 
perience. The question whether in this way his integral 
connexion with primitive Christianity is sufficiently 
preserved receives but little attention. In none of these 
works is the investigation of the doctrinal material 
common to Paul and his opponents seriously taken in 
hand. The writers are content with the affirmation 
that both parties took as their starting-point the fact of 
the death and resurrection of Jesus, without entering into 
any consideration of the question how far Paul s reason 
ings, which they v refer back to his inner personal ex 
perience, reproduce generally current ideas of primitive 
Christianity and simply carry them out to their logical 
issue. 

The question which Ritschl had formerly forced on the 
consideration of Baur has therefore not been faced or 
solved. It is true the author of " Justification and 
Reconciliation " l thinks that he has not only raised 
the question but also answered it. He undertakes to 
explain all the Pauline doctrinal passages on the basis of 

1 Albrecht Ritschl, Die christliche Lehre von der Rechtfertigung und 
Versohnung, 1874, vol. ii. 377 pp. On Paul, pp. 215-259 and 300-369. 



PAUL AND PRIMITIVE CHRISTIANITY 41 

Old Testament conceptions. In this way he hopes to 
work out the Apostle s real conception of the atoning 
death of Jesus, and of " righteousness," and believes that 
these will then, since they have been gained from the Old 
Testament, coincide with the primitive Christian views 
in all essential points. 

Speaking generally, Ritschl s tendency is to make the 
differences between Paulinism and primitive Christianity 
as small as possible, and to find them, as he had already 
done in the " Origin of the early Catholic Church," not so 
much in his doctrine proper as in his attitude to certain 
practical questions. Ritschl employs the dialectical skill 
with which nature had richly endowed him to transform 
and shade off the doctrine of the Apostle of the Gentiles 
until it harmonises with the fundamental Christian 
teaching which he assumes for the earliest period and 
finds necessary for his dogmatics. 

He entirely depotentiates the juridical series of ideas. 
Moreover, he refuses to admit that Paulinism constitutes 
a speculative system. He assumes that the Apostle 
moved in a free, untrammelled fashion among the various 
sets of ideas and felt no real need to combine them into a 
unity. 

In addition to Ritschl, Bernhard Weiss l and Willibald 
Beyschlag, a in their New Testament Theologies, endeavour 
to make clear the relations between Paul and primitive 
Christianity from the stand-point of critical conservatism. 
In order to secure a broad basis for the primitive form of 
apostolic doctrine, they pronounce i Peter and the 
Epistle of James to be documents of the pre-Pauline 
period. 

The writer who makes things easiest for himself is 
Von Hofmann. 3 For him there is no " Pauline system 

1 Lehrbuch der biblischen Theologie des Neuen Testaments, ist ed. 
1868, 756 pp. On Paulinism, pp. 216-507 ; 6th ed. 1895, 677 pp. On 
Paulinism, 201-463. 

2 Neutestamentliche Theologie, ist ed. 1891 ; 2nd ed. 1896, vol. ii. 
552 pp. On Paul, pp. 1-285. 

3 Ch. K. v. Hofmann, Biblische Theologie (vol. xi. of " Die heilige 
Schrift Neuen Testaments"; edited by Volck), 1886, 328 pp. 



42 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

of doctrine." The Apostle never uttered anything that 
did not belong to the common doctrine of Christianity, 
but " according to the difference of the occasion " brought 
into prominence this or that aspect of the saving acts of 
God or of the condition of salvation, and what he thus 
brought forward, now under one designation now under 
another, he sets forth now in this relation and now in 
that one. Therefore this writer, who was vaunted by 
the orthodox as a brilliant opponent of Tubingen errors, 
has no scruple in working up together the Pauline ideas 
along with those of the other New Testament Epistles 
into a single whole, which he offers as apostolic doctrine. 

Another problem which is hardly apprehended in its 
full difficulty by the scholars of this period is that of the 
total neglect in the Pauline gospel of the proclamation of 
the kingdom of God and His righteousness which Jesus 
committed to His followers. They seem to feel no surprise 
at the fact that the Apostle, even where it would be the 
most natural thing in the world, never appeals to the 
sayings and commands of the Master. Many of them 
never touch on this question at all. 

Resch, however, in his collection of extra-canonical 
Gospel-fragments, even undertakes to show that in the 
Pauline letters a whole series of otherwise unrecorded 
sayings of Jesus are embodied, and defends the hypo 
thesis that the Apostle had taken them from a pre- 
canonical Gospel which ranked for him as an authority 
of equal value with the Old Testament. The enigma 
of the untraced quotation, " What eye hath not seen, 
neither hath ear heard," etc., in I Cor. ii. 9 fL, is solved 
by referring the " as it is written " to the written Gospel 
on which Paul draws. 1 

It is curious that most of these authors believe that 
they reduce the acuteness of the problem by pointing 

1 Texte und Untersuchungen zur Geschichte der altchristlichen Kirche, 
vol. v., 1888, part iv. Alfred Resch, " Agrapha. Ausserkanonische 
Evangelienfragmente gesammelt und untersucht," 480 pp. The " logia " 
numbered 13-46 he holds, on the evidence of echoes in the letters, to 
have been known to Paul. See pp. 152-243. 



RELATION TO THE TEACHING OF JESUS 43 

^ut in the Epistles as many reminiscences of Synoptic 
jsayings as possible. That, of course, only makes the 
matter more complicated. If so many utterances of 
Jesus are hovering before Paul s mind, how comes it that 
he always merely paraphrases them, instead of quoting 
them as sayings of Jesus, and thus sheltering himself 
behind their authority ? 

As for those who have some inkling of the problem, 
their one thought is to dispose of it as rapidly as possible, 
instead of first exposing it in its full extent. Among them 
is Ritschl, who here employs all the arts and artifices of 
his exegesis and dialectic. That Jesus and Paul did not 
at bottom teach the same thing is to this undogmatic 
dogmatist unthinkable. 

In general the writers of this period are involved in the 
most curious confusions regarding the problem of " Jesus 
and Paul." They fail to perceive that these two magni 
tudes are not directly comparable with one another 
because they think of Paul in complete isolation, and not 
as a feature of primitiye Christianity. The differences 
and oppositions which reveal themselves between the 
teaching of Jesus and that of Paul exist also as between 
trie teaching of Jesus and that of primitive Christianity 
itself. The momentous development did not arise first 
with Paul, but earlier, in the community of the first 
disciples. Thei " religion " is not identical with the 
" teaching of Jesus," and did not simply grow out of it ; 
jt is jpunded upon His death and resurrection. The 
."new element " was not brought into Christianity by Paul; 
he found it there before him, and what he did was to 
think it out in its logical implications. The difference of 
teaching between Paul and Jesus is not a difference 
between individuals, it is in almost its whole extent 
due to the fact that the Apostle belongs to primitive 
Christianity. 

In its false statement of the problem of Jesus and Paul 
the scholarship of the period after Baur shows that it 
has not yet succeeded in understanding the Apostle of 



44 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

the Gentiles as a phenomenon, an aspect, of primitive 
Christianity. 

There is frequent mention, in all these studies, of the 
Jewish roots of the Pauline thought. They attempt to 
explain his views, so far as possible, from the materials 
given in the Law and the Prophets. Some authors had 
been inclined to assume that in regard to his conception 
of the Law he did not stand wholly upon Old Testament 
ground, in the sense that he sometimes means by it a 
narrower ceremonial code of temporary validity, and 
sometimes a universal ethical law which has not been 
invalidated by the death of Christ. These confusions 
were put an end to by a study of Edward Grafe. 1 He 
shows that Paul when he speaks of the law, alike when he 
uses the article or does not use it, always has in mind 
the whole legal code, and never varies from the conviction 
that this has been set aside by the death and resurrection 
of Christ. 

That in Galatians the ritual aspect of the law, in 
Romans the ethical, is the more prominent, does not 
alter this fact. Nor is the consistency of the Apostle s 
view annulled by the fact that in many places he formu 
lates the negative judgment quite definitely, while in 
others he softens it by an admission of the historical and 
ethical significance of the law. 

That Paul s thinking follows the lines of Old Testament 
conceptions is self-evident. The only question is whether 
the motive forces which make their appearance in his 
gospel are derived in some way or other from the Old 
Testament Scriptures. 

That is not the case. In working up the primitive 
Christian views he does not have recourse to the ideas 
of the ancient Judaism. Nowhere does Paul attach 
himself to these. He takes no ideas from the Old Testa 
ment with a view to giving them a new development, 

1 Die paulinische Lehre vom Gesetz (" The Pauline Doctrine of the 
Law"). Based on the four main Epistles, 1884, 26 pp. The second 
edition (1893, 33 pp.) is a revision of the first, but in the results arrived 
at both agree. 



RELATION TO LATE JUDAISM 45 

but uses only what he can take from it ready formed. 
His new discovery rests on a different basis. The Law 
and the Prophets serve only to supply him with the 
Scriptural arguments, positive and negative, of which 
he stands in need. 

On the essential nature of the distinctively Pauline 
world_of thought the Old Testament therefore throws no 
light. This negative result is not, indeed, everywhere 
clearly formulated. There are some students of Paulinism 
who simply ignore it. Heinrici, in the preface to his 
study of 2 Corinthians (1887), ventures on the assertion 
that in Paul the " spirit of Old Testament prophecy " 
triumphs over contemporary Judaism. 

And he is not the only one who clings to the illusion 
that much help is to be gained from the Old Testament 
for the understanding of the Apostle s world of thought. 
By way of proof they cite every possible parallel, even the 
most remote. But the disproportion between the amount 
of the material offered and the smallness of the result 
established tells against them. 

That Paul is a child of late Judaism only began to be 
generally taken into account when its world of thought 
was made known to theology by Schiirer s "History of 
New Testament Times," l and Weber s " System of Pales 
tinian Theology in the Early Synagogues." But even 
after this most scholars shared a certain disinclination to 
recognise a real connexion between the Apostle s world of 
thought and that of late Judaism. Heinrici, who in 

1 Neutestamentliche Zeitgeschichte. In the second edition the work 
bears the title Geschichte des judischen Volkes im Zeitalter Jesu Christi 
(English Translation : " History of the Jewish People in the Time of 
Jesus Christ," Edinburgh, 1885). The second volume deals with the 
literature and the various currents of thought. There have since 
appeared a third and fourth edition. 

2 System der altsynagogalen palastinensischen Theologie aus Targunt, 
Midrasch und Talmud dargestellt, 399 pp. (Edited after the author s 
death by Delitzsch and Schnedermann.) 

The second edition (1897, 427 pp.) bears the title Judische Theologie 
auf Grund des Talmud und verwandter Schriften (" Jewish Theology 
described on the Basis of the Talmud and cognate Writings "). 

The earlier literature is referred to in Hans Vollmer s Die alttesta- 
mentlichen Zitate bei Paulus (1895), 81 pp. 



46 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

his study in the Corinthian Epistles gives great attention 
to the question regarding the source of his ideas, definitely 
denies that " the intellectual and religious forces of Late 
Judaism exercised a dominant influence " on the Apostle. 
He holds, like many others, that Paul, passing over his 
own time, grasped hands with the classical Judaism of 
the prophets, and that one source of his strength is to be 
found in this fact. This prejudice is to be explained by 
the low estimation in which late Judaism had always 
been held by theologians. It was identified, without 
examination, on the one hand with " fantastic apocalyptic 
views," and on the other with a " soulless Rabbinism." 

The admission, however, that Paul in the principles 
of his exegesis was in agreement with Rabbinism was made 
by theologians with comparative readiness. This did 
not carry with it the surrender of anything that had been 
much valued, since the verbal comparison and contrast 
of passages which he practises, and the illogical and 
fantastic reasoning which appears in his arguments, had 
always been distasteful to theological science. It was 
therefore rather welcome to it than otherwise, to find, 
in consequence of the increased knowledge of parallel 
products of late Judaism, an explanation of a weakness 
which did not properly harmonise with the greatness of 
this heroic spirit, in the influences to which he had been 
subjected by reason of his theological education. 1 

Along with this was accepted the fact that, in common 
with his contemporaries, he naively treats the Haggadic 
embellishments of Old Testament stories as on the same 
footing with the Scripture itself. His assumption that 
the Law was given by the angels (Gal. iii. 19), and his 
reference to the rock that followed the children of Israel 
in the wilderness and poured out water (i Cor. x. 4), are 
to be explained from passages in the Rabbinic literature. 

1 A typical utterance is that of J. Wellhausen (Israelitische und 
judische Geschichte, 6th ed. 1907, 386 pp.), " Paul has not been able 
to free himself from the Rabbinic methods of exegesis. He employs 
it in his arguments, especially in connexion with justification by faith. 
But the inner essence of his religious conviction was not affected by it." 



SOURCES OF PAUL S EXEGESIS 



47 



No thoroughgoing investigation was undertaken with a 
view to determining whether the Rabbinic principles 
suffice to explain Paul s method of scriptural argument. 
In general the view prevails that his " typological " and 
" spiritualising " (pneumatisch) interpretation goes beyond 
what can elsewhere be shown in Palestinian theology. 
It is true these two methods of exegesis, going beyond the 
simple literal sense, are not wholly unknown, but they 
only came to their full development in contemporary 
Alexandrian Biblical scholarship. For this reason it 
is proposed to assume that Paul had also received an 
influence from this side. 

As examples of Alexandrian exegesis are quoted the 
interpretation of Hagar and Sarah as representing the 
earthly and the heavenly Jerusalem (Gal. iv. 22 1), 
that of the water-giving rock as representing Christ 
(i Cor. x. 4), and the argument from the threshing oxen 
to the preachers of the gospel (i Cor. ix. 9 ff.). 

One of the greatest problems of the Pauline use of 
Scripture is not mentioned in these works. It is assumed 
that the Apostle attached special importance to proving 
the Messiahship of the crucified Jesus. How then can 
we explain the fact that he never makes any use of the 
passage about the Suffering Servant of the Lord in Isaiah 
liii ? This fact is the more surprising because it may be ] 
taken as certain that the apologetic of the primitive 
Christian community gave this passage a most prominent 
place in its plan of operations. 

A scientific attempt to adduce from the Rabbinic 
literature explanatory parallels to Pauline thought was 
made by Franz Delitzsch in 1870 in connexion with his 
Hebrew translation of the Epistle to the Romans. 1 The 

1 Paulus des Apostels Brief an die Romer in das Hebrdische ubersetzt, 
und aus Talmud und Midrasch erldutert, 1870, 122 pp. 

At the beginning the author gives an interesting review of previous 
Hebrew translations of the whole New Testament or of single books. 
He also refers to the Rabbinic reasoning in the apostle s arguments. 
The illustrations from the Rabbinic literature, pp. 73-100, follow the 
translation. 

He expects as a result of this translation that it will bring into 



48 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

net result is not great. The parallels adduced are so 
uncharacteristic that they throw no new light on the 
Apostle s ideas. 

No further considerable attempts were made in this 
direction. Nor did Weber s " Theology of the Early 
Synagogue " lead to any other important works being 
undertaken in that department. On the contrary, his 
sketch of the Rabbinic world of ideas makes it apparent 
that Pauline thought does not become any more in 
telligible by its aid than it is in itself, even though one 
parallel or another may be unearthed. Moreover, it is to 
be remarked that the discovery of such parallels would 
only become of importance if proof could be given that 
they really date from the beginning of the first century. 
Such proof is, however, quite impossible. 

Of the " Rabbinism " of Paul s day we know practically 
nothing. Even the earliest strata of the literature which 
is at our disposal were not formed before the beginning of 
the third century A.D. 1 It consists of a codification of 
tradition carried out by the later Rabbinic scholasticism. 
How far it offers us a faithful representation of the ideas 
and character of Rabbinic thought at the beginning of the 
first century must remain an open question. 

Even if Paul, in virtue of his dialectic and certain 
external characteristics, belongs to the world which this 
literature reveals to us, in regard to the content of his 
ideas and his creative force as a thinker he is not to 
be understood by its aid. To register this fact is, however, 
by no means to deny that he has his roots in the Jewish 
theology of his time, but only to say that he shows no 
affinity as regards the inner essence of his problems and 

prominence the Old Testament, Rabbinic, and Hellenistic elements in 
the early Christian modes of thought and expression. 

Earlier attempts to point out Rabbinic parallels to Pauline ideas 
were made by Lightfoot, Surenhus, Schottgen, Meuschen, and Nork. 
Information about this literature will be found in Hans Vollmer s 
work (Die alttestamentlichen Zitate bei Paulus, 1895, pp. 80, 81). 

1 A good general idea of the Rabbinic literature as a whole is given by 
Bousset in his work Die Religion des Judentums im neutestamentlichen 
Zeitalter, 1903, and ed., 1906, pp. 45-53. 



CHARACTER OF CONTEMPORARY JUDAISM 49 

ideas with what a later age offers us as the Rabbinism 
of the first century. It is possible, indeed it is in the 
highest degree probable, that many of his ideas for which 
no " Rabbinic " parallels can be adduced, nevertheless 
have their origin in the Jewish theology of his time. 
Who is to guarantee that the later scholasticism has 
faithfully preserved for us the Jewish theology which 
was contemporary with Christianity ? It may well have 
been more living in thought and more profound than 
the men of the after-time could understand, or their 
tradition preserve. The picture which they draw for us 
shows only a sun-scorched plain, but this yellow, wilted 
grass was green and fresh once. What did the meadows 
look like then ? 

It is to be remembered that the Apocalypse of Ezra, 
which shows in its own way such depth, while it is 
derived from the Scribal theology of the first century, is 
as little to be explained from what on the basis of the 
later literature we think of as the Rabbinism of the period 
as are the Pauline Epistles. Had this writing not been 
preserved, it would never have occurred to anyone that 
at that time men belonging to the circle of the Scribes 
had been tormented in this way by the primary problems \ 
of religion, and had brought the questions arising out of | 
them into such close relations with eschatology. 

Further, it is to be taken into account that Palestinian 
Scribism, even though it was an independent entity, did 
not, at the time when it has to be considered in connexion 
with Paul, exist in absolute exclusiveness, but maintained 
relations with Jewish Hellenism. The latter worked on 
a basis of ideas which it had in large measure taken over 
from Rabbinism and held in common with the latter. 
This relationship becomes in the case of Philo clearly 
apparent. With him one can never tell where the v 
" Rabbinist " ends and the Hellenist begins. But if 
the theology of the Scribes stood in any kind of relation 
with Jewish Hellenism, it cannot have been so poor in 
ideas and unspiritual as it appears in the later tradition. 

4 



50 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

Even the discourses of Jesus, in spite of the polemical 
picture which they give of it, create the impression that 
He had to do with a Rabbinism which was interested 
in really religious questions, even though it showed itself 
incapable of rising to the height of the simple piety to 
which His preaching of the Kingdom of God and the 
repentance necessary thereto made its appeal. 

It seems therefore probable that the Epistles of Paul 
and the Apocalypse of Ezra, along with its satellite the 
Apocalypse of Baruch, are witnesses to a Rabbinism, or 
a movement within its sphere, of which the Rabbinic 
tradition which later became fixed in written form gives 
us no information. 

What should we know of the moving forces of the 
Reformation as they manifest themselves in Luther s 
works of the year 1521, if we were dependent for our 
information on the Lutheran scholasticism of the sixteenth 
and seventeenth centuries ? How would we think of 
the Reformation as a whole if we possessed only these 
witnesses ? With all due respect to the vaunted faith 
fulness of Rabbinic tradition, which after all we are not 
in a position to check, was it capable of preserving the 
record of a period of living thought ? Is an oral tradition 
ever capable of doing so ? 

The historical examples in which we are able to test 
the tradition of later generations by the reality which has 
subsequently come to light, are calculated to shake our 
faith in the assumption that it can do so. What did 
Beethoven s time know of the achievements of the period 
of Bach ? Mention is made of the elaborate fugues 
which had their origin at that time ; but that the 
eighteenth century had produced choral works of deep 
feeling and an elevation secure against change of fashion, 
was entirely unknown to the second generation after Bach, 
although there had been nothing to interrupt tradition. 

Moreover, it ought not to be forgotten that we possess 
the history of Judaism only in fragments. As regards 
the political events of the first century we are com- 



1 

NEGLECT OF LATE- JEWISH PARALLELS 51 

paratively well informed, but of the religious movements 
we know little, and what does come to our knowledge is 
so disconnected and self-contradictory that it cannot be 
combined into a single picture. The Baptist, Jesus, 
Philo, Paul, Josephus, and the authors of the Apocalypses 
of Ezra and Baruch cover together about two generations. 
They are at first sight as entirely different as if they 
belonged to widely separated periods. 

The destruction of Jerusalem interrupts the continuity 
of development of the Jewish people and of its thought. 
Its life is extinguished. Hellenism dies out. There 
arises a Rabbinism which is no longer borne on the tide 
of great national and spiritual movements. It becomes 
ossified, and confines itself to mere unproductive com 
mentating upon the law. From the past its tradition 
takes only what lies within the field of its own narrow 
interests. The problems and ideas which moved the 
earlier, many-sided period no longer come into view, 
but fall into as complete oblivion as if they had never 
occupied Jewish religious thought. 

The scholarship of the period after Baur is indeed far 
enough from embarking on reflexions of this kind. It 
takes scarcely any notice of what remains of the Late- 
Jewish non-Hellenistic literature. Even the com 
mentators make scarcely any use of the parallels to 
Pauline ideas and conceptions which are found in Enoch, 
the Apocalypse of Baruch, the Apocalypse of Ezra, and 
here and there in the Testaments of the Twelve Patriarchs. 

It is nothing less than astonishing that the close 
affinities with the Apocalypse of Ezra do not receive any 
recognition. In this work there are elaborate discussions 
of the problems of sin, the Fall of our first parents, 
Election, the wrath, long-suffering, and mercy of God, 
the prerogative of Israel, the significance of the law, the 
temporal and the eternal Jerusalem, of the prospect of 
dying or surviving to the Parousia, the tribulation of the 
times of the End, and the Judgment. The close affinity 
between this writer and Paul strikes the eye at once. 



52 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

Writers on Paulinism are, however, so obsessed by the 
idea that the teaching of Paul is a " personal creation " 
that they cannot bring themselves to accept the view that 
the religious problems which struggle for solution in his 
letters had also occupied his Jewish contemporaries or at 
least a section of them. 1 

The claims of Late Judaism on Paul were therefore 
taken to be discharged when his Rabbinic dialectic and 
exegesis, and to a certain extent his eschatology also, 
had been ascribed to it. 

The chapter on the future-hope which connected Paul 
on the one hand with Judaism and on the other with 
primitive Christianity, is never omitted in any account 
of his teaching given by the scholars of the post-Baur 
period. In it is collected all that the Epistles have to 
say regarding the parousia, the resurrection, the judgment, 
and the Kingdom of the Last Times. The treatment, 
however, is by no means thorough. Scarcely anywhere 
is there an attempt to arrange the scattered notices in 
an orderly way and bring them into relation with one 
another. It is taken for granted that they are incon 
sistent with one another, as a necessary consequence of 
the fantastic character of the material. That Paul may 
have had a clear plan of the events of the End in which 
all his statements can find a place, is not taken into 
account. These writers therefore set no limit to the 
admission of inconsistencies, and draw a picture which is, 
to put it plainly, meaningless. 

So far, it occurs to no one that the want of connexion 
may perhaps result from the fact that the separate 

1 Among the few scholars who stern the tide of conventional stupidity 
Frederick Spitta deserves a foremost place. In his printed works, no 
doubt those in question are Der zweite Brief des Petrus und der Brief 
des Judas (1885, 544 pp.) and the studies Zur Geschichte und Literatur 
des Urchristentums (vol. i. 1893 ; vol. ii. 1896) he is chiefly engaged in 
maintaining the general thesis that the earliest Christian literature shows 
much more dependence on the Late- Jewish than is generally ad 
mitted. A detailed proof of this kind for the Pauline letters has only 
been given in his exegetical lectures, which have not been published. 
The stimulus which he gave to others is clearly apparent in the literature 
of the nineties. Kabisch s study of the eschatology of Paul (1893) is 
partly based on the foundation which he had prepared. 



LIP-SERVICE TO ESCHATOLOGY 53 

statements have not been carefully examined in regard to 
what they actually mean, and to their mutual relations. 
It is taken as quite certain that the " simple " eschato- 
logy of i Thessalonians is superseded by the more com 
plicated view of the Corinthian letters ; and these in turn 
are not the last stage in this " development " of the 
Apostle s thought. No attempt is made to get a clear 
idea in what order he thinks of the judgment and the 
resurrection of the dead, or as to whether he holds 
that there is one resurrection and one judgment, or a 
resurrection of the " righteous," and another besides, 
and whether he assumes this to be accompanied by one 
judgment or two. 

The authors regard with a certain amount of self- 
satisfaction the way in which they have emphasised the 
importance given to the eschatology by Paul. In the 
chapter devoted to it they have certainly emphasised 
again and again, " with the utmost energy," the fact that 
he really " shared " the eschatological expectations of his 
time and admitted them to an important place in his 
creed. The chapter in question, however, only gets its 
turn after the whole " system of doctrine " has been 
safely housed in the earlier chapters without seeking any 
aid from the eschatology or even saying a word about it. 
As in the Church prayers of to-day, one catches an echo of 
it only at the end. This means that, when all is said and 
done, these writers regard it only as a kind of annexe to 
the main edifice of Pauline doctrine. That is a fact 
which their brave words about the importance attributed 
to it in their account do not alter in the slightest. 
None of these students of Paulinism asks himself whether 
there is an organic connexion between the eschatological 
expectations and the system as such, and whether the 
fundamental conceptions and concatenation of ideas 
are not somehow or other conditioned by the hope of the 
final consummation. It is simply taken as self-evident 
that eschatology can only form an incidental chapter in 
Paul s teaching. 



54 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

The most natural course to follow in the investigation 
would have been to begin with the eschatology as the 
most general and " primitive-Christian " element, and 
then to have tried to find a path leading from here to the 
central doctrine of the new life in union with the dying 
and resurrection of Christ. This course is nowhere 
followed. 

That is the more surprising as it is generally assumed 
that the " missionary preaching " of the Apostle took an 
almost purely eschatological form, and was scarcely 
distinguishable from the primitive-Christian preaching 
of repentance, the judgment, and the parousia. The point 
to examine would therefore have been precisely how the 
" Pauline theology " grew out of the eschatology which 
Paul shared with primitive Christianity. Instead of that, 
these writers begin with the " doctrinal system," and 
attach to that by way of appendix an account of the 
eschatology. It here first becomes fully apparent what 
a misfortune it was for Pauline study in the post-Baur 
period that it kept to the method of presentation under 
loci, and consequently accorded eschatology, in principle, 
no greater importance for Paulinism than it had had for 
Reformation theology. 

Bernard Weiss, agreeing in this with Havet, lays strong 
emphasis on the eschatology, and makes a beginning in 
the direction of an intelligent presentation of Paulinism. 
Instead of beginning, like the others, with the " doctrine 
of man," or with " sin and the law," he first sets forth 
" the earliest preaching of Paul as Apostle of the 
Gentiles," which he makes to consist of nothing but the 
proclamation of the judgment and the parousia. But 
having got this length, he does not feel any need to point 
out the paths which lead from here to the " teaching of 
the four great doctrinal and polemical epistles." He 
simply puts the two sections side by side, and even falls 
into the inconsistency of devoting another chapter to 
the eschatology at a later point. The doctrine of Paul 
consists therefore for these scholars of a theology of the 



THE PAULINE ANGELOLOGY 55 

present and a theology of the future which have no 
inner connexion with one another. It is indeed cited 
as an achievement on his part that he turned the eye of 
faith from the exclusive contemplation of the " hereafter " 
to take in the present also. How he came to do so 
he alone of this first Christian generation to point to 
present " blessings of salvation " in addition to those 
of the future, is not explained. The co-existence of the 
two is simply noted as a fact. 

How far the scholars of this period were from taking 
the Pauline eschatology seriously, is evident from the 
fact that they neglected to enquire into its connexion 
with that of Late Judaism. Otto Everling, who in 1888 
took in hand to give an account of one of its main features, 
its angelology and demonology, was not able to refer to 
any previous work in this department. 1 A theologian 
to whom he spoke of his design answered that " one ought 
not to examine the birth-marks of a genius like the 
Apostle." 

Everling brings forward the passages which speak of 
Satan, the angels, and the demons, one after another, and 
adduces parallels from Enoch, the Ascension of Isaiah, 
the Wisdom of Solomon, the Book of Jubilees, the Testa 
ments of the Twelve Patriarchs, and the Apocalypse of 
Baruch. His review of the material shows in what a 
step-motherly fashion it had been treated by previous 
commentators of all shades of opinion. 

In the result it appears that the Pauline statements r^v 
about angelology and demonology have not sprung from 
his own imagination, but all have their earlier analogues 
in the Late-Jewish theology, or at any rate can be under 
stood as inferences from the conceptions there laid down. 
It further appears that his statements stand in systematic 
connexion and mutually supplement one another. 

In its main lines the Pauline doctrine of the angels 
shows us the following picture. Spiritual beings who, in 
accordance with the hierarchic arrangement adopted in 

1 Die paulinische Angelologie und Damonologie, 1888, 126 pp. 



56 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

Late- Jewish theology, are divided into various classes, 
played a prominent part at the giving of the law. From 
that time forward they acted as overseers of the chosen 
people, and also as the real .powers behind the gods of the 
heathen. By the death and resurrection of Christ their 
power has been in principle abolished, although it con 
tinues to be still in some way exercised upon those who 
offer sacrifices to idols or submit themselves to the law. 

Believers in Christ, however, stand over against them 
as a class of men who are liberated from their sway, and 
who possess a wisdom which understands better than their 
own the great events in which the history of the world is 
about to close. 

These angelic existences feel that their domination is 
threatened, and fight with all the weapons at their com 
mand. It is at their instigation that the attempt is 
made to corrupt the Gospel by legalism ; all the diffi 
culties which the Apostle encounters, all the corporeal 
sufferings which he has to bear, are to be attributed to 
them. It is on their account that women must be veiled 
when attending the services of the Church, since otherwise 
they run the risk of becoming the victims of their lust, 
as of old their mother Eve was seduced by the devil. 
Most dangerous of all is their skill in deception : Satan 
can disguise himself as an angel of light. 

With the appearance of the Lord begins the decisive 
struggle which is to lead to the destruction of these 
powers. They are to be delivered up to judgment, to 
receive their sentence at the mouth of the saints, whom, 
until the parousia, they have still the power to harass 
with cunning and cruelty, though not to destroy. 

" In its proper historical surroundings Christianity 
shows up in its true majesty," said Richard Rothe once. 
Everling drew from these words, which he placed at the 
beginning of his book, courage to make a thorough in 
vestigation of matters which had previously been timidly 
avoided because of their strangeness. 

How wide-reaching was the significance of his synthetic 



ANGELOLOGY AND REDEMPTION 57 

study he had hardly realised. His intention was to 
depict clearly and in vivid colours the imposingly fantastic 
Late- Jewish background of Pauline theology. The theo 
logy of his time took the same view. It accepted the 
offered gift somewhat constrainedly, but on the whole 
gratefully enough. If it had the impression that the back 
ground as thus restored, while no doubt " interesting," 
was somewhat too glaring and obtrusive, it remained 
confident that the " doctrinal system " which it throws 
into relief is not otherwise affected by it. The appendix- 
chapter on eschatology grows in size and acquires a 
certain connectedness. But there seemed no reason to 
fear that it might grow so vigorously as to overpower 
those into which the Pauline theology proper is neatly 
parcelled out. 

In reality, however, there was quite sufficient reason 
for anxiety. Everling had shown that angelology and 
demonology were, as a matter of fact, component parts 
of Paul s cosmology. That they consequently also 
entered into his fundamental conception of . redemption 
was a point which he had not especially emphasised. 
But the fact was written in giant characters across his 
work. From the moment when Paul s statements re 
garding God, the devil, the angels, and the world are 
apprehended in their organic connexion, it becomes 
abundantly evident that for him redemption, in its 
primary and fundamental sense, consists in a deliverance 
from the powers which have their abode between heaven 
and earth. It is therefore essentially a future good, 
dependent on a cosmic event of universal scope. 

It at once becomes evident that the investigation of 
Paulinism must take as its starting-point these ideas as 
being of the most general character, and endeavour to 
show how the other statements regarding redemption 
are derived from them. Theological science was thus 
forced into the road which it had hitherto sedulously 
avoided. The deceptive character of the division of 
Paulinism under loci, by which it had long been kept in 



58 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

an unhappy state of subservience to Reformation and 
modern prejudices, now became apparent. But for all 
that theology held to the old way and was determined 
to cast out anyone who set foot upon the new. That is 
the explanation of the fate which befel Richard Kabisch s 
" Eschatology of Paul." l Kabisch had been considering 
the plan of a work on the Pauline Ethic, and in doing so 
had become aware that it was to a/large extent conditioned 
by the eschatological expectations. Thereupon he re 
solved to begin with a preliminary study of the 
eschatology. 2 

" Salvation," so runs his argument, is thought of by 
Paul as " deliverance " from judgment and destruction. 
"Justification" and "reconciliation" are subservient to 
this deliverance and do not describe a state of salvation 
independent of it. The spiritual goods which are char 
acterised by many theologians as the object of the 
Apostle s wrestling and striving are in reality only the 
anticipatory first-fruits of the blessedness which the future 
has in store. This blessedness consists in the believer s 
being freed at the parousia from the fleshly body in order 
to put on the heavenly robe of glory. Thus eschatology 
is the foundation both of the dogmatics and ethics of the 
Apostle. 

Life and death are for him physical conceptions. 
Spiritual death and spiritual life in the modern religious 
sense are unknown_to him. Even where, as in Rom. vi., 
he speaks of a dying and rising again which are not 
accompanied by any change in the outward and visible 
existence of the individual, he does not mean a spiritual 
dying and rising again but, inconceivable as it may 

1 Die Eschatologie des Paulus in ihren Zusammenhdngen mil dem 
Gesamtbegriff des Paulinismus ( ... in its relations with the general 
conception of Paulinism), 1893, 33$ pp. The work is dedicated to 
Friedrich Spitta. After a historical introduction, the principal passages 
which come into question are examined. After that the eschatology 
is developed according to its contents and motives, and in the process 
its relations with the various doctrines of the Pauline theology come 
up for discussion. 

* He did not, unfortunately, follow it up with the work on the Ethics. 



KABISCH ON PAUL S ESCHATOLOGY 59 

appear, a physical occurrence. Everything spiritual 
goes back to something corporeal. That is true also as 
regards the ethics. It is not from the consciousness of the 
^ideal possession of eternal life " that he infers the duty 
of walking in newness of life, but from the fact that one 
wEo shares the death of Christ must also share His 
resurrection. Both events have reference to the present. 
It is " a simple logical consequence " that we should walk 
in accordance with this physical newness of life in order 
to show that the fleshly, sarkic, body has been put off. 

The new life of which Paul speaks as a present spirit 
is therefore based on the " repetition " of Christ s bodily 
resurrection, which is rendered possible by the unio 
mystica with him. It guarantees to the individual his 
indestructibility even though the corruptible world, to 
which his fleshly corporeity belongs, falls a prey to de 
struction. The believer will then have a part in the new 
world-substance. 

Paul s soul is therefore thrilled with the eager desire 
for life, shaken with the dread of destruction. His faith, 
t hope, and fear all revolve about one centre the abolition 
of corruption and the bestowal of incorruption. His 
religion is a " will-to-live " in a large elemental sense. 
He yearns for redemption from the creaturehood which is 
under the sway of Satan and his powers, and from the 
body which they hold in thrall. The moment in which 
the relative positions of the world of spirits and the world 
of men are to be reversed, and a great final renewal of all 
things is to be brought in that moment cannot come 
quickly enough for him. Therefore he seeks in some way 
to antedate it. 

The future condition of existence is that of " glory." 
It is anticipated in the present life by the possession 
of the " Spirit " which belongs essentially to the heavenly 
light substance. 

Thus Kabisch endeavours to explain the Pauline 
doctrine of the Spirit purely on the ground of the Late- 
Jewish metaphysic. A super-earthly substance enters 



60 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

into the corporeity of those who in virtue of the unio 
mystica with Christ have entered into the experience of 
His death and resurrection. It produces in them a 
new being, and gives them a claim to the future perfected 
glory, and this while their fleshly existence still continues 
to the outward eye unaltered. 

The great paradoxes of Paulinism are here for the first 
time clearly pointed out and so described that their real 
eschatological essence appears. 1 But Kabisch did not 
succeed in explaining them. In what sense is a " re 
petition " in the believer of the dying and rising again of 
Christ possible ? How can it produce a reconstitution 
of their creaturely being while their fleshly existence 
continues outwardly as before ? To these questions 
Kabisch gives no answer. 

In the account of the eschatological events and their 
issue it is shown that the blessings and anticipations 
referred to by Paul are also present in the Late-Jewish 
theology. That the Apostle expresses his views about 
the future world in disconnected fragments, apparently 
distributed fortuitously through the text, does not show 
that it was not clear and consistent in his own mind, 
but exactly the opposite. - The eschatological remarks 
come in so naturally and without appearing to need 

1 The eschatological character of the Pauline mysticism is also 
pointed out by Paul Wernle in his suggestive study Der Christ und 
die Sunde bei Paulus (1897, 138 pp.), but he does not follow out the 
idea in all its consequences. 

A certain recognition of the " physical " character of the doctrine 
of "redemption is also arrived at by Adolf Deissmann. In his study, 
Die neutestamentliche Formel "in Christo Jesu" (1892, 136 pp.) he 
comes to the conviction that Paul had created the formula on the 
analogy of a linguistic usage already obtaining in non-biblical Greek, 
and intended in using it to indicate the relation to Christ as an existence 
within the pneumatic Christ which was to be locally conceived. He 
does not, however, think of explaining it from eschatology. 

The old psychologising and spiritualising methods are in no way 
departed from by W. Brandt. In his work, Die evangelische Geschichte 
und der Ur sprung des Christentums (" The Gospel History and the Origin 
of Christianity," 1893, 591 pp.; on Paul, pp. 515-524), he maintains 
that it was the visions of the disciples which first made Jesus into the 
Messiah. Paul, he thinks, " in his profound reflexion over his con 
version, came to think of this revolution in his life as a dying and rising 
again of his inner man." 



CRITICISM OF KABISCH 61 

explanation just because this whole set of conceptions 
was to the Apostle so long familiar and self-explanatory, 
that he can draw on it whenever he wishes as easily as an 
educated European uses the multiplication table. 

Strangely, however, Kabisch does not succeed in giving 
a clear and simple picture of the order and relation of 
the final events presupposed in the letters. He gets 
confused over the various resurrections and judgments, 
and finds the sole way of escape in attributing to the 
Apostle a resurrection of the righteous only, and not a 
general resurrection in addition. In consequence he is 
forced to the conclusion that the righteous enter the 
Kingdom without passing through a judgment, and that 
what is meant by the judgment is always the destruction 
of the wicked at the parousia. 

That is to make the Apostle contradict not only Jewish 
apocalyptic, but his own utterances, since it is certain 
that the Epistles frequently make mention of believers 
appearing at the judgment. 

The difficulties which Kabisch here encounters are 
significant. They show that it is not possible to under 
stand the Pauline statements simply by the light of the 
Late -Jewish eschatology. What for the Apostle com 
posed a simple picture remains for the writer who endea 
vours to describe his apocalyptic full of obscurities and 
contradictions. It is as if one or two conceptions were 
lacking which would have enabled him to " get out " 
his game of patience satisfactorily. 

It is true Kabisch has not done everything possible in 
order to attain clearness. He has neglected to adduce 
for comparison the eschatology of the Baptist and of 
Jesus, and to examine how far the Pauline simplification 
of apocalyptic is here prefigured. He thus falls into the 
universal but none trie less unintelligible error of failing 
to call the two most important witnesses to the Late- 
Jewish eschatological expectations. Are they the less 
so because they belong to the New Testament ? Further, 
he neglects, as do all the other writers, to consider what 



62 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

are the primary questions which the theory of the events 
of the End had to answer. 

What happens at the parousia to the non-elect ? 
And what to the elect who have not become believers 
because the Gospel message has not reached them ? The 
ultimate fate of these two classes of men can surely not 
be the same ? Do those who at the parousia do not enter 
into glory suffer " death " or " destruction " ? What is 
the relation between these two conceptions ? 

According to i Cor. xv. 26, death is only to be 
vanquished at the end of the Messianic kingdom. Is a 
general resurrection before that conceivable ? Does it 
follow as a consequence of this triumph over death ? 

Since Kabisch does not raise these and similar questions, 
he does not find the path which alone can lead to the 
understanding of the logic of the events of the End. 
Undoubtedly, in the eschatology of a thinker like Paul, 
all these problems must have been considered and thought 
out. They form the implicit presuppositions which 
guarantee and make clear the inner logic of his scattered 
and seemingly disconnected statements. 

Although he has not explained the paradoxes of the 
Pauline mysticism, nor succeeded in making clear the 
ground-plan of his eschatology, Kabisch s book is one of 
the most striking achievements, not only in the depart 
ment of Pauline study, but in historical theology as a 
whole. For the first time since Ludemann s investigation 
of the Apostle s doctrine of man, in 1872, the problem 
of the Pauline doctrine of redemption receives a new 
formulation. 

The two works show a curious analogy. Their authors 
have a consciousness of the fact that the theology of the 
Apostle is a living organism, and are preserved by some 
good genius from splitting it up into Reformation or 
modern loci. They endeavour to grasp the thoughts 
and connecting links of the doctrine of redemption from 
a single point of view. Ludemann makes the " an 
thropology " his starting-point, Kabisch the eschatology. 



KABISCH AND LUDEMANN COMPARED 63 

Both are led, almost contrary to their intention, to give 
a general account of Paulinism. Both see m_the para 
doxical statements about the abolition of the flesh in the 
union with the death and resurrection of Christ the centre 
of his doctrine ; both arrive at the result that what is in 
view is a really physical redemption. 

In the explanation of the facts which they agree in 
observing they diverge widely. Ludemann claims the 
JPauline doctrine of redemption as Hellenistic ; Kabisch 
endeavours to understand it on the basis of Late Judaism. 
Theological science cast out the innovator and held to 
the conviction that the Apostle s system of thought 
was Greek. It was acknowledged that he had made the 
eschatology of the Apostle intelligible ; but in the attempt 
to pass from the eschatology to the centre of the Apostle s 
system of doctrine, contemporary scholarship saw only 
an extreme onesidedness for which there was no justifica 
tion in the documents, which deserved neither examina 
tion nor refutation, but simply rejection. 

On what lines had theology developed and defended 
the theory of Greek elements in Paulinism ? In the 
first place, it is to be remarked that in regard to the extent 
and importance of the influence which is supposed to 
have been exercised, various groupings are to be observed 
among the different writers. Pfleiderer, Holsten, Hein- 
rici, 1 Havet, and others _see in Paulinism the actual first 
step in the Hellenisation of Christianity. They assume, 
as Baur also had taken for granted before them, that the 
ethical series of ideas, the series dominated by the anti 
thesis of flesh and spirit, is derived from Greek influences. 

Schmiedel, 2 in his commentaries, and Harnack 3 express 

1 Georg Heinrici, Auslegung der Korintherbriefe (r Cor., 1880, 574 pp. ; 
2 Cor., 1887, 606 pp.). 

2 P. W. Schmiedel, " Auslegung der Brief e an die Thessalonicher und 
Korinther," in Holtzmann s Handkommentar, vol. ii. section i. ; ist ed., 
1891 ; 2nd ed., 1892. 

:1 Dogmengeschichte, 3rd ed., 1894, vol. i. On Paul, pp. 83-95. 
Friedrich Loofs in his Dogmengeschichte (1890, 443 pp.) takes up no 
definite attitude towards the Pauline problem. Reinhold Seeberg, too 
(Dogmengeschichte, first half, 1895, 332 pp.), does not go into the 
doctrine of the Apostle. 



64 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

themselves with more reserve. According to the latter, 
Hellenism, no doubt, "had its share" in Paul. The Apostle 
of the Gentiles " prepared the way for the projection of the 
Gospel upon the Graeco-Roman world of thought," but 
he never gave to Greek ideas " any influence upon his 
doctrine of salvation." Lipsius, 1 Bernhard Weiss, and 
Weizsacker do not take much account of borrowings 
from Greek sources, but are concerned to explain Paul 
from and by himself so far as possible. 

It is not so easy as might be supposed to determine 
the attitude of the various authors towards the problem 
of the Hellenic influence in Paul. This is partly due to 
want of accuracy in the terminology. " Hellenistic " 
is used to mean both Jewish-Hellenistic and Greek 
in the strict sense. The authors frequently express 
themselves in such a way that it is not obvious whether 
they mean the one, or the other, or both together. At 
tempts to establish an accurate terminology, to confine 
" Hellenistic " to the meaning " Jewish - Hellenistic," 
and to use Hellenic for Greek in the full sense, have not 
succeeded. 

But the want of clearness is not wholly to be put down 
to the account of the language ; it is partly due to the 
mental attitude of the writers. The problem really 
includes two questions. First, Was Paul under the 
influence of Jewish Hellenism ? Secondly, Did Greek 
thought in itself, apart from the alliance into which it had 
entered with Judaism, exercise any influence upon his 
views ? Instead of keeping these questions separate 
these writers constantly confuse them, and assume that 
they have proved the existence of Greek ideas in the 

1 R. A. Lipsius, " Auslegung der Briefe an die Galater, Romer 
und Philipper," in Holtzmann s H andkommentar , vol. ii. section i. 
ist ed., 1891 ; 2nd ed., 1892. This commentator s position is in 
dicated by the following remarks : " The great antithesis between 
flesh and spirit gradually forces out the Jewish conceptions one after 
another, though it is not right to say that Hebrew ideas are driven 
out by Hellenic ones. When Paul goes outside the circle of Old Testa 
ment views he does so in consequence of a deeper ethical grasp of the 
originally Hebrew antithesis between flesh and spirit, not by a borrow 
ing of Greek ideas." 



GREEK INFLUENCE ASSUMED 65 

Apostle s system of doctrine when they have only dis 
cussed his relations with Jewish-Hellenism. 

Sometimes one actually gets the impression that in 
this difficult question they intentionally make their 
discussions a little obscure and inconsistent, and are more 
concerned to conceal than to reveal their views, in order 
not to lay themselves open to attack. 

The discovery and the grouping of their opinions is 
therefore associated with difficulties, and can never be 
carried out in a way entirely free from objection. For 
tunately the discussion and decision of the question does 
not depend on drawing them up in three divisions, each 
under the banner of its particular view, and so putting 
them through their facings. 

It suffices to note the fact that in the study of the 
subject from Baur onward the greatly predominating 
opinion is that Paul was not only influenced by Jewish 
Hellenism but also derived some of his ideas directly 
from Greek thought. It is also safe to assert that of all 
the writers in question even though some of them take 
up an attitude of reserve to Pfleiderer s more thorough 
going views, none of them denies the influence of Jewish 
Hellenism on Paul. The difference between them con 
sists rather in the fact that some assume in addition to 
this what may be called " free " Greek influence, while 
others are sceptical on this point and think that the facts 
can be explained without this assumption. 

It is to be expressly remarked that the latter do not 
try to arrive at an understanding of the essence of Paul s 
thought by a different method, but only to clothe the 
usual explanations in different words. This is the case 
with Weizsacker. 

The well-known account of Paulinism in his " Apostolic 
Age " l neither offers any new idea nor raises any new 
problem. Though he is in some respects more cautious 
than Pfleiderer, because he feels the difficulty of proving 
Greek influence more strongly than the latter, *in other 

1 Das apostolische Zeitalter, 1886, pp. 105-151. 

S 



66 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

respects he is less exacting than Pfleiderer with his logical 
development of Baur s ideas, since he is content with 
explanations which do not satisfy Pfleiderer. 

That Bernard Weiss in dealing with Pauline theology 
dispenses with the assumption of Greek influence is due 
to the fact that his investigation holds strictly to the lines 
of " Biblical theology," and on principle takes no account 
of anything beyond the borders of the Canon. 

It is interesting to note that both Weiss and Weiz- 
sacker deliberately avoid a discussion of Greek and 
Hellenistic influence on Paul, and confine themselves to 
an objective account of Paul s doctrine. Indeed, it may 
be remarked that in the study of the subject between 
Baur and Holtzmann the problem is never thoroughly 
discussed. 

The question how far the alleged influences are 
proved or provable may be held over for the present, 
and in the first place we may interrogate Holsten, 
Pfleiderer and their followers as to what their view 
really means, and what they think they can explain by 
means of it. 

At bottom the question turns on the antithesis of 
flesh and spirit. In the clearly defined form in which this 
antithesis presents itself in Paul, it is held that it must be 
regarded as Greek. This view had been expressed by 
Liidemann, who was the first to develop it clearly. In 
dependently of him, Holsten 1 and Pfleiderer brought it 
into general currency. 

It is universally taken for granted that the dualism 
is derived from Platonism. Whether Paul took it direct 
from Greek sources or from Jewish Hellenism is not 
clearly explained. Liidemann seems to assume the former, 
Holsten to imply the latter ; Pfleiderer is doubtless to be 
understood in the sense that both possibilities have to be 
taken into account, separately and in combination. 

The psychological process is differently conceived by 

1 It is most clearly developed by Holsten on pp. 37 and 38 of the 
second part of his Evangelium des Paulus, 1896. 



NATURE OF THE INFLUENCE 67 

Holsten and by Pfleiderer. The former holds that 
Greek ideas were already in his pre-Christian period 
present to the mind of the Apostle, who had been in touch 
with Jewish Hellenism, but they had as yet played no part 
in his thinking. By his religious experience at the vision 
of Christ on the Damascus road they were called into 
activity and helped him to give form to his new knowledge. 
In this way Holsten thinks it possible to understand 
Paulinism as both a personal creation of the Apostle and 
at the same time a product of the influence of Greek ideas. 
The emphasis lies, however, on the personal creation ; 
the influence of the Greek ideas is thought of as sub 
sidiary. 

For Pfleiderer the process was more largely determined 
from without. Paul s conversion creates as it were a 
void in his Jewish consciousness. The thought-forms 
which he has hitherto used prove incapable of dealing 
satisfactorily with the implications of his new faith. 
So Jthe Apostle is driven to have recourse to another 
system of ideas. He no longer remains indifferent to 
the ideas which stream in upon him from Jewish Hellen 
ism and Greek thought. They become significant to 
him ; he allows them to exercise their influence upon him. 
In this way there arises a remarkable duality in his 
thought. Pharisaic and Hellenistic trains of ideas form 
two streams " which in Paulinism meet in one bed with 
out really coalescing." By way of conjecture Pfleiderer 
several times advances the suggestion that Apollos the 
Alexandrian may have introduced the Apostle to the 
Alexandrian Platonism. 

... Heinrici, again, in his commentaries on the Corinthian 
Epistles suggests that the Apostle s doctrine is a syn 
thesis of elements taken on the one hand from the Jewish 
prophets and on the other from Greek thought. 1 Paul, 
he thinks, reached back beyond Late Judaism to join 
hands with the ancient prophetism, and similarly rose 

1 Vol. i., 1880 ; vol. ii., 1887. See especially the Introduction and 
the Epilogue to vol. ii. 



68 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

superior to Alexandrianism and drew direct from Greek 
thought. In both cases what he seeks is an ethical force. 
That he possessed the insight and the power to nnH this 
in the thought of the ancient world and to apply it to the 
formation of a Christian system of thought was a great 
spiritual achievement, pregnant with consequences for 
the future development of Christianity. 

One might have expected that these various views 
would be worked out in detail. That is not the case. 
In the last resort none of these writers gets beyond the 
general and simple assertion that the antithesis of flesh 
and spirit is Greek. But even this is not further explained 
by means of parallels from Greek literature. There is 
no attempt to show in what sense Paul s utterances 
become more intelligible in the light of these analogies 
than they are in themselves. 

" The Greek dualism," writes Holsten, " underlies 
all the decisive elements of his thought, and makes itself 
apparent in a series of individual traits." Any one 
who goes through his work in the expectation of finding 
evidence adduced in support of this statement will be 
disappointed. It is as though the author had forgotten 
as he went on writing what he had set out to do. 

It is also matter for astonishment that no serious 
attempt is made to extend the range of the Greek elements 
beyond the single antithesis of flesh and spirit. The 
suggestion is no doubt met with that the pessimism, 
the longing for death, and the ethical teaching of the 
Apostle, belong essentially to the tone of thought prevalent 
in the Hellenic world. But these remain mere obiter 
dicta which are not worked out in any way. 

It is as though these writers one and all had an in 
stinctive feeling that their thesis, so long as it is kept 
quite general, has an admirable air of credibility and 
admits of being nicely formulated, but that when any 
attempt is made to follow it out into detail it yields little 
in the way of tangible results. Paulinism is deceptive. 
Its outward appearance is such that the assertion that 







A DEFINITE POINT AT LAST 69 

here Greek influences have been at work seems the most 
self-evident possible, but when this has to be shown in 
detail it leaves the investigator whom it has drawn on 
by its specious appearance completely in the lurch. 

The curious thing is that Holsten, Pfleiderer, and their 
followers do not venture to formulate the unwelcome 
admission which may be read between their lines, but keep 
up the game with one another as if everything was going 
as well as heart could wish. They overdo their air of 
unconcern, as though from an uncomfortable sense that 
they might in the end lose confidence in their assertion, 
and so find themselves unable to explain how Paul 
arrived at his dualistic antithesis between flesh and spirit. 

For this is what it all ultimately comes to. The 
assertion of Greek influence is a kind of pillared portico 
behind which they construct the edifice of Paulinism 
as they understand it. The style, however, is only 
maintained as regards the front. What lies behind that is 
styleless, neither Greek nor Jewish, without plan, without 
character, without proportion. Those writers who wholly 
or partially dissent from the assumption of Greek in 
fluences carry out the same plan with the same materials, 
and with the same unconcern as regards the style. 
The only difference is that they do not conceal it by 
building a special facade in front of it, whether it be that, 
like Harnack, they have a fuller sense of the difficulties, 
or, like Weiss and Weizsacker, persuade themselves that 
Paulinism, according to their construction of it, looks 
sufficiently well as it is. 

There is, however, one point on which Pfleiderer and 
his followers think that they can point to definite results 
of the influence of Greek ideas. They maintain that the 
Apostle s eschatological expectations have been trans 
formed by them. This has reference to the passage in 
2 Cor. v. i ff. in which Paul gives expression to his 
desire not to be " unclothed " but to be " clothed upon." 
The natural interpretation which is given by Bernard 
Weiss and others understands the Apostle as speaking 



70 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

of his eager desire to experience the parousia while still 
alive in the body, in order to share that transformation 
in which " what is mortal will be swallowed up by life," 
and not to have to pass through a time of waiting in an 
intermediate state of non-being or death. 

Pfleiderer in his " Primitive Christianity " does not 
accept this explanation, but maintains that this passage 
and two others Phil. i. 21 f. and iii. 8 f. 1 imply a 
departure from the Pharisaic eschatological hope in 
which the Apostle s thought elsewhere moves. In this 
later period of his life, represented by 2 Corinthians and 
Philippians, he turns away so runs the theory from 
the primitive view of an intermediate state of death, 
followed by a subsequent resurrection, and comes to 
hold that his soul, immediately after his departure, will 
pass into the presence of Christ in order to dwell with 
Him. And Paul is more and more driven to adopt this 
view in proportion as his life is daily exposed to greater 
danger, and he has to reckon with the possibility of dying 
before the parousia takes place. Under the pressure of 
this inward anxiety, guided by Platonising Alexandrian- 
ism, illuminated by the Greek spirit, he creates we 
are still following Pfleiderer a spiritualising hope of 
future blessedness, which in the sequel becomes of the 
utmost value to Gentile Christianity by enabling it to 
reconcile itself to the delay of the parousia. 

1 In Phil. i. 21 f. the reference is to an inner struggle which the 
Apostle experiences. He desires to depart and be with Christ, which, 
indeed, would be much better, but he knows that to remain in the 
flesh is more needful for the sake of his churches. From this con 
viction he draws the confident conclusion that he will remain with 
them for their progress and joy in the faith. 

In Phil. iii. 8 he declares that he has counted all things but loss 
in order to win Christ and be found in Him, to know Him and the 
power of His resurrection and the fellowship of His sufferings, to be 
conformed unto His death, if so be that he might attain (?) to the 
resurrection of the dead. 

Both passages are certainly obscure, and do not to a literal inter 
pretation yield any satisfactory meaning. One feels that the logic 
of these close-packed assertions is not self-evident, but must somehow 
depend on presuppositions of which the basis is not here given. It 
cannot, however, be maintained that the assumption of a spiritualising 
hope regarding the future makes all clear. 



A HELLENISED ESCHATOLOGY ? 71 

Pfleiderer believes also that he can show the course of 
the development by which the new conception was 
arrived at. In i Thessalonians, he thinks, the Apostle 
still rested unquestioningly in that notion of a corporeal 
resurrection which primitive Christianity shared with 
Judaism. But in the explanations in I Cor. xv. the 
influence of the Greek ideas becomes observable, while 
in 2 Corinthians and Philippians it becomes dominant. 

This construction of the course of events is defended 
by Pfleiderer and his followers Holsten here stands 
apart with fanatical energy, as though they wished to 
make noise enough to distract attention from the fact 
that they have so very little else to point to in the shape 
of positive evidence of Greek influence in Paul. 

What are the difficulties which are raised by the 
assumption of Greek ideas in Paul s doctrine ? They 
are many and various, and they grow greater in pro 
portion as the new element in Paul is more strongly 
emphasised. Take the problem of explaining the dualism 
of flesh and spirit. It is assumed that this has been 
done when it has been declared to be Greek. But in 
doing so a duality has been introduced into Paul himself 
which creates many more difficulties than the dualism 
it was invoked to solve. 

The Apostle is made to think Judaically with one-half 
of his mind and Hellenically with the other, and never 
theless is supposed to be capable of being conceived as a 
single integral personality. In the writings of Liidemann 
and Holsten the difficulty does not yet appear hi its full 
magnitude. They understand by the Jewish element 
especially the juridical series of ideas referring to 
the atonement and imputed righteousness. Holsten is, 
moreover, in a specially favourable position, because in 
the last resort he ascribes the origin of the system not so 
much to the influence of Greek ideas as to the inward 
experience on the Damascus road, which of course eludes 
analysis. If they are thus referred exclusively to the 
separate but coexistent juridical and mystical sets of 




72 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

ideas, a Jewish and a Greek element can at need be 
thought of as in some way or other combined in a single 
consciousness. 

But for Pfleiderer the conception of the Jewish element 
has become much more comprehensive and vital, because 
he appreciates the significance of the eschatological ideas. 
The result of that is to make the opposition which has to 
be recognised much more acute. And, nevertheless, it 
must continue to be asserted that Paul was unconscious 
of the inconsistencies ! 

If the difficulty could be got over by pointing to an 
opposition of which the Apostle was conscious, and which 
he had made an effort to reconcile, the position of the 
theory would be much more favourable. But for that it 
would be a necessary condition that he should somewhere 
have expressed the consciousness that he bore two souls 
within his breast, 1 and that the marks of compromise 
should appear in his work as they do, for example, in 
that of Philo. That, however, is not the case. He is 
conscious of no opposition, and steps unconcernedly 
from the one world into the other, turns back again to 
the first, and keeps on doing this over and over again. 
Where, according to Pfleiderer s view, he is venturing a 
leap over the abyss, he has all the air of putting one foot 
calmly before the other on a level road. We must, 
therefore, take it to be the case that he had not the 
slightest inkling of the opposition. 

This conclusion seems to negate psychology and render 
a historical comprehension of the Apostle impossible, but 
Pfleiderer hardens his heart and boldly accepts it. There 
remains, he says, " no alternative but to admit that Paul 
kept the two different kinds of conceptions in his con 
sciousness side by side but unrelated, and jumped from 
one to the other without being aware of the opposition 
between them." 

There is, however, a further complication in the 

1 An allusion to the passage in Faust, " Zwei Seelen wohnen, ach, 
in meiner Brust." TRANSLATOR. 



" CREDO QUIA ABSURDUM " 73 

question. Pfleiderer holds that in 2nd Corinthians 
and Philippians a Greek spiritualising future-hope has 
displaced the Jewish Pharisaic hope. In the last period 
of his life, he maintains, the Apostle no longer believes 
in a corporeal resurrection, but in a presence of the soul 
with Christ which begins immediately after death. 

But the new conception does not in fact displace the 
old, although it is diametrically opposed to it. Pfleiderer 
has to admit that Paul, even in the writings of the latest 
period, advances without misgiving the doctrine of the 
" awakening of the whole man from the sleep of death," 
just as if the new doctrine of " the presence with the Lord 
beginning immediately after death " were not in existence, 
although it is the outcome of long years of mental struggle. 

Pfleiderer, however, is prepared to accept even this 
portentous fact also, and to go on contentedly believing 
that Paul lived in a kind of mental twilight which is at 
once Jewish-eschatological and Greek-spiritualistic. He 
expresses this euphemistically by speaking of the Pauline 
eschatology as " hovering between the Pharisaic hope 
of the here and the Greek hope of the hereafter." The 
way to a scientific understanding of Paulinism lies, 
therefore, for Pfleiderer through a credo quia absurdum. 

By his assertions about 2 Cor. v. i ff . he had brought 
the assumption of Hellenistic ideas in Paul into a dangerous 
position. Previously when a student of the subject 
had stated it to be his view that the sharp antithesis 
of flesh and spirit was Greek, there was no way in which 
this belief could be countered. If he was, further, 
convinced that the Apostle s brain was so organised that 
he could at the same time think consistently along two 
separate lines, Greek-spiritualistic and Jpwjgfc-Eschato- 
logical, without noticing their divergence and without ever 
mingling the two sets of ideas, a mind accustomed 
to work by the methods of historical criticism was 
similarly powerless against views arrived at as if by 
revelation. 

Pfleiderer, however, makes the mistake of referring 



74 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

to a matter of fact when he asserts that the Apostle s 
conception of a life after death became Hellenised. 
Thereupon controversy about the Greek element in Paul 
rages furiously over 2 Cor. v. I ff. it was only now that 
controversy had become possible. The simple wording 
of the passage is against Pfleiderer, for its subject 
is not the soul s being " at home with Christ," but the 
Apostle s longing for the parousia. Pfleiderer himself 
would never have arrived at his exposition had it not 
been for the laudable desire to produce at last some 
tangible example of the influence of Greek thought 
upon the Apostle s ideas. 

The point which Pfleiderer raised here was after all 
only a particular case in relation to the general question 
whether a Hellenistic influence is to be recognised in 
the Apostle s conceptions of the final state and the 
times of the End. It was in this wider aspect that 
Kabisch dealt with the problem in his work on the Pauline 
eschatology. His decision is in the negative. The much- 
discussed " development " of the views of I Thessalonians 
into those of I Corinthians xv., and of these again into 
those of 2 Corinthians and Philippians, is, he maintains, 
a delusion. The conception of the things of the End is 
a unity, and remains the same throughout. 

To oppose this view Teichmann entered the lists. 1 
In his over-confident zeal he plays the part of Polos in 
Plato s Gorgias. 

He goes much further than Pfleiderer, and seeks to 
show that Greek ideas actually superseded the whole 
Jewish Eschatology of Paul. In consequence of the 

1 Ernst Teichmann, Die paulinischen Vorstellungen von Auferstekung 
und Gerichtund ihre Beziehung zur judischen Apokalyptik (" The Pauline 
Conceptions of Resurrection and Judgment and their relation to Jewish 
Apocalyptic"), 1896, 125 pp. Akin to Teichmann s study is that of C. 
Bruston, " La Vie future d apres St Paul " in the Revue de Theologie et de 
Philosophic (Lausanne), 1894, pp. 506-530. The author maintains that 
Paul had never really held the conceptions connected with the resur 
rection of the dead at the parousia, but had always thought " spiritu 
ally " and assumed a passing into glory immediately after death. 
But while in his earlier writings he still used certain expressions borrowed 
from the " Rabbinic eschatology," later he quite abandoned these. 



A THOROUGHGOING THEORY 75 

influx of new thoughts one antinomy after another 
arises in the Apostle s conception of the things of the End. 
To trace out and exhibit these in detail is the goal of 
Teichmann s endeavour. 

He arrives at the following conclusions : In I Thes- 
salonians Paul still assumes that Christians will enter the 
kingdom of heaven with their earthly bodies. Not 
before I Corinthians xv. does he introduce the idea of a 
" transformation." He is then led to do so by the 
development of the Greek doctrine of flesh and spirit. 
In the second Epistle to the Corinthians he carries out 
this new conception to its logical issue. " The com 
promise which he had attempted in I Cor. is abandoned, 
and the result is that the conception of the resurrection 
of the dead is set aside." Along with the resurrection 
of the dead the Apostle also strikes out from his programme 
of the future the parousia. " For the expectation of 
the descent of Christ to earth he substitutes the entry 
of the believer into the heavenly world. A resurrection 
of the dead, a descent of Christ to earth, was now no 
longer necessary." 

Not only so, but the conception of the judgment is 
also abolished. In the first place, Paul draws this in 
ference " at least so far as Christians are concerned." 
That subsequently, in following out his ideas, " he should 
also arrive at the conception of universal blessedness, 
can in view of his universalism cause no surprise." " As 
all men were included in Christ at His resurrection, so all 
must receive the Spirit, they must all be made alive." 
The End does not, therefore, mean blessedness for some 
and destruction for others, but eternal life for all. But 
since eternal life depends on the possession of the Spirit, 
it must be assumed that those who are not believers at 
their death " come to faith in Christ in the period between 
the parousia and the delivery of all authority into the 
hands of God, and in consequence of this the Spirit is 
given to them." 

Teichmann professes to have demonstrated the Hellen- 



76 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

isation of the Pauline eschatology. What he actually 
shows is what it would have become if it had really 
undergone Greek influence. 

Not one of his "results "can be proved from the Apostle s 
letters. Where is there a single word to suggest that 
the Apostle abandoned the conception of the judgment 
and that of predestination to life or to damnation ? 
Where does he ever speak of universal blessedness ? 
Where does he hint at the possibility that mankind as a 
whole is to be converted to belief in Christ between the 
parousia and the delivery of all authority into the hands 
of God, and will thereupon receive the Spirit ? What 
grounds are there for supposing that he gives up the 
idea of the parousia as superfluous ? In his zeal to dis 
cover antinomies and trace developments, Teichmann 
forgets to take account of the most elementary facts. 
He asserts, for instance, that in I Thessalonians those who 
arise from the dead enter the kingdom of God in their 
earthly bodies. But from the Jewish Apocalyptic and 
from the teaching of Jesus it clearly appears that the 
resurrection included within itself a transformation of 
this creaturely corporeity into a glorified corporeity. It 
would not do for Teichmann to remember this. He is 
bound, even where he represents the Apostle as still 
wholly under the sway of Jewish conceptions, to bring 
him into an inconceivable opposition to these in order 
that the transformation which is taught in I Corinthians 
xv. entirely in accordance with Jewish eschatology 
may be represented as derived from the Greek doctrine 
of the Spirit. 

Without intending it, he thus supplies the most 
brilliant refutation of the theory of the Hellenisation 
of the Pauline eschatology. He engaged battle on ground 
on which Pfleiderer and his school had incautiously ven 
tured forth in the heat of action, and he has to find by 
experience that he is unable to make good a single position. 
A Hellenisation of the eschatology is quite impossible 
to prove. Kabisch turns out to have been right. The 



PAUL AS PLATONIST 77 

Apostle holds on this point too vigorous and too clear a 
language. 

But if that be so, the theory that the doctrine of flesh 
and spirit is Greek is itself most seriously imperilled. 
Teichmann felt, and therein he was more logical and 
consistent than the rest, that if there were any Hellenistic 
ideas in Paulinism they must necessarily have attacked 
and displaced the Jewish eschatology. Pfleiderer s view 
that the two could have subsisted side by side without 
except in the case of 2 Corinthians v. I ff. influencing 
and interpenetrating one another is an untenable theo 
retical hypothesis. From the whole range of the history 
of thought no analogy could be produced for this harmoni 
ous coexistence of two different worlds of thought. 

A further difficulty of the theory of the Hellenisation of 
Paulinism arises from the fact that the Apostle s views 
have to be more and more spiritualised in proportion 
as the Greek element is emphasised. Ludemann, over 
powered by the impression of the documents, had ex 
pressly characterised the doctrine of redemption which 
is bound up with the dualism of flesh and spirit as not 
ethical but physical. Holsten and Pfleiderer do not 
venture to follow him in that. The Platonism which 
they seek to discover in Paulinism cannot be brought into 
connexion with a physical doctrine of redemption, but is 
thought of as the antithesis of the " crude Jewish ideas." 
The whole of the mystical teaching about dying and 
rising again with Christ, about the new creature and the 
influence of the Spirit, has therefore to be spiritualised. 

This brings them into conflict with the natural, literal 
meaning of the Apostle s statements, in which the material 
istic character of his conceptions maintains itself against 
all the arts of exegesis. The interpretation given by 
Pfleiderer and his school deprives them of their original 
meaning to an even greater extent than the modern 
interpretation in general does. 

Most unfortunately for those who seek to spiritualise 
Paul, his doctrine of the Spirit in particular shows no 



78 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

trace of Greek influence. As though from an appre 
hension that they might be deprived of one of their most 
indispensable illusions, for thirty years after Baur the 
students of Paulinism had neglected to deal with this 
subject. At last in the year 1888 Gunkel undertook the 
task. 1 He investigates the influence of the Holy Spirit 
as conceived by the popular view of the Apostolic age, 
and according to the doctrine of the Apostle, and is 
obliged to come to the conclusion that a Greek element 
in the latter is not to be assumed. 

The Apostle, according to GunkeFs exposition, takes 
over the primitive Christian view and accepts it in all 
points. His own doctrine merely represents an elevation, 
a development of what he found already present. He 
introduces i Cor. xii.-xiv. an ethical judgment and 
valuation of spiritual gifts, which was new to the 
Christian community. While the latter had regarded 
" speaking with tongues " as the highest manifestation 
of supernatural power, he puts all the charismata on a 
lower footing than love. He gives a further develop 
ment to the primitive Christian doctrine by attributing 
to the influence of the Spirit a large number of the char 
acteristics of the Christian life which were not so regarded 
by the primitive community. Love, joy, peace, long- 
suffering, gentleness, kindness, faithfulness, meekness, 
chastity are, according to Gal. v. 22, fruits of His power. 
He generalises, therefore, in such a way that all Christian 
willing, feeling, knowledge, hope, and action proceed 
from the pneuma, which for the common view was only 
thought of in connexion with revelations and miracles. 

1 Hermann Gunkel, Die Wirkungen des Heiligen Geistes nach der 
popular en Anschauung der apostolischen Zeit und nach der Lehre des 
Apostels Paulus (" The Manifestations of the Holy Spirit according to 
the Popular View of the Apostolic Age and according to the Doctrine of 
the Apostle Paul"), 1888, no pp. Shortly before that appeared the 
purely biblico-theological treatment of it by Johannes Gloel, Der 
Heilige Geist in der Heilsverkundigung des Paulus (" The Holy Spirit in 
Paul s Preaching of Salvation"), 1888, 402 pp. It keeps entirely to 
description and does not enter into the question regarding the origin 
and innermost essence of the Pauline doctrine. Pfleiderer s view is, 
however, called in question. 



PAUL AND PRIMITIVE CHRISTIANITY 79 

There is a further point in which, according to Gunkel, 
Paul raises to a higher level the view which he took over. 
By the possession of the Spirit the primitive Church was 
made certain that the end of the present age was at hand 
and the new age was about to dawn. For the Apostle 
the temporal relation becomes an inner one. The Spirit 
is for him the^earnest of the coming kingdom of God. 
Already in the present he calls into being the future life 
in believers and gives them the certainty, and to some 
extent even the reality, of the life which is about to dawn 
for them. 

The Pauline doctrine of the Spirit is therefore simply 
a development of the primitive Christian doctrine. That 
it was so long regarded as Greek is due, according to 
Gunkel, to the fact that scholars never examined it as a 
whole, but always confined themselves to the discussion 
of the dualism of spirit and flesh. This prevents the 
relation of the doctrine to the views of the primitive 
community, and especially its relation to the doctrine of 
the future age, from becoming apparent. 

One very weighty theoretic objection to the admission 
of Greek elements in Paulinism is passed over by its 
defenders in complete silence. If the thoughts developed 
by the Apostle of the Gentiles had grown up upon the soil 
of Hellenism, the original apostles and those closely 
associated with them would certainly have been aware 
of this and attacked them on that ground. From the 
records, however, as we have them in the letters, it 
appears certain that they only reproached him with his 
attitude towards the law, and found no other point to 
object to in his teaching. The primitive Christian 
community at Jerusalem accused him of keeping back 
something from his churches ; it did not discover any 
thing new and essentially foreign in his thought. In 
spite of the keenness of the struggle, it was never 
made a charge against him that he had " heathenised " 
the Gospel. That shows how completely out of the 
question the assumption of Greek influences was for his 



80 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

opponents. But the fact that his contemporaries dis 
covered nothing of the kind in him forms a strong 
presumption against any such theory when brought 
forward in later times. 

The objection which arises from the side of the history 
of dogma tends to the same result. Those who hold the 
theory of Greek elements in Paul must, if they are to be 
consistent, assert that he pioneered a path for the Gospel 
into the Hellenic world and prepared the way for the 
early Greek theology. And they do so most emphatically. 
Pfleiderer explains l that the Greek Church - theology 
arose by the expulsion from Paulinism of its specifically 
Jewish elements, and by the free development of its 
" universally intelligible Hellenistic side." The noble 
Platonic idealism had a place in the doctrinal system 
of the Apostle of the Gentiles, " and conferred on it its 
capacity to win the Graeco-Roman world for Christianity." 
" The understanding of Paulinism is therefore a funda 
mental condition for the understanding of the Early 
Church." And all the adherents of the theory, whatever 
their precise shade of opinion, express themselves to the 
same effect. 

But the history of dogma holds a different language. 
It has to record the fact, inconceivable as it may appear, 
that on the generations in which Greek dogma was taking 
shape Paul exercised no influence whatever. Even 
the external literary influence is very slight. If one 
sets aside the Epistles to the Ephesians and Colossians 
it is not even possible to speak of a deutero-Pauline 
literature. The Pastoral Epistles and the second letter 
to the Thessalonians profess to be written by the Apostle, 
but contain not a single thought which is characteristic 
of his teaching. In the Epistle to the Hebrews, in 

1 Clement, in the Epistle of Barnabas, in the writings of 
Ignatius, in the works of Justin, expressions occur which 
show acquaintance with the Epistles of Paul, and may have 

1 Urchristentum, 1887. Similarly Heinrici in his commentary on 

2 Corinthians. 



PAUL AND EARLY GREEK DOGMA 81 

been influenced by him in respect to their wording ; but 
beyond that they show no trace of his conceptions or his 
spirit. 

The remarkable point, therefore, is that the post- 
Apostolic writers, though they are acquainted with the 
works of the Apostle of the Gentiles, make no real use of 
them. His ideas remain foreign, lifeless, so far as they 
are concerned. 

That is also shown by the fact that early Greek Church- 
theology is quite independent of him. It is concerned 
with the incarnation and resurrection of Christ and with 
regeneration ; Paul s speculations deal with the death 
and resurrection of the Lord, and he never speaks of 
regeneration. The underlying logic is in the two cases 
so different that the representatives of Greek theology, 
even if they wished to do so, could not appeal to the 
Apostle. No community of thought between him and 
Justin is to be discovered. . :" . 

Even Baur had to learn how little Greek theology 
attached itself to Paul, 1 although he wished to derive 
it from a compromise between the Pauline and the 
Petrine Gospel. So long as he is carrying out his theory 
on the lines of the history of the Church and its literature, 
the mistake does not become so apparent, because the 
universalism and freedom from the law which gradually 
establish themselves are set down as Graeco-Pauline. In 
treating the history of dogma, however, where he is 
dealing exclusively with the development of the Greek 
conception of the Person of Christ and of the redemption 
effected through Him, he can, as a matter of fact, make 
nothing of Paul. He hardly mentions him. 

What Baur was unwilling to acknowledge to himself, 
Harnack has irrefutably proved. 2 According to his 

1 F. C. Baur, Vorlesungen uber die christliche Dogmengeschichte (" Lec 
tures on the History of Dogma"), vol. i. From the apostolic period 
to the synod of Nicaea, 1865 (edited by Ferdinand Friedrich Baur). 

2 Dogmengeschichte, 1885, vol. i. ; 3rd ed., 1894 ; 4th ed., 1909. 
Wilhelm Karl, too, in his Beitrdge zum Verstdndnis der soteriologischen 
Erfahrungen und Spekulationen des Apostels Paulus (" Contributions to 
the Understanding of the Soteriological Experiences and Speculations 

6 



82 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

showing there is no bridge leading from the Pauline. 
Gospel to the doctrine of the Early Greek Church. The 
" history of dogma/ strange as it may appear, only 
begins after Paul. The forces which are there at work 
have not been set in motion by him. 

The same result is arrived at by Edwin Hatch in his 
work on Hellenism and Christianity. 1 A trained philo 
logical scholar possessing great knowledge of and insight 
into the late Greek and early Christian literatures, he 
endeavours to describe in detail the process by which 
Christianity became Hellenised. In doing so he does not 
find it necessary to deal with Paul. For the points of 
contact which he finds to exist between the two worlds no 
examples are to be discovered in the letters of the Apostle 
of the Gentiles. Hatch s observations lead him to make 
the process of Hellenisation only begin with the second 
century. 

The history of dogma cannot, therefore, accept the 
suggestion that Paul recast the Gospel in the moulds of 
Greek thought. The process began later, and of its own 
motion. It did not derive its impulse from a single 
great personality, but began gradually and on all sides. 
It was the Greek popular mind as represented by the 
members of the Gentile churches which Hellenised the 
Gospel for itself. Men like Ignatius and Justin bring this 
work to a provisional completeness by combining the 
current ideas into a primitive but in its own fashion 
impressively clear and living system, and creating a 
connexion between Christology, the conception of re 
demption and the doctrine of the sacraments ; the 

of the Apostle Paul," 1899, 116 pp.), does not feel obliged to have 
recourse to Greek thought in order to explain the Apostle s doctrine. He 
offers a thorough and independent analysis of the system which in many 
points is much superior to the ordinary view. 

1 Edwin Hatch, Hibbert Lectures on " The Influence of Greek 
Ideas and Usages upon the Christian Church." The work was trans 
lated into German by Erwin Preuschen in 1892. Its divisions are : 
(i.) Introductory, (ii.) Greek culture, (iii.) Greek and Christian Exegesis, 
(iv.) Rhetoric, (v.) Philosophy, (vi.) Ethics, (vii.-ix.) Theology, (x.) 
Mysteries, (xi.) Corpus doctrinae, (xii.) The Transformation of the 
basis of Christian Unity : Doctrine in the Place of Conduct. 



THE RITSCHL-HARNACK SOLUTION 83 

Fourth Evangelist carries this system of doctrine back 
into the preaching of the historic Jesus. These men 
received no kind of impulse from Paul. Of the work 
which he did they make no use. They know it, but it 
seems as if it were impossible for them to use it. 

The recognition of the true state of the case begins 
when one gets rid of the seemingly so natural but in 
reality unjustified assumption that the universalism x 
and freedom from the law for which Paul fought his 
battles, imply a Hellenisation of Christianity and form 
the Greek element in his doctrine. 

Ritschl and Harnack, in opposing this assumption of 
Baur and his successors, went to the other extreme. They 
maintained that universalism and freedom from the law 
were purely practical and separable views, which had, 
properly speaking, nothing to do with the fundamental 
ideas of the doctrine of redemption. In this way they 
succeeded, no doubt, in liberating the history of dogma 
from the prejudices of the Tubingen school ; but they did 
less justice to the Apostle s statements than those whom 
they were attacking, since on every page of his writings he 
implies an actual connexion between his doctrines and 
the practical views which he is defending. It is to be 
noted that Ritschl and Harnack never clearly explain why 
Paul holds a different view on these points from that of 
the primitive community. 

Truth here appears as the synthesis of a thesis and 
anti- thesis. Universalism and freedom from the law do 
in fact belong to the history of dogma, but not in the way 
Baur thought. And they are in themselves practical 
views, but at the same time they claim to be logically 
derived from the system of doctrine. The presupposi 
tions on which they are based have nothing to do with 
Greek thought ; it was purely by systematically thinking 
out to its conclusions the primitive Christian doctrine 
that Paul was led to his theories of the universal 

1 i.e. as used in this connexion, here and later, the belief in the 
universal destination of the Gospel, not in universal salvation. 



84 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

destination of the Gospel and of emancipation from the 
law. 

These are the facts as they lie clearly before us in the 
letters. But to register them is not to explain them. 
How, exactly, do these conclusions result from the logic 
of the primitive Christian belief as rightly worked out in 
the Apostle s mind ? That is the form which the question 
takes as the next stage, after Baur, Ritschl, and Harnack. 

The negative result that the Pauline attitude in regard 
to these points is not Greek is in any case established. 
And so too is the other result that the creators of Greek 
dogma did not take him as their starting-point, and 
cannot therefore have discovered anything Hellenic in 
him. They had no consciousness that he had already 
quarried and shaped the material which they needed for 
their edifice. 

But if they did not recognise in him one who had made 
a beginning in their direction, it is more than questionable 
whether modern historical criticism is right in professing 
to find Greek elements in him. If so, it must be supposed 
to have a better instinct for what is Hellenic than the men 
who Hellenised Christianity. 

In any case it has no right to talk at large about the 
significance of Paulinism for Greek Christianity, as 
though the history of dogma was not there to prove the 
contrary. 

How do the Debit and Credit of the theory 
stand at this point ? For the credit side, it claims 
that the dualism of flesh and spirit is of Greek origin, 
but it does not get beyond the general assertion. No 
serious attempt has been made to demonstrate the 
existence of Greek conceptions in the particular aspects 
of the doctrine, and to explain the pessimism, the desire 
for death, and the ethical teaching of the Apostle as 
derived from the non- Jewish world of thought. That the 
Pauline universalism and doctrine of freedom from the law 
are directly inspired by the Greek spirit it no longer has 
the right to assert. 



A DEBIT BALANCE 85 

In a single instance its defenders venture to point to the 
influence of Greek religious thought on the Apostle s 
views. They seek to show that his Jewish, eschato- 
logical conception of the future life and his view of the 
events of the End were in time entirely transformed by it, 
if not actually cancelled. But the attempt to prove this 
from the documents has not been successful. 

Meanwhile the following difficulties appear. The 
theory is obliged to assume a dualism between Jewish 
and Greek elements in Paul, and to assert that on 
the one hand he never allowed the two systems of 
thought to coalesce, while on the other he never became 
conscious of their disparity ; it has to attribute to him 
a capacity for combining contradictions, which allows him 
to maintain alongside of one another a spiritualistic 
doctrine of immortality and a crudely materialistic 
notion of resurrection without becoming aware of their 
incompatibility ; it is logically forced to the conclusion 
that he set aside the Jewish eschatology, with its concep 
tions of judgment and condemnation, in favour of a doctrine 
of universal blessedness, whereas there is in the Epistles 
not a single hint pointing in this direction ; it is forced, 
in order to make his statements appear " Platonic," so 
to spiritualise them that the natural sense of the words 
disappears ; it must ignore the proved fact that his 
doctrine of the spirit, when taken in its full compass 
and not confined to the antithesis of spirit and flesh, 
is most naturally explained as a mere development of the 
primitive Christian view ; it must meet the objection 
which it never can do that the original apostles never 
discovered anything of an essentially foreign, Greek 
character in Paul s views ; it must, when confronted 
with the history of dogma, bend itself with what grace 
it may to the admission that Paulinism exercised no 
influence upon the formation of early Greek theology, and 
cannot therefore have been felt by the men who were 
concerned in that process as itself representing a first 
stage in the Hellenisation of Christianity. 



86 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

The theory therefore explains nothing, but creates 
difficulty upon difficulty. 

In view of this relation of its assets to its liabilities 
it would have no alternative but to declare itself bankrupt, 
had it not astutely refrained from keeping any accounts. 

And so far we have considered the mere for and against. 
Even if the balance had here inclined in favour of 
the theory, that would not have proved anything. The 
ideas in question ought not to be considered as Greek 
until it had been shown that they actually were so. But 
this would require it to be shown that exactly correspond 
ing ideas were to be found in the preceding or contempor 
ary Greek literature, and that Paul betrayed some kind of 
acquaintance with this literature. The possibility that it 
was a mere case of analogy would have to be systematic 
ally excluded, so far as that is possible. 

But such a method of proof has never been seriously 
contemplated by the adherents of the theory. In going 
through their works one is astonished to see how lightly 
they have treated their task. They have never properly 
collected the material ; it is much if here and there a 
point is thoroughly considered. 

The assumption of Greek elements in Paulinism ap 
peared something so self-evident, and indeed, if one desired 
to arrive at any understanding of him, so necessary, 
that from the first it came forward with an assurance 
which secured credit for it everywhere without its need 
ing to produce adequate guarantees. 

When Liidemann in the year 1872 worked out clearly 
the dualism of flesh and spirit, he added, as a thing to be 
taken for granted, that it was Greek in character. His 
successors show a similar absence of misgiving. 

In order to bring the question once for all to an issue, 
let us gather up and put to the test, along with the poor 
fragments of attempted proof, every consideration that 
can be cited in favour of the assumption of Greek elements 
in Paulinism. 

The Apostle was born and grew up in Tarsus, the 



SOME GENERAL ARGUMENTS 87 

" Athens of Asia Minor " as Ernest Curtius has called 
it. 1 In his native city, as Heinrici expresses himself, 
" rhetoric and Stoic philosophy were to be met with in 
the market-place." 2 

No limits are set to the estimate of what the child of the 
Diaspora may have absorbed, retained, and laid up in his 
mind from the intellectual life by which he was surrounded. 

But just as large a place might be claimed for the 
contrary argument, which would lay stress upon the 
exclusiveness of strictly Jewish circles of the Diaspora in 
regard to the Greek culture by which they were 
surrounded. 

Neither argument proves anything. A thousand 
possibilities on the one side do not produce a certainty 
any more than on the other. 

The greater probability, however, is on the side of the 
assumption of exclusiveness. Although he lived in the 
middle of Hellenism, it is possible that Paul absorbed no 
more of it than a Catholic parish priest of the twentieth 
century does of the critical theology, and knew no more 
about it than an Evangelical pastor knows of theosophy. 

The decision lies solely with his works. 

The case is similar as regards the argument from his 
language. It is inconceivable, so writers like Heinrici 
and Curtius urge, that a language like Greek could be 
familiar to a man like Paul without causing a flood of 
ancient conceptions and ideas to stream in upon him. 
Heinrici, indeed, is prepared to decide the question on this 
ground alone, and concludes his exposition of the Corinthian 
Epistles with a close analysis of their vocabulary. This 
shows, he thinks, that Greek concepts and expressions 
far outweigh in number and importance the " specific 
ally Christian " and those which show the influence of 
the Old Testament or the language of the synagogue. 

1 Paulus in Athen. Collected Essays, vol. ii., 1894, pp. 527-543. 
In this essay the author seeks to exhibit with some fulness the view, 
which seems to him self-evident, that the Apostle was filled with the 
Hellenic spirit. 

2 Preface to his Exposition of 2 Corinthians, 1887. 



88 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

But in opposition to this, Schmiedel, 1 a not less thorough 
commentator, expresses himself as follows : " We must 
be on our guard against concluding too hastily from the 
predominantly Hellenistic character of Paul s language 
to a Hellenistic mode of thought. With a language of 
which one learns colloquially the current use, one does 
not by any means necessarily assimilate all the thought- 
forms of which it contains, so to speak, the geological 
record." 

Here too, therefore, one argument is balanced by 
another. 

A fact which seems to carry us a little further is the 
Apostle s exclusive use of the Greek version of the Old 
Testament. In a detailed study, of the year 1869, 
Kautzsch 2 showed that out of eighty-four quotations 
which occur in the Epistles thirty-four agree exactly 
with the Septuagint, thirty-six show small deviations, 
and ten depart from it more widely. Two others show a 
considerable difference, without, however, throwing doubt 
upon the author s acquaintance with the wording of the 
ordinary translation ; two others, again, from Job, differ 
from it entirely. 

This investigation was carried further by Hans 
Vollmer 3 and brought to a provisional conclusion. 
According to him the deviations are to be explained by 
the fact that Paul did not use a single complete recension 
of the LXX, but had recourse to different editions for 
different books. In Job he had before him a version 
which shows affinity with the later Jewish translations. 
To explain the remaining peculiarities Vollmer brings 
forward a hypothesis. He is inclined to assume that the 
Apostle used Greek Scriptural anthologies in which 

1 Holtzmann s Handkommentar, 2nd ed. The Epistles to the 
Corinthians, p. 92. 

2 Emil Friedrich Kautzsch, De veteris Testamenti locis a Paulo 
Apostolo allegatis, 1869, no pp. 

3 Hans Vollmer, Die alttestamentlichen Zitate bei Paulus . . . nebst 
einem Anhang tiber das Verhdltnis des Apostels zu Philo, 1895, 103 pp. 
("The Old Testament quotations in Paul . . . with an Appendix on 
the Apostle s relation to Philo "). 



USE OF GREEK VERSIONS 89 

separate passages were collocated, or freely combined with 
one another. In such collections their existence is not 
demonstrable various versions were, he thinks, used 
promiscuously. Perhaps the passage quoted as Scripture 
in i Corinthians ii. 9, which is not traceable in the Old 
Testament, " As it is written, what eye hath not seen, 
nor ear heard, neither hath it entered into the heart of 
man, hath God prepared for them that love Him " may 
be derived from an anthology of this kind. 

It is in any case certain that the Apostle always makes 
use of Greek translations ; and it is further certain that 
he argues from peculiarities in their wording which for 
one who knew Hebrew, as he also certainly did, must have 
been recognisable as mistranslations. He therefore goes 
so far as to ignore the original. 

Nevertheless these facts do not warrant us in drawing 
conclusions of a too far-reaching character. If he wrote 
in Greek at all he could not do otherwise than use the 
Greek translations which were familiar to him, and in the 
synagogues of the Diaspora were regarded as " authentic," 
as the Vulgate is for the Latin Church according to the 
decrees of the Council of Trent. That being so, it was 
out of the question for him, in making quotations, to 
introduce renderings of his own from the original. 

In all historical cases of theological bilingualism 
the same fact is to be observed. Scripture is never 
"personally" translated, but always cited in accordance 
with a recognised version. 1 

That Paul should turn to account the mistakes of the 
version need not, in view of his exegetical principles, 
cause us any surprise. Whether he forces his thought 

1 The author has had occasion to observe this in Alsatian theo 
logians and in himself. One who is equally familiar with French and 
German will never, either in preaching or in conversation, give his own 
version of Biblical passages, but will without exception keep to the 
traditional form in the language which he is using, and this even 
where he would be capable of giving a more exact rendering. And 
in preaching he will turn to account the peculiarities of the wording 
of the version, if it lends itself to his thought, and will even perhaps 
use an argument which goes against the sense of the original, which 
he is supposed to be acquainted with exactly as Paul does. 



go FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

directly upon the original, or gets it expressed by the 
Greek version, comes to much the same thing. The fact 
that he adopts the errors of the LXX and finds his account 
in them does not make him a Greek. It only shows that 
he belongs to the Jewish Diaspora. But does this imply 
that he has his place in the Jewish-Hellenistic movement ? 

This assumption is often taken as so self-evident that 
any examination of it appears superfluous. The de 
fenders of the theory of Greek influence in Paul, therefore, 
feel themselves dispensed from this duty and act accord 
ingly. 

Even those who, like Harnack, do not admit a more far- 
reaching direct influence of Greek ideas upon the Apostle, 
do not feel any doubt about his relations with Jewish 
Hellenism. 

But the sceptics of the self-evident, with whom science 
can never dispense, must dare to be tactless enough to 
put the question here also, " What is really proved ? " 
As we have to do with a characteristic literature which 
lies before us with some measure of completeness, the 
verdict cannot be difficult to arrive at. 

Pfleiderer and his followers had all along asserted that 
Paul in his eschatology and anthropology showed de 
pendence on the Wisdom of Solomon, which doubtless 
dates from the first century before Christ. Others 
denied this. In an essay which appeared in 1892, Grafe 
sought to sift the material and decide the question. 1 

As " crucial " instances for the relationship he thinks 
the following may safely be taken : Romans ix. shows 
affinity with Wisdom xii. and xv. in regard to what 
is said of the Divine omnipotence and mercy ; in their 
references to heathen idolatry the two authors coincide 
in a remarkable way ; the views regarding the relationship 
of body and soul which are implied in 2 Cor. v. I ff. find 
a parallel in Wisd. ix. 15, where there is a reference to 

1 Eduard Grafe, Das Verhdltnis der paulinischen Schriften zur 
Sapientia Salamonis (" The Relation of the Pauline Writings to the 
Book of Wisdom"), in the Theological Essays dedicated to Carl von 
Weizsacker on his seventieth birthday, 1892, pp. 251-286. 



KNOWLEDGE OF HELLENISTIC LITERATURE 91 

the earthly tabernacle which weighs down the thinking 
soul. The facts do not, according to Grafe, justify the con 
clusion that Paul is dependent on the pseudo-Salamonian 
Book of Wisdom, but he does regard it as having been 
made highly probable that the Apostle knew and had 
read the book. 

It is not a clear " yes " that one hears in Grafe s essay. 
When it is quoted, however, by writers on Paulinism 
it gets a push towards the positive side which makes it 
say exactly what Grafe did not venture to assert. 

Scarcely more productive is Vollmer s cast of his net 
into the works of Philo. 1 He thinks that, in view of the 
affinities pointed out by him, " the acquaintance of the 
Apostle with the works of the Alexandrian writer will 
have become less improbable to others besides himself." 

But that is not the point at all. That Paul, a scholar 
of the Diaspora, would have been aware of the existence 
of so important a work as the Wisdom of Solomon, and 
would not have been wholly ignorant of its contents, is 
really self-evident. And is it likely that none of the 
writings of his older Alexandrian contemporary Philo 
died probably about the beginning of the forties would 
have come to his knowledge ? On the contrary, the most 
probable assumption is that he was acquainted with the 
whole of the earlier and later Hellenistic literature. 
Whether this can be more or less clearly proved by certain 
real or supposed parallels does not really matter. 

The important point is that he does not use the ideas 
which are here offered to him. Jewish-Hellenistic 
theology is so characteristic a product that it can never 

1 Vber das Verhdltnis des Apostels zu Philo, an appendix to his 
work on Die alttestamentlichen Zitate bei Paulus, 1895, pp. 80-98. 
See also Carl Siegfried, Philo von Alexandria als Ausleger des alien 
Testaments an sich selbst und nach seinem geschichtlichen Einfluss 
betrachtet (" Philo of Alexandria as an Expositor of Scripture, con 
sidered both in Himself and in Regard to his Historical Influence"), 1875, 
418 pp. In pp. 304-10 thoughts and passages are cited from Paul 
which are supposed to show affinity with Philo. The resemblance is, 
however, so general and colourless that it cannot be considered as 
proving anything. The author quotes the passages without drawing 
any conclusion. 



92 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

be overlooked even where it is only a subsidiary element. 
But in Paul no trace of it can be shown. Its problems, 
its speculations regarding the Logos, Spirit, and Wisdom, 
its ethics, do not interest him ; he makes no use of its 
theories. On the other hand he is concerned with escha- 
tology and with the person of the Messiah, which for it 
seem to have no existence. 

The characteristic mark of Jewish Hellenism is that 
it brings the different ideas into an external juxtaposition 
without effecting their interpenetration. Whether it is a 
question of philosophical or other writings, of problems of 
ethics, or of the doctrine of God and the Divine administra 
tion of the world, the Greek element always shows up 
plainly in contrast with the Jewish, and can be clearly 
recognised as Platonic or Stoic. It is a case of mosaic 
work, better or worse executed as the case may be. 

Any one who proposes to show that Paul was in 
fluenced by Jewish Hellenism ought, therefore, to begin 
by recognising that the union of the two worlds of thought 
which is supposed to have taken place in him is of an 
entirely different order from that found in other cases, 
inasmuch as a real synthesis is effected, and the problems 
involved are such as do not elsewhere occupy Jewish 
Hellenism, while on the other hand those which interest 
it are here left out of account. How much is left then 
by way of a common element ? 

Paul s attitude towards Jewish Hellenism is one of 
indifference. From his letters, written as they are in- 
Greek, we should never learn that in his time there existed 
a literature in which the old Jewish theology, using the 
universal language of the period, entered into discussion 
with Greek philosophy and religious thought, and formed 
an external combination with them. 

All the proofs which are offered of his acquaintance 
with this literature only serve to render more unintelligible 
the fact that he is not in the slightest degree influenced 
by it. 

The phrase-making by which theologians of the post- 



NO HELLENIST IN DOCTRINE 93 

Baur period disposed of Paul s independence in regard to 
Jewish Hellenism so far as they became aware of it- 
is quite inept. Heinrici, as we have seen, maintained 
that he had risen superior to Alexandrianism. 

It is to be remarked that the theoretic question whether 
he was never influenced by this movement, or whether the 
influence only ceased when he became a Christian, must 
remain open. In the latter case he must have put off 
along with what was specifically Jewish also what was 
Jewish-Hellenistic. It would then belong to the things 
which, according to Philippians, were formerly gain to 
him, but which now he counted dross, and had cast aside 
in order to gain Christ. 

This latter view is inherently possible if one is prepared 
to take literally what the Apostle says about that radical 
breach with the past to which we can apply no standard 
of measurement, and which we are unable to conceive. 
But the other alternative that he had never been 
influenced by it is the more probable. 

Practically both come to much the same thing. We 
know only the Christian Paul, and we find it to be a fact 
that in his letters no specifically Jewish-Hellenistic 
conceptions are to be found. 

The " self-evident " is therefore once more negated 
by the facts. 

We may call attention to a curious parallel. A priori 
the assumption might appear justified that the Apostle 
of the Gentiles would have taken from Jewish Hellenism 
material wherewith to Hellenise Christianity. In reality 
he did not do so. A priori it was to be expected that the 
creators of Greek theology would have taken from Paulin- 
ism material for the construction of their doctrines. In 
reality they did not do so. The three points which it 
seemed would allow themselves to be joined to form a 
triangle, lie, in reality, in different planes, belong to 
different systems, and have no natural relation to one 
another. 

If Paul stands solitary, without receiving or exercising 



94 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

influence, between these two factors in which Greek 
characteristics are manifest, it follows that he does not 
exhibit their common element. If he did not adopt 
Platonism and Stoicism in the convenient compound 
which Jewish Hellenism had mixed ready for him, it is 
antecedently little probable that he made use of the 
uncompounded substances in the form in which they are 
to be met with in Greek life and literature. 

What are the possibilities of direct influences which 
have to be taken into account ? 

It is to be remarked that Paul never gives the slightest 
hint that he is making use of something which is familiar 
to and valued by the Greeks in his churches. The Acts 
of the Apostles indeed pictures him as a preacher who in 
the Areopagus at Athens takes as his starting-point an 
inscription upon an altar, and quotes from the Greek 
poet Aratus the pantheistic saying that men are of the 
Divine race (Acts xvii. 28). But for this Paul, the author 
of Acts, must take all responsibility. 1 

The Apostle of the Gentiles who is made known to us 
by the Epistles wears a different aspect. In this sense he 
never became a Greek to the Greeks. We find in him no 
trace of any high estimation of heathenism and its thought. 
It is for him idolatry, nothing less nor more. His estimate 
is purely negative. 

He can therefore hardly have intentionally taken over 
anything from Greek thought. It is possible, however, 
that he did so unconsciously. 

The most obvious suggestion is to assume that this was 
the case in regard to ethics. What he says in Rom. ii. 
about conscience, which in the heathen takes the place of 
the law, might be based on ideas derived from Greek 
rationalism. But on close examination what we find here 
is not so much a positive valuation of natural ethical 
feeling, but rather the creation for dialectic purposes of 
something to serve as an analogue to the law. Paul s 

1 Ernst Curtius in the essay cited above defends the historicity of 
Acts xvii. 



OR IN ETHICS 95 

purpose is to prove that Jew and Greek are alike delivered 
over to sin ; consequently the position in the two cases, 
if an injustice on the part of God is not to be suggested, 
must be made as similar as possible. 

The assumption of Greek ideas here is rendered im 
probable by the fact that Paul s ethic as a whole is not 
to be explained as Hellenic. Neither Gass nor Ziegler 
in their works on the history of Christian ethics have 
ventured any attempt in this direction. 1 In general the 
Pauline ethic has been little treated by the students of 
Paulinism of the post-Baur period. The only monograph 
dedicated to the subject took a form that was purely 
biblico-theological and without interest. 2 It is interest 
ing to note that Kabisch, when he planned to work up 
the ethical material, found it necessary first to deal with 
the eschatology. That does not suggest the presence of 
Hellenic influences. 

It has also been maintained with a certain confidence 
that the pessimism of the Apostle is Greek, because it 
recalls the view of the world which we find in the writings 
of Seneca and Epictetus. 

Seneca was his contemporary. That the Apostle 
knew the works of this writer is not held by any one to be 
proved. 3 Epictetus worked at the end of the first century, 

1 W. Gass, Geschichte der christlichen Ethik, 1881, vol. i. 457 pp. 
On Paul, pp. 34-38. Theobald Ziegler, Geschichte der christlichen 
Ethik, 1886, 593 pp. On Paul, pp. 72-90. 

2 Fr. Th. L. Ernesti, Die Ethik des Apostels Paulus, 1868, 155 pp. ; 
3rd ed., 1880. 

3 The Christian character of Seneca s thought was remarked as 
early as Tertullian, who in de Anima, xx., when he quotes a phrase 
from him, describes him as " saepe noster." Augustine and Jerome 
know of a correspondence between Seneca and the Apostle. From 
the literature we may mention the following works : Amedee Fleury, 
Saint Paul et Seneque. Recherches sur les rapports du philosophe avec 
I apdtre et sur I infiltration du Christianisme naissant a travers le 
paganisme, 2 vols., 1853, 404 and 383 pp. Seneca is supposed to have 
drawn on Paul. At the end of the second part the correspondence 
between them is printed. The work is uncritical in character. 
Johann Kreyher, L. Annaeus Seneca und seine Beziehungen zur Urchris- 
tentum ( . . . and his relations with early Christianity), 1887, 198 pp. 
Seneca is supposed to have had some relations with Christianity in 
Rome even before the Apostle s coming, and thenceforward to have 
entered into a close relationship with him. Charles Aubertin, Etude 



96 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

was himself acquainted with Christianity, and was 
doubtless influenced by it, even if unconsciously. 1 

All that could come into question, even as a possibility, 
is that the Apostle might have adopted the same generally 
current ideas of his period which are expressed by these 
two writers. 

The expressions which are quoted as parallel have 
only an external resemblance. They are not really 
analogous. The roots from which the pessimism springs 
are entirely different in the two cases. 

In the philosophers it is purely a result of reflection on 
the conditions of the present life. Existence appears 
to Seneca a burden which one may at any time cast off 
by suicide. For Paul the present world is evil because it is 
sinful, lies under the dominion of the angel powers, and is 
subject to corruption. He judges it, not in itself, but with 
reference to a new and perfect world which is soon to 
appear. The idea of suicide does not enter into his 
thoughts, indeed he dreads that he might be released from 
the present earthly existence before the parousia occurs. 

Seneca s religion is resignation, Paul s is enthusiasm. 
The two may show verbal similarities, but no affinity of 
thought exists between them. 

Further, the anthropology and psychology 2 of the 
Apostle are claimed as Greek. Pfleiderer lays great stress 
upon this point. He does not, however, offer any proofs. 

What Paul has to say about man rests in the first place 

critique sur les rapports supposes entre Seneque et St Paul, 1857, 442 pp. 
All connexion between Seneca and Christianity is denied. In the 
work of Michael Baumgarten, Lucius Annaeus Seneca und das Christen- 
tum (1895, 368 pp.) no connexion between Seneca and Paul is admitted. 

1 See Theodor Zahn, Der Stoiker Epiktet und sein Verhdltnis zum 
Christentum. A Rectorial address at Erlangen, 1894, 27 pp. The 
lecture offers proof that in spite of many resemblances of expression 
and in spite of his acquaintance with Christianity, the teaching of 
Epictetus contains nothing which really connects it with the new 
religion. 

Inconceivable as it may appear, even the Meditations of Marcus 
Aurelius of the second half of the second century have been some 
times cited to prove the Greek character of Paul s religious thought. 

2 Theodor Simon, Die Psychologic des Apostels Paulus, 1897, u8pp. 
A leisurely analysis of the material. 



I 

CONTRAST WITH PLATONISM 97 

on ordinary observation and is of a self-evident character. 
The special features of his view which go beyond this 
are to be explained from eschatology and not from Greek 
thought. Anthropology and psychology, in the develop 
ment which he gives them, have reference not to the 
natural man but to the redeemed man, who is risen with 
Christ, endowed with the Spirit, and already living in a 
supernatural condition. His conception of the natural 
condition of man is determined by reference to its actual 
abolition, and therefore has quite a different orientation 
from that of the Greek thinkers. 

How do matters stand in regard to the assertion that 
his system contains Platonic elements ? 

What comes into question is not Platpj^rn_proper, but 
the religious modification and popularisation of it which 
later on, in the third century, came to completion in 
Neo-Platonism." What this philosophy has in common 
with Paul is the general desire for deliverance from 
corporeity. When it is more closely considered, however, 
characteristic differences appear. 

Platonism as a religion has to do with the deliverance 
of the soul from its imprisonment in the body, Paul 
looks for the deliverance of the whole human personality. 
In the one case the antithesis is between soul and body, 
in the other between the supernatural body and the 
corruptible flesh. Platonic religious feeling desires re 
lease from all corporeity, what Paul hopes for is a different 
kind of materiality. He believes in a resurrection, 
Platonism in mere immortality. For him the fate of the 
individual is so bound up with cosmical, eschatological 
events that the new state of existence can only result 
from a cosmical revolution. Platonism knows nothing 
of a temporally conditioned redemption of this kind, but 
represents it as coming to pass immediately after death. 

The materialism which is implicate in eschatology thus 
opposes a barrier to the Platonising of Paul s religious 
thought. 

For his conception of spirit a parallel might be sought 

7 



98 FROM BAUR TO HOLTZMANN 

in Stoicism, which teaches that a spiritual substance 
proceeding from God permeates the universe, including 
corporeal organisms, and manifests itself in man as the 
rational soul. Common to this philosophy _&nd. io- Paul 
is the material conception of spirit. But the differences 
which it exhibits are of such a kind that there can be 
no question of the Apostle s dependence upon it. In 
the Stoic philosophy the spirit is identical with the 
rational soul ; in Paul it is introduced as something new 
alongside of the latter, and ends by displacing it. 

According to the philosophic conception it is active 
in the world from all eternity ; according to the doctrine 
of the Apostle it first appears in the times of the End, and 
is only bestowed upon a limited section of mankind. 
The one view is a pantheistic monism, the other is a 
theistic dualism. 

The Book of Wisdom and Philo are Stoic in their mode 
of thought, but Paul is not so. 

It is inconceivable how the Stoic heimarmene can have 
been brought into connexion with the Pauline doctrine 
of predestination. 

The philosophic conception of fate thinks of the world- 
process as an unbroken chain of cause and effect in which 
also the actions of living beings have their place. Pauline 
foreordination is a pure will-act of God, non-rational and 
non-moral, and has to do with the ultimate issues of 
existence, not with the vicissitudes of life. To see a 
connexion between the two doctrines of predestination 
is as unjustifiable as it would be to identify the cosmic 
conflagration of the Pauline eschatology with that of 
the Stoic theory. 

Paulinism has, in general, a different spirit from that 
of the Stoa. Its author is moved by the fear of death 
and corruption and yearns for a new being. To the Stoic 
such ideas are, as " passion," contemptible. He reckons 
as you may read in Marcus Aurelius with the present 
world as the only one there is, and with the present life 
as the only one which he has to live. 



PROBLEM OF PAUL S MYSTICISM 99 

Whatever views and conceptions are brought up for 
comparison, the result is always the same that Paulmisrn 
and Greek thought have nothing, absolutely nothing, in 
common. Their relation is not even one of indifference, 
they stand opposed to one another. Had the Apostle been 
influenced by Hellenism in any shape or form, he could 
never have conceived his system in the way he did. 

Nevertheless it is possible to understand how theology 
came to class his doctrine as Greek. The mysticism 
which enters into it bears a certain analogy to that which 
springs from Greek religious thought and feeling. Since 
Judaism, itself guileless of any mysticism, produced 
nothing of the kind, could not create out of itself 
anything of the kind, the only possible alternative seemed 
to be to explain it as due to Greek influences, and to explain 
the essential character of Paulinism in accordance with 
this hypothesis. 

But this road leads to an impasse. In this way it is 
possible only to misinterpret the mysticism of the Apostle, 
not to understand it. Critical theology is confronted 
with the at first apparently inexplicable fact that there 
has arisen on Jewish-Christian soil a system of thought 
which externally has all the air of being a twin formation 
.to that of Greek religious mysticism, but inwardly has 
nothing whatever to do with it. 

The actual result of the study of Paulinism in the post- 
Baur period is therefore wholly negative, and it must 
become evident that it is so the moment any one attempts 
to substitute references and proofs for mere assertions. 
This the scholars of that period avoided doing ; they were 
prevented from making the attempt by the scientific 
instinct of self-preservation. 



IV 

H. J. HOLTZMANN 

Heinrich Julius Holtzmann. Lehrbuch der Neutestamentlichen 
Theologie. 1897. Vol. ii., 532 pp. On Paulinism, 1-225. 

William Wrede. t)ber Aufgabe und Methode der sogenannten Neu 
testamentlichen. Theologie. (1897.) (On the Task and the Method 
of the so-called New Testament Theology.) 

HOLTZMANN S " New Testament Theology " was eagerly 
awaited on all sides. It was hoped that it would bring 
about a clearing of ideas such as had been produced in 
regard to questions of criticism by his " Introduction." 

In the new work the author follows the method which 
seemed to him to have proved its usefulness in the former 
work. He lets every writer who has dealt with the 
subject have his say at the appropriate place, even 
though he runs the risk of not making his own opinion 
distinctly heard amid the strife of tongues. 1 

While in the " Introduction " the advantages of the 
method predominate, in the "Theology" its disadvantages 
are conspicuous. The former work dealt with a series of 
questions which are already formulated and can be 
answered with a clear yes or no. There is therefore some 
sense in taking the suffrages of the writers, living and 
dead. It leads up to a verdict which in a certain sense 

1 In connexion with the following remarks on questions of principle, 
see also W. Wrede, Uber Aufgabe und Methode der sogenannten Neu 
testamentlichen Theologie, 1897, 80 pp. 

The essay discusses the plan and arrangement of Holtzmann s 
work. On p. 32 Wrede remarks: "The treatment is far too much 
influenced by the desire to include all kinds of opinions from other 
writers. To a large extent my objections have to do with these 
methodological questions." 



THE " NEW TESTAMENT THEOLOGY 101 

may be given forth as the objective result of the period 
under survey. 

But when it is a question of the content of thought 
in the New Testament writings, the questions are not so 
clearly formulated. The continual hearing of opinions 
has not the same usefulness. On the contrary, the account 
of the subject becomes thereby only the more compli 
cated and confused. 

Here the result of Holtzmann s threading his own 
view through those of others is that neither the one nor 
the other stands out with any clearness. Undoubtedly, 
he knows the literature as no one else does, and has 
absorbed into his own mind and worked up all that it has 
to offer. But a clear view of the state of opinion is what 
he does not in the end succeed in conveying, since he 
intentionally omits to give a sketch and criticism of the 
works cited and contents himself with quoting passages 
from them. 

This unfortunate atomistic method does not even 
allow the individual problems to appear as clearly as 
would be desirable. In the post-Baur study of Paulinism, 
various questions had come up one after another which, 
taken together, form its fundamental problem. The most 
natural procedure for one who intended to make critical 
use of the work already done would have been to sketch 
these in their full extent and then formulate them more 
exactly and exhibit their inner connexions. 

But that is not the kind of treatment which Holtzmann 
aims at. He has the feeling that this is no longer neces 
sary, and agrees with contemporary scholars in thinking 
that assured results have been attained in sufficient 
number to admit of a simple positive account of the 
system. In accordance with this view he feels it to be 
his duty to act as a critical camera, focussing the views 
on his lens and combining them into a picture. 

One looks, therefore, in vain in his work for a funda 
mental statement and solution of the problems. They 
are mentioned where they happen to come up, and are 



102 H. J. HOLTZMANN 

there discussed in a fragmentary fashion. In addition 
to this the author s peculiarly subtle and delicately 
shaded method of exposition has to be reckoned with. 
Any one who is not familiar with it runs the risk of passing 
too lightly over these passages and failing to appreciate 
the significance which Holtzmann himself attaches to 
his remarks. What he intends to give is a General-staff 
map of the results of investigation. The heights and 
hollows are not shown as such, but represented by curves 
which are only later to be carried out in relief. 

Holtzmann does not stand above the post-Baur 
study of the subject, but within it. 

That is immediately evident from the fact that, 
speaking generally, he takes as the plan of his exposition 
the scheme, partially " Reformation," partially modern, 
which the head of the Tubingen school had used in his 
theology and left as a legacy to his successors. After 
dealing with the doctrine of man, law, sin, and corrup 
tion, he describes the "revolution" (conversion). Then 
follow Christology, the work of redemption, and the 
Divine righteousness. The close is formed by the 
chapters on the " ethical " material, the " mystical," 
and " eschatology." 

The difficulties and errors which are involved in this 
division of the subject have not been escaped by Holtz 
mann any more than by others. At every step it is 
evident how unnatural is an arrangement of the material 
which leaves out of account the connexions inherent in the 
system. How much art is expended on breaking off the 
thread at a given moment, in order to take it up again 
in a later chapter ! How many unnecessarily fragmentary 
representations ! How many annoying repetitions ! How 
many references forward and backward ! Thus, for 
example, what Paul has to say of redemption is not 
developed connectedly but split up among a number 
of chapters. And the same thing happens with regard 
to the doctrine of the death and resurrection of Christ. 

The division which he has taken over leads Holtzmann 



103 

to regard the Pauline teaching on redemption from the 
stand-point of the Reformation doctrine. Involuntarily 
he always[thinks either of the individual man, or humanity, 
instead of the entity always present to the mind of the 
Apostle, the group of the elect of the last generation, who 
have been subjected to the influence of the death and 
resurrection of Christ. He quotes the acute remark of 
Schmiedel * that " the men who had sought (and found) in 
Jesus before His death forgiveness and peace of soul " 
are left out of account by the Apostle, but he does not 
go further into the problem which this suggests. The 
temporally conditioned character and the general point 
of view of the Pauline doctrine of redemption is, owing 
to the faulty division, practically overlooked. 

Not less unfortunate is the plan on which the signi 
ficance of the death and resurrection of Christ is dealt 
with. Having begun with the psychology of the natural 
man, and the man in process of conversion, Holtzmann 
endeavours to explain the facts by which redemption is 
conditioned from this starting-point. He asks what 
these two events, the death and resurrection, signified for 
Jesus and what they signified for the believers. Jesus is 
thereby proved to be the Messiah ; the influence upon 
believers is described on the basis of the classical passages 
in the Epistles. But the inner connexion of the two 
effects is not clear, and it is equally unintelligible wherein 
the saving significance of the death and resurrection 
consists. 

Holtzmann is, in fact, still straitly confined to the 
Reformation and modern point of view, from which the 
twofold event of the death and resurrection of Christ is 
considered by itself, in isolation, and an attempt is 
made to get behind it by psychologising, and thus to 
discover how, according to the statements of Paul, it 
produced a complete change in God and man, and effected 
justification and reconciliation. This attempt overlooks 
the fact that on the Apostle s view it is primarily a cosmic 

1 Holtzmann, p. in. 



104 H. J. HOLTZMANN 

event which alters the condition of the whole creation 
and introduces a new Age, and that everything else is 
only a consequence of this fundamental effect. 

As Holtzmann, like his predecessors, has thus omitled 
to consider the most fundamental aspect of redemption 
as conceived by Paul, he is not concerned to trace out 
the most general conception of the effect of the death and 
resurrection of Jesus Christ. That is as much as to say 
that he, like the rest, is condemned to a mere descriptive 
treatment, using Pauline phraseology, and is practically 
unable to give any explanation. 

This unfortunate result becomes apparent in regard to 
the question of the Law. He is unable to make it in any 
way intelligible how Paul was necessarily led, as a matter 
of reasoning, to the conviction that it was no longer valid. 
In the last resort he can only appeal to the unique char 
acter of the vision on the Damascus road. He assumes 
that this " brought to an issue in the zealous Pharisee 
not only a theoretic, but also an ethical crisis, terminating 
that painful condition of inner division which Paul 
pictures out of his own inmost consciousness when he 
speaks of the experiences which are associated with sub 
jection to the law." " Previously," he continues, " the 
Pharisee had anxiously sought to conceal from himself, or 
to argue away, the fact that the law was impossible of 
fulfilment, and was therefore no way of salvation, but 
rather the contrary. There now rose upon this melancholy 
scene, strewn with the shattered fragments of attempts to 
gain righteousness, a new light streaming from the Christ, 
whom the legalists had delivered to death, whereas His 
being raised again by God guaranteed the actual presence 
of another way of salvation. Not only did his former 
legal service appear to him a life of sin, his Pharisaic 
rabbinism as foolishness, his attack upon the Messianic 
community as enmity to God, but even in his inmost 
being a crisis had taken place in consequence of which a 
tension, under which he had hitherto groaned, had 
suddenly been relaxed." 



VISIONS AND REVELATIONS 105 

How do we know that Paul when he was still a perse 
cutor of the Christians was suffering inward distress 
from his experiences of the powerlessness of the law ? 
How did the vision of Christ bring about the resolution 
of this tension ? How, exactly, did it reveal a way of 
salvation by which the abolition of the law was implied ? 

In themselves the vision of Christ, and the law, have 
nothing to do with one another. What Paul received 
in that moment was the conviction of the Messiahship 
of Jesus. While other believers were content simply 
to adopt this conviction, he proceeds to draw from it 
in some way or other the conclusion that the law was 
henceforth invalidated. Whether he did that at the 
moment or only later, we do not know. What is certain 
is only that he does draw this conclusion, though it is not 
contemplated either in the thoughts of Jesus or in those 
of the primitive community. 

How he came to draw it is not explained by Holtzmann, 
any more than by the scholars of the post-Baur period 
generally. The assumption that the Apostle experienced 
along with the vision an ethical crisis which set him free 
from the law, is a psychological hypothesis about which 
the letters have nothing whatever to say. It does not 
even prove what it professes to prove. Exactly how the 
abrogation of the law is supposed to be effected by the 
death and resurrection of Christ is not obvious. It is to 
be remarked, too, that Paul always treats the abolition 
of the law as a logical conclusion, not as a psychological 
experience. 

Tn other connexions, too, Holtzmann often has recourse 
to Holsten s expedient of taking what is unintelligible 
in the Apostle s statements as accounted for by the 
Damascus vision. 

In this way the doctrine of the " new creature " is 
made to go back to a " personal experience," and " a 
perception so keen as to be apprehended by the senses, 
of the destruction of the law of sin in the members." 

" The complex of new ethical powers, motives, duties, 



106 H. J. HOLTZMANN 

and aims . . . which formed itself in him has as its centre 
the risen Christ who had appeared to him in that moment 
as light, to be henceforth the vital centre and the guiding 
star of his individual life. . . . Hence the new creation. 
It is a simple generalisation and application of this personal 
experience to cover all analogous cases, since now all 
baptized persons appear as, on the negative side, dead to 
sin, on the positive side as walking in a newness of life 
corresponding to the resurrection." 

So Holtzmann. Paul, however, never speaks of his 
theory of the new creature as if he were expressing by it 
the generalisation and objectivation of an inner ex 
perience, but represents it as being logically and actually 
involved in the death and resurrection of the Lord for 
those who believe in him, and regards his own renewal 
as only a special case of the general law which operates 
in all the believing elect. 

That is just the characteristic and unintelligible thing 
about Paulinism, that its creator does not seem to have 
the faintest consciousness of holding up his personal 
experiences as something to be imitated, but presents his 
whole system as something that immediately and ob 
jectively grows out of the facts, something which can be 
examined by the higher, but in its own way logical 
understanding from which " gnosis " is derived. 

To treat his Damascus " experience " as a source of 
theoretic knowledge, as is done by modern theology, in 
order to be dispensed from rendering any account to 
ordinary or philosophic thought, would have been out of 
the question for an unsophisticated mind such as his, and 
indeed for the mental attitude of antiquity in general. 

Of Paul s objective statements Holtzmann always, 
in order to be able to interpret them, makes something 
subjective. 

This error in method which he shares with scholars 
of the post-Baur period generally runs through the 
whole of his undertaking. 

He frequently takes occasion to point to the element of 



PAUL S " GNOSTICISM " 107 

" gnosis " in the Apostle s doctrine. At bottom, however, 
he is afraid that his doctrine may be too much considered 
as an intellectual construction. For that reason he 
provides a special section on " the religious character of 
the doctrine." " Paul s world of thought," he there 
tells us, " is, to put it in a word, not merely a product of 
intellection, it is antecedently to that a product of experi 
ence also ; in this it differs fundamentally from any of the 
artificially excogitated gospels of Gnosticism proper. . . . 
The first condition for any understanding of Paulinism 
is that we should not obscure the volcanic character of its 
origin by any method which implies the gradual addition 
of one grain of sand to another. The whole system of 
doctrine means nothing more nor less than the way in 
which the Apostle objectified to himself the fundamental 
decisive experience of his life and theoretically explained 
its presuppositions and consequences. The doctrine fits 
the experience with a theory." 

How, then, does Holtzmann know that Paul is not 
after all a Gnostic pure and simple ? The whole character 
of his system makes him appear so. He himself claims 
to be one, 1 and is quite unaware that his doctrine is 
nothing more than the form given by the constructive 
imagination to a personal experience. 

He knows no distinction between " gnostic " and 
" religious." What is religious is for him gnostic, and 
what is gnostic, religious. Any one who strictly dis 
tinguishes the two in him is modernising. 

His mission to the Gentiles and his universalism are 
also, according to Holtzmann, to be explained directly 
from the vision at his conversion. The Christ who has 
won through to triumph by way of death, so Holtzmann 
explains, implies for the Apostle the purification of the 
Messianic idea from all the carnal elements which in 
Judaism still cling to it. In the exalted Christ he sees 

1 Cf. 2 Cor. xi. 6, where Paul speaks of himself as " inexpert in speech, 
but not in knowledge " (rfj yvutrei). See also i Cor. i. 5, viii. i ; Phil, 
i. 9, etc. " Gnostic " is used above in the general sense of one who 
lays stress on theoretic religious knowledge. TRANSLATOR. 



io8 H. J. HOLTZMANN 

also the head of the Church gathered out from both Jews 
and Gentiles. 

How, exactly, does the vision at the conversion carry 
with it the elimination of the carnal elements which in 
Judaism cleave to the Messianic idea ? Paul, it is true, 
sees a glorified Person; but the Jewish Son-of-Man Messiah 
also belongs to the supernatural world. Further, uni- 
versalism is provided for in the eschatology of Late 
Judaism, and in that preached by Jesus, since it is assumed 
that among those elected to the Kingdom of God others 
will be revealed who do not belong to the people of Israel. 
Universalism is therefore involved in the Jewish con 
ception of the Messiah, Whereas, however, Late Judaism 
and Jesus only represent it as realised in the coming 
supernatural Age, Paul antedates it and affirms that 
distinctions are already abolished in consequence of the 
death and resurrection of Jesus, and infers from this the 
justification and the duty of preaching to the heathen. 
The problem has therefore nothing to do with the " puri 
fication of the Messianic idea," and consists simply in the 
fact that the Apostle assumes this universalism to be 
already applicable to the present natural era, just as he 
also asserts that believers are already in a condition of 
resurrection life. 

Holtzmann is not much concerned to show the con 
nexion of the Pauline statements with Jewish theology 
and eschatology in order to arrive in this way at a new 
formulation of the problems. In fact he clearly betrays 
the tendency to make as little use as possible of eschato 
logy in explaining the Pauline system of doctrine. 

Kabisch s work is in the highest degree distasteful to 
him. He refers to it only occasionally, and with reserve. 
It is true he cannot avoid acknowledging that, " with all 
the exaggerations, monstrosities, and inconsistencies which 
may be pointed out " in its emphasising of the physical 
character of the conceptions and ideas associated with 
the dualism of flesh and spirit, the work embodies a sound 
idea. But he never so much as mentions that this 



ETHICS AND ESCHATOLOGY 109 

insistance on the " physical " is ultimately due to the 
fact that all the conceptions and ideas are traced back to 
eschatology. Any one who is not already acquainted 
with Kabisch s fundamental idea will not learn it from 
Holtzmann. 

True to the Baur and post-Baur tradition, Holtz 
mann postpones the chapter on eschatology to the 
end. That this arrangement does not contribute to a 
satisfactory treatment of the ethics is not surprising. 
The eschatological roots of the conception of predestina 
tion^ discussed in this chapter, or of the designation of 
believers as " saints " are hardly visible. That the most 
general ethical maxims of the Apostle are conditioned by 
the expectation of the nearness of the parousia, and that 
the ethical implications of the mystical dying and rising 
again with Christ have also in the last resort an eschato 
logical orientation, is never fairly recognised. Holtz 
mann finds himself, therefore, rather helpless when 
he has to deal with points in which the eschatological 
character of Paul s ethic comes most clearly to light. 
In the directions given in i Corinthians vii. about married 
and unmarried persons, about marrying or remaining 
single, he finds a certain " hesitation." In a quite general 
way, he is willing to assume that " the so closely bounded 
view of the future explains why in this and other depart 
ments there was no complete development of the ethics." 
This halting estimate of the ethical significance of 
eschatology shows that Holtzmann regards the Pauline 
ethical teaching from the modern point of view. 

He is bound to take this course with regard to eschato 
logy because he agrees with Pfleiderer and the rest in 
admitting a comprehensive influence of Greek ideas upon 
Paul, and is well aware that a man cannot serve two 
masters. 

Even in the Apostle s doctrine of man he finds a 
Hellenistic factor alongside of the Jewish, and asserts 
that the " emphasis rests on the former." Wherever 
reference is made to the antithesis of flesh and spirit 



no H. J. HOLTZMANN 

he thinks that the influence of the Greek element is 
manifest. By regarding sin as implicate in the empirical 
nature of man " Paul abandons in principle the ultimate 
basis of the Jewish philosophy and ethic." 

Greek, or to speak more precisely, Alexandrian, is the 
metaphysical background of his conception of Christ. 
According to Holtzmann, Paul never really goes back 
expressly to Daniel or the Apocalyptic Messiah. His 
own special view grew up, Holtzmann thinks, out of 
speculations allied to those of Philo about the two accounts 
of the creation and the heavenly and earthly Adam. The 
primary point for him is " the metaphysical hypothesis 
of the two classes of mankind " which stand opposed to 
each other as the " psychic " and the " pneumatic " 
creation. 

That the "subjective," ethical interpretation of the 
work of redemption is based on Hellenistic ideas is for 
Holtzmann self-evident. It is not less certain for him 
that the idea of predestination is "borrowed" from the 
Book of Wisdom, and consequently " in one of the most 
conspicuous points of the Pauline world of thought its 
Hellenistic origin " must be regarded as proved. That the 
idea of predestination is inherent in eschatology, and that 
Jesus Himself makes use of it, is not taken into account. 

The doctrine of baptism " comes to base itself entirely 
on the Hellenistic side of Paul s theology." In general, 
he transformed the two sacred ceremonies of primitive 
Christianity after the analogy of the Greek mystery- 
cults, and thus " opened up for the early Catholic Church 
a way " into which it was forced by the natural progress 
of events. 

Holtzmann sees in Paul s system of thought the first, 
but at the same time a far-reaching Hellenisation of 
Christianity. The Apostle, so runs his verdict, " by 
bringing Hellenistic forms of thought to bear for the first 
time upon Christian conceptions, prepared the way for the 
passing over of the latter from the Semitic to the Hellenic 
world, and beyond this again to the modern world." 



THE HELLENISTIC CHANNEL in 

The influx of Greek ideas is thought of, as by Pfleiderer, 
as coming through the intermediary channel of Jewish 
Hellenism. The question whether any literary relation 
ship to the latter can be detected in Paul is dismissed in a 
few lines. Holtzmann admits that " no tangible influ 
ence " of Philo s writings is to be recognised. He is, 
however, of opinion that Grafe has proved " with all the 
greater certainty " the Apostle s dependence on the 
Alexandrian Book of Wisdom. 

Instead of giving a regular proof he confines himself, 
as his predecessors had done, entirely to general con 
siderations, which he sums up in the following sentences : 
" In any case Paul was by birth and parentage a son of the 
Diaspora, and from his youth up breathed at any rate at 
times a Greek atmosphere. His letters show, in regard 
to vocabulary and rhetoric, sometimes even as regards 
tone of feeling and mental attitude, not a few surprising 
affinities with Greek thought. Some kind of communica 
tion from this side, and that not merely occasional 
or accidental, one must certainly assume. The only 
question which remains is in regard to the extent and 
intensity of this Hellenistic, or even it may be Hellenic, 
admixture, which became amalgamated with his Jewish 
scholasticism. This is certainly the point on which 
depend all the problems which Pauline study is called on 
at the present day to face. . . ." 

With this the matter is disposed of on the third page 
of the work ! Gunkel s and Kabisch s arguments to show 
that the doctrine of the Spirit is intelligible apart from 
Greek influences, are left out of account ; that Hatch in 
his " Influence of Greek Ideas " had nothing to say 
about any Hellenisation of the Gospel on the part of Paul 
is not mentioned. On the contrary there follows a 
profession of faith in Pfleiderer s doctrine that Paul in 
the course of his career even advanced to the Hellenisation 
of his eschatology. Holtzmann cheerfully and courage 
ously defends this theory to its ultimate consequences, 
and holds that in Paul s dread of being found unclothed 



ii2 H. J. HOLTZMANN 

(2 Cor. v. 3) his national mode of feeling and a Greek 
mode of thought " are combined in a fashion which no 
one would have dreamed of inventing." 

The usually so cautious scholar goes in this case 
unhesitatingly forward. The difficulties which arise 
out of the assumed collocation and opposition of Jewish 
and Greek ideas fascinate instead of alarming him. 

Here, as in some other points, Holtzmann betrays 
Kantian tendencies and instincts, and is inclined to exhibit 
the problems as antinomies. Paul s system of teaching, 
as it had shaped itself in the course of the study of the 
subject since Baur, appears to him a unique formation, 
since in it are combined two worlds of thought and two 
different sets of religious ideas which are supposed to hold 
each other in equipoise and mutually interpenetrate 
one another. He takes it to be his task to lay bare this 
remarkable construction in its minutest details, and to 
show how the most diverse thoughts sometimes conflict, 
sometimes stand in a state of tension, sometimes mutually 
limit, and sometimes supplement each other. If he 
succeeds in making clear the position and relation of the 
various strata of thought, the system, he believes, will 
become intelligible. 

This idea runs through his whole treatment of the 
subject, and gives him courage to take over all the con 
tradictions and compromises which scholars from Baur 
onwards have discovered, and even to add new ones in 
addition. He is especially interested in the questions 
regarding the juridical and ethical sets of ideas, the 
relation of the "popular" missionary preaching to the 
" system of doctrine," the antithesis between " theory " 
and " practice " in the ethics, and the inconsistencies 
of the eschatology. 

In these discussions there is much penetrating obser 
vation. The picture, however, does not become clearer, 
but rather more confused. 

His predecessors had done their best in their treatment 
of the subject to conceal its fragmentary character, and 



PAUL THE INCOMPREHENSIBLE 113 

when all was said and done had been content to put in 
the foreground only a few leading ideas, which could be 
brought under a single point of view. They worked with 
perspective, light and shade. Holtzmann brings all the 
detail into one line and places it under the same illumina 
tion. The fact that the system becomes in this way 
much more complicated than it had already been made by 
the scholarship of the period awakes in him no misgivings, 
but increases his confidence, since he sees in it one of 
those offences which needs must come. 

Even the objection that so complicated a system of 
doctrine could not have been understood in primitive 
Christian times does not alarm him. He anticipates it by 
declaring that the actual contemporaries and adherents 
of the Apostle could neither understand nor imitate him, 
even if they had wished to do so. How, indeed, could 
they possibly have done so ! The whole of Paulinism is a 
" systematisation of the Christ- vision " and a " generalisa 
tion " of that which the Apostle had experienced in his 
own soul, and consequently ascribed to all who walk in 
the same way as an experience which they must neces 
sarily undergo. " What this man with his unique 
spiritual endowment had experienced, felt, and thought 
amid influences and surroundings which could only once 
have arisen, could never be exactly in the same way 
experienced, felt, and thought by any other man." 

Holtzmann, therefore, like Harnack, accepts the saying f 
that no one ever understood Paul, with the sole ex 
ception of Marcion . . . who misunderstood him ! It is 
not enough for him to regard the system, as had been 
usual among scholars since Baur, as a personal creation of 
the Apostle ; he goes the whole way with Holsten in 
maintaining that the personal creation was nothing else 
than the interpretation of a unique personal experience. , . 

But that is to admit that no connecting links between 
Paulinism and primitive Christianity can be discovered ; 
and does not that really imply an abandonment of all 
attempt to explain the Apostle s doctrine ? Is it under- 

8 



U 4 H. J. HOLTZMANN 

stood at all if it is not understood in relation to primitive 
Christianity ? 

What right has any one to assert that it was unin 
telligible to his contemporaries ? Paul confidently as 
cribes to them an understanding of it. And how are we 
to explain the success which is evidenced by the establish 
ment of the Pauline churches and the victorious struggle 
for freedom from the law ? Can the least understood of all 
early Christians have exercised the greatest influence ? 
These fundamental questions are not asked by Holtz- 
mann. His confidence in the results already attained left 
no room for them. 

What he aimed at he has successfully accomplished. 
He has worked up into one great symphony the themes 
and motifs of the Pauline scholarship of the post-Baur 
period, a symphony such as he alone, at once critic and 
artist, could have written. Even one who does not allow 
himself to be carried away by it will again and again 
take up the score with its subtle counterpoint and skilful 
instrumentation, and always find in it new beauties. 

Never was Holtzmann so impressive this was to be 
observed even in his lectures as in his treatment of 
Paulinism. Here he could grip his hearers, because he 
wished to do so he who usually showed a certain dread of 
allowing the feeling, the enthusiasm, which glowed in him, 
to become perceptible when he was dealing with matters 
of scholarship. The system as modelled by him lives 
because he has breathed his own life into it. But it is 
not historic. 

He thinks to sift out and preserve what is of permanent 
value in the heritage left by Baur and his pupils, of whom 
he was proud to count himself spiritually one. In reality 
he leads up to a declaration of bankruptcy, and that 
especially in the powerful closing chapter entitled " Re 
trospect and Prospect." 

Here he endeavours forcibly to combine into one whole 
the results of Pfleiderer, Holsten, and Harnack. 

From Pfleiderer he takes over the view of the wide- 



HOLTZMANN S TRIUMVIRATE 115 

reaching Greek influence in Paulinism, and from Holsten 
he takes the theory that the system had its birth in the 
unique experience of the vision of Christ on the way to 
Damascus. 

Now these two views might at need be combined, 
though it is not quite easy to show and this difficulty is 
constantly coming to light in Holtzmann how what 
is in one aspect a purely subjective experience, never 
exactly to be repeated by any other, appears in -another 
aspect, by a kind of miracle, as Greek religious thought, 
and thus becomes universally intelligible. 

But into this synthesis Holtzmann tries to introduce 
in addition Harnack s recognition that Paulinism had no 
part in the formation of early Greek theology. 

Now Holsten and Harnack again, on their part, might 
be combined. The Pauline teaching, if it is referred 
to a unique personal experience, might well remain for the 
Apostle s contemporaries and successors a book with seven 
seals. 

But Pfleiderer and Holsten and Harnack cannot all be 
brought together. If Paulinism was largely Greek, it 
must have had some influence. How is it conceivable 
that Greeks should not have recognised and understood 
the Greek spirit ? The triumvirate planned by Holtz 
mann cannot, therefore, be brought to pass, even if Holtz 
mann is regarded as the connecting-link between Harnack 
and Pfleiderer. In defiance of all the facts of the history 
of dogma the last-named must assert an influence of the 
Pauline system upon the growth of Greek dogma, since 
he sees in Paul the first step in the Hellenisation of 
Christianity. 

Any one who shares his premisses must also draw his 
conclusions, and Holtzmann is not bold enough to do 
that. He agrees with him in asserting the Hellenic 
character of Pauline doctrine, in other respects he bows 
to the facts of the history of dogma. But this means 
that, however he may wrap it up in qualifying clauses, 
he is asserting the impossible, namely, that Christianity 



n6 H. J. HOLTZMANN 

as Hellenised by Paul remained uninteresting and un 
intelligible to the Greeks. 

The edifice which he constructs, therefore, breaks down 
from within, even though he may be able for a time to 
maintain it in outward appearance intact. 

Thus there met in this universal critical spirit, which 
examined all things and desired to do justice to all, 
Baur and the history of dogma which took its rise from 
Ritschl and was opposed to Baur, and held a new settle 
ment of accounts. Once more it was made manifest 
that the question of Paul s relation to primitive Christi 
anity on the one hand, to early Greek dogma on the other, 
had not been solved, and that his teaching therefore had 
not been understood. 



CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

Edward Evanson. The Dissonance of the four generally received 
Evangelists. (1792.) 

Bruno Bauer. Kritik der Apostelgeschichte (1850). Kritik der 
paulinischen Briefe (Galatians, 1850 ; i Corinthians, 1851 ; re 
maining Epistles, 1852). Christus und die Casaren. Der Ursprung 
des Christen turns aus dem romischen Griechentum (1877). (Christ 
and the Caesars. How Christianity arose out of the Graeco-Roman 
Civilisation.) 

Albert Kalthoff. Die Entstehung des Christentums. 1904. (E.T. by 
J. McCabe, The Rise of Christianity, 1907.) 

Allarcl Pierson. De Bergrede en andere synoptische Fragmenten. 
(The Sermon on the Mount and other Synoptic Fragments.) 1878. 

A. Pierson and S. A. Naber. Verisimilia. 1886. 

A. D. Loman. Quaestiones Paulinae. (Theol. Tij dschrif t, 1882; 
1883 ; 1886 written in Dutch.) 

Rudolf Steck. Der Galaterbrief. 1888. 

W. C. van Manen. Paulus, 3 vols. Vol. i. deals with the Acts of the 
Apostles (1890) ; vol. ii. with the Epistle to the Romans (1891) ; 
vol. iii. with the Epistles to the Corinthians (1896). The criticism 
of the Epistle to the Romans has been translated into German 
under the title " Die Unechtheit des Romerbriefs," by G. Schlager. 
1906. 

M. Friedlander. Das Judentum in der vorchristlichen griechischen 
Welt. (Judaism in the pre-Christian Greek World.) 1897. 

J. Friedrich (Maehliss). Die Unechtheit des Galaterbrief s. (The 
Spuriousness of the Epistle to the Galatians.) 1891. 

J. H. Scholten. Historisch-kritische Bijdragen. (Contributions to 
Historical Criticism.) 1882. 

G. Heinrici. Die Forschungen iiber die paulinischen Briefe ; ihr 
gegenwartiger Stand und ihre Aufgaben. (The Critical Study of the 
Pauline Letters ; its Present Position, and the Tasks which await 
it.) 1886. 

J. M. S. Baljon. Exegetisch-kritische Verhandeling over den Brief 
van Paulus aan de Galatiers. (Exegetic and Critical Essay on the 
Epistle of Paul to the Galatians.) 1889. 

"7 



n8 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

Wilhelm Bruckner. Die chronologische Reihenfolge, in welcher die 
Briefe des Neuen Testaments verfasst sind. (The Chronological 
Order in which the Epistles of the New Testament were written.) 
1890. 

Carl Clemen. Die Chronologic der paulinischen Briefe. 1893. Die 
Einheitlichkeit der paulinischen Briefe. (The Integrity of the 
Pauline Epistles.) 1894. Paulus, 2 vols., 1904. 

Christian Hermann Weisse. Philosophische Dogmatik (3 vols., 1855 ; 
1860 ; 1862). Beitrage zur Kritik der paulinischen Briefe. (Con 
tributions to the Criticism of the Pauline Epistles.) Brought out 
by Sulze in 1867. 

J. M. S. Baljon. De Text der Breven van Paulus. 1884. 

Daniel Volter. Die Composition der paulinischen Hauptbriefe. (The 
Composition of the chief Pauline Epistles.) 1890. Paulus und 
seine Briefe. 1905. 

Friedrich Spitta. Untersuchung tiber den Brief des Paulus an die 
Romer. (Examination of the Epistle of Paul to the Romans in 
his work, Zur Geschichte und Literatur des Urchristentums, vol. iii., 
ist half, 1901.) 

THOSE critics who reject the Pauline letters as a whole 
profess to have derived the impulse thereto from Fer 
dinand Christian Baur, to be his true because logically 
consistent disciples, and to bear the same relation to him 
as Schopenhauer did to Kant. This profession, which 
has always filled the " legitimate " Tubingen school with 
indignation, is in many points well founded. 

Baur s criticism was occupied with the Corpus 
Paulinum which remained after the exclusion of the 
Pastoral epistles. In the ten remaining Epistles, which 
show a large degree of inner homogeneity, he professed to 
discover differences on the basis of which some were to be 
assigned to the Apostle, others to the school which took 
its rise from him. 

Once the rights of such a criticism are admitted, nothing 
can prevent it from working itself out to its limit, and 
seeking to explain all the Epistles as products of a school 
which went under Paul s name. 

The Tubingen master held that the Epistles to the 
Corinthians and that to the Ephesians could not both be 
from the same hand. But the differences between the 
former and the Epistle to the Galatians are in their own 
way scarcely less great, if one considers that the violent 



F. C. BAUR S CRITICISM 119 

controversy about the law with which the latter is filled is 
never mentioned in the others. 

The letters to the Romans and to the Galatians, on the 
other hand, deal partly with the same subjects, since they 
both treat of sin, law, and justification by faith. Neverthe 
less they are far from coinciding. For all their agreement 
in fundamental views they show remarkable differences 
in detail. Is it, if this line of argument be followed, 
after all so indubitably certain that the four main epistles 
are from the same pen ? 

Is it certain that they are by Paul ? Strictly examined, 
Baur s assumption that they are so rests only on tradition, 
which in respect of the other letters he impugns. Has 
he then the right to rely on it so confidently as regards 
the main epistles ? In conformity with his own principles 
he ought to have felt himself obliged to exercise " positive 
criticism " here also, and would only have had the right 
to regard them as Pauline after it had been proved 
that they really belong to primitive Christian times 
and have the historical Apostle of the Gentiles as their 
author. 

The assumption of the genuineness of the four main 
epistles is by no means so self-evident as it may seem to us 
in our simplicity. The Acts of the Apostles know nothing 
of any literary activity of Paul. It is only from 
Clement of Rome, Ignatius, and the Gnostics that we 
first hear of his Epistles. Justin and the remainder of 
early Christian literature are silent in regard to his 
writings. Supposing that the first Epistle of Clement 
does not belong to the first century, the earliest evidence 
for the Epistles comes from the second century. If 
the Ignatian letters are not genuine, Marcion, about 
the middle of the second century, is the first witness to 
an actual Corpus paulinum \ 

For any one who has to defend the ordinary view, the 
position is very far from being favourable. So far as 
outward evidence goes it is hardly more difficult to defend 
the theory that the letters originated in an inner circle 



120 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

of Gnosticism and were gradually given out under the 
name of Paul. 

Moreover, Baur made larger concessions than he 
realised to the opinion which jeopardised his position, 
when he maintained that Paulinism represents a Hellenisa- 
tion of the Gospel. 

Is it probable that a single individual belonging to the 
primitive Christian community, immediately after the 
death of Jesus, by himself achieved this result ? Histori 
cal analogy is uniformly in favour of the view that develop 
ments of that kind have a gradual beginning, and are only 
accomplished in the course of two or three generations. 
It would therefore be inherently much more probable 
that Paulinism should be the work of a school which 
sought to reconcile Christianity with Hellenism. In any 
case a writer who regards it as Greek ought to face the 
difficulty of explaining it as at the same time belonging to 
primitive Christianity, and ought not to regard this 
hypothesis as self-evident, but as standing in need of 
proof. 

These theoretic considerations regarding the basis of 
the views of Baur and his successors are so obvious that 
they were bound to come up sooner or later. The fact 
was that in one particular point the Tubingen master had 
held back from unprejudiced criticism and had foisted 
upon critical science the traditional belief. In doing so 
he had obeyed an instinct of caution. Those who pro 
ceeded further along the path of questioning and investi 
gation arrived, some with satisfaction and some with 
dismay, at the result of declaring all the epistles to be 
spurious. 

It was Bruno Bauer who about the middle of the nine 
teenth century opened the ball with his criticism of the 
Pauline letters. 1 

1 Die Apostelgeschichte, 1850, 143 pp. Acts, it is argued, is a work 
of " free reflexion " in which various hands have had a part. 

Kritik der paulinischen Briefe, part i., The Origin of Galatians (1850, 
74 pp.) ; part ii., The Origin of i Corinthians (1851, 76 pp.) ; part 
iii., 2 Corinthians, Romans, the Pastoral Epistles, Thessalonians, 



BRUNO BAUER S CRITICISM 121 

This work is not on the same level as his criticism of 
the Gospels. 1 The objections which have to be brought 
against F. C. Baur s views are not clearly developed nor 
completely stated. In what sense Paulinism is to be 
considered the work of a school with Greek sympathies 
within Christianity is not explained. 

In addition to this, Bruno Bauer complicates his task 
by regarding not merely the doctrine of the Apostle of 
the Gentiles, but Christianity in general, as a creation of 
the Greek mind. It was not, however, until twenty-five 
years after the appearance of his criticism of the Pauline 
letters that he attempted to prove this in the confused 
work on " Christ and the Caesars." 2 

It was not Palestine, according to his thesis, but Rome 
and Alexandria which cradled Christianity. Palestine 
merely supplied the background for the picture which 
the first Evangelist undertook to create of the beginnings 
of a movement which really originated with Seneca and 

Ephesians, Colossians, and Philippians (1852, 129 pp.)- The greater 
part of the epistles were not written until after Acts. Certainly 
Galatians is later, i Corinthians is earlier than Acts, and is doubtless 
drawn from common sources. 

The first to venture an attack on one of the main Epistles was 
Edward Evanson, The Dissonance of the four generally received Evan 
gelists, and the evidence of their respective authenticity examined (trans 
lated into Dutch, 1796), who holds Romans, as well as Hebrews, Colos 
sians, and Ephesians, to be spurious. Further information regarding 
this, as it seems, rather rare book would be desirable. Whether any 
great critical importance is to be attached to it remains questionable. 
[Evanson (1731-1805), a Cambridge graduate, vicar of Tewkesbury, 
adopted Unitarian views, and resigned his living in 1778. His grounds 
for rejecting Romans are, the difficulty about the existence of a church 
at Rome prior to Paul s visit, the number of greetings in chapter xvi., 
and supposed references to the destruction of Jerusalem in xi. 12, 
15, 21, 22. The treatment of the Epistles is much slighter than that 
of the Gospels, where he shows some insight into the difficulties of 
what is now known as the Synoptic problem. The Dissonance made 
some stir, and was answered by Joseph Priestley in Letters to a 
Young Man t 1792-93, and by T. Falconer, Bampton Lecture, 1810. 
TRANSLATOR.] 

1 See A. Schweitzer, Von Reimarus zu Wrede, pp. 137-159 (Eng. 
trans., The Quest of the Historical Jesus, pp. 137-160). 

2 Christus und die Cdsaren, 1877, 387 pp. What the diffusely told 
story of the Roman court has to do with the origin of Christianity has 
certainly never been quite clear to any reader. In attempting to 
describe its contents one is never quite certain whether the author s 
meaning has been rightly represented. 



122 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

his adherents. Whether there ever was a Jesus or 
a Paul may be left an open question. It is in any case 
certain that the one did not utter the sayings which the 
Gospels put into his mouth, and that the other is not to 
be regarded as the author of the letters. 

The Christian " community " arose among the op 
pressed, the slaves and Jews, of the great city. They 
formed associations and fostered in one another a yearn 
ing for the End of the Age, developed the Platonico- 
Stoic thoughts of Seneca into the sayings of the Sermon 
on the Mount, and invented for themselves their hero, 
Christ. The spirit of the new creation came from the 
West ; its framework was furnished by Judaism. 

Judaism brought with it a tendency towards legalism. 
In the Flavian period the Greek ethical philosophy struck 
up an alliance with the law. This movement was op 
posed by the freedom-loving Gnosis. In the last years 
of Hadrian and the first half of the reign of Marcus 
Aurelius matters came to an issue. So far as the struggle 
took a literary form we have the evidences of it in the 
Pauline letters and the Acts of the Apostles. Galatians 
is the last of the letters, issued at the crisis of the struggle, 
and was directed against Acts, which appeared at the 
same time. 

" The figure of this champion of a universal Church 
and freedom from the law of ordinances " must have been 
already known to the Church. What was new was the 
association with his name of an epistolary literature, 
the production of which occupied a series of earnest and 
able men for some forty years. 

In the Acts of the Apostles Paul is co-ordinated with 
or subordinated to Peter, the representative of the 
Judaeo-Roman hierarchic tendency. That reflects the 
issue of the struggle. The freedom-loving party was 
defeated ; in the last quarter of the second century 
Catholicism became supreme in the Church. 

No attention was paid to Bauer, and in part he himself 
was responsible for the neglect. The bitterness and the 



BAUER REDIVIVUS 123 

carelessness of his writing, the contradictions in which 
he becomes involved, the fantastic imagination which he 
allows to run riot, made it impossible for the few who read 
him to regard him seriously. 

Nevertheless, in detached observations, and in some 
of the incidental ideas, he displays a critical acumen 
which has something great about it. 

After dismissing him with a few sharp words, the 
Tubingen school and their successors enjoyed a respite 
of thirty years, so far as radical scepticism was concerned. 
At the end of that time Bauer reappeared, like a Nero 
Redivivus, in peaceful Holland. 1 

In a critical introduction to his study of the Sermon on 
the Mount, Allard Pierson examined the earliest witnesses 
for the existence of Christianity, and in doing so threw 
out the question whether the historicity of the main 
Pauline epistles was so completely raised above all doubt 
that they could be treated with perfect confidence as 
archives from the earliest period of the new faith. 2 

In the year 1886 he published, in association with the 
philological scholar, Samuel Adrian Naber, the Verisimilia. 
The book was not adapted to make a deep impression. 
It was too much the ingenious essay for that. 

The two friends combined their efforts in order to show 
New Testament exegetes how much they had left un 
explained in the Epistles to the Thessalonians, Galatians, 
Corinthians, and Romans, and how many problems, 
incoherencies, and contradictions appear when one reads 
these writings with an open mind. 3 

1 A spiritual descendant of Bauer s who writes on popular lines is 
Albert Kalthoff (Die Entstehung des Christentums, 1904, 155 pp.). 
But neither as regards the problem nor its solution has he contributed 
anything to Pauline scholarship. 

- Allard Pierson, De Bergrede en andere synoptische Fragmcnten, 
1878, 260 pp. ; on Paul, 98-112. With his doubt of the Epistles the 
author associates a doubt of the Gospels, and asks whether Christianity 
as they represent it can have been founded by a historical Jesus. 

:t A. Pierson and S. A. Naber, Verisimilia. Laceram conditionem 
Novi Testamenti exemplis illustrarunt et ab origins repetierunt, 1886, 295 
pp. The work gives a running analysis of the letters in the course of 
which very interesting questions are thrown out. Why is nothing 



124 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

But instead of making a thorough examination of the 
problems and laboriously arguing the case with the other 
students of Paulinism, the authors at once proceed to 
suggest what appears to them a possible solution. They 
claim to have discovered that the inconsistencies are due 
in the main to the presence of two strata of thought which 
have been worked together. The one is of a sharply anti- 
Jewish character ; the other consists of milder and more 
conciliatory ideas. 

If it be assumed, so runs their argument, that 
Christianity was in its real origin a Jewish sect which 
had liberal ideas in regard to the law and directed 
its expectation towards the Messiah, the antinomian 
sections of the Epistles represent documents of that 
period. 

The present form of the letters is due to the fact that 
a later " Churchman "-the authors call him Paulus 
episcopus, and think that he may have served as model 
for the Paul of Acts worked into them the second, 
milder set of ideas. 

At the time when Pierson and Naber launched this 
hypothesis, A. D. Loman had just finished the series of 
" Quaestiones Paulinae " which he threw out in the Theo- 

said about the earthly life of Jesus ? Why is no trace of the influence 
of this Paul s thought to be found in history ? Do the various charac 
teristics and actions of his which are recorded show us a character 
which is at all intelligible ? 

The authors assume that the Jewish movement which led up to 
" Christianity " at first had only to do with the Messianic belief in 
general. Only later, through the blending of Greek myths with Isaiah 
liii., did the belief arise that the expected Messiah had already come 
and had passed through death and resurrection. 

The analysis of the Pauline Epistles is followed by essays upon 
the Paul of Acts and some chapters on the Fourth Gospel. The close 
is formed by an essay on the gradual origin of the conception of Christ 
in the New Testament. 

The theory that Christianity developed out of an already existing 
Jewish movement is maintained also by M. Friedlander in his popular 
and unimportant work, Das Judentum in der vorchristlichen griechischen 
Welt, a contribution towards explaining the origin of Christianity (1897, 
74 pp.). The opposition between a conservative and a freer tendency 
as regards the law, which appear in the primitive Church, are here held 
to have appeared previously in the Judaism from which Christianity 
originated. 



THE RADICAL GROUP 125 

logisch Tijdschrift of 1882-1886. * The battle began in 
earnest. 

Loman confines himself to dealing with the external 
arguments, and only proposes to examine how far the 
assumption that these letters were written by the 
Apostle in primitive Christian times can or cannot be 
proved from the early witnesses. His decision is 
negative. 

But his calmly written yet wonderfully living study 
shook two other thinkers out of their security, and com 
pelled them to carry on the work of destruction to a 
further point. 

Steck 2 and van Manen 3 undertook the task of supple 
menting the external arguments, of presenting the internal 
arguments by means of an analysis of the letters, and of 
offering a detailed hypothesis regarding the origin of the 
Pauline literature. 

1 A. D. Loman, " Quaestiones Paulinae," Theol. Tijdschrift, 1882, 
pp. 141-185, 302-328, 452-487 ; 1883, pp. 14-51. 1886, 42-113 (Dutch). 
In the prologue he tells us about the first impression which Bauer s 
criticism of the Pauline epistles made upon him : " With an Apage 
Satana ! I took leave of this antipathetic critic, firmly resolved to 
take no further notice of him." The order followed is to treat first 
the relation of Acts to Galatians, then to discuss the " necessary 
proofs " of the genuineness of this work, while the witnesses from the 
literature, and the history of the Canon, are examined later, in the second 
part, 1886. 

z Rudolf Steck, Der Galaterbrief nach seiner Echtheit untersucht 
nebst kritischen Bemerkungen zu den paulinischen Hauptbriefen (" The 
Epistle to the Galatians examined with Reference to its Genuineness, 
with critical Remarks on the main Pauline Epistles"), 1888, 386 pp. 
The examination of Galatians goes only as far as p. 151 ; the remaining 
chapters deal with the order of the main Epistles, the relation of Paul 
to the Gospels, the quotations from the Old Testament found in the 
Epistles, the affinities with Philo and Seneca, the marks of later author- 
ship, the external evidences from the New Testament and from early 
Christian literature. In conclusion, a hypothesis of the origin and 
development of Paulinism is sketched. The author tells in the preface 
the story of his conversion to the Dutch heresy. At first he dissented 
from Loman, but in the course of repeatedly treating the Epistle to 
the Galatians in his lectures he found to his dismay that he was gradu 
ally arriving at the theory of its spuriousness. 

The views of Pierson, Loman, and Steck are critically examined by 
J. M. S. Baljon in his Exegetisch-kritische Verhandeling over den Brief 
van Paulus an de Galatiers, 1899, 424 pp. 

:! W. C. van Manen, Paulus, 3 vols. (see head of chapter for par 
ticulars). The author describes on pp. 9-11 how he came to reject 
the Pauline Epistles. 



126 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

In respect of external arguments the three scholars 
combine to urge the following considerations : 

Acts, they argue, knows nothing of any literary activity 
of Paul ; and it tells us nothing of the conflicts which 
these letters, if we are to believe their own evidence, 
called forth. 

When the Tubingen school set up the axiom that Acts 
is less trustworthy than the Epistles, they made things 
easy for themselves. There are weighty arguments to 
support the opposite opinion. 

That the moment a mission to the heathen was under 
taken the question of the observance of the law must 
come up is clear. The most natural thing to happen 
would be that it should come up for discussion on purely 
practical lines and should take the form : how much must 
the Gentile Christians take over of the Commandments in 
order that the Jewish believers might have table-fellow 
ship and social intercourse with them ? 

This is the form of the problem which Acts presupposes, 
and it gives us in the account of the so-called Apostolic 
Council a decision in accordance therewith. 

The Epistle to the Galatians, on the other hand, asserts 
that the question of the validity of the law as such was 
raised at that time, and that Paul and the original apostles 
agreed to divide the spheres of their mission work into 
Gentile and Jewish. About the most pressing need, 
the establishment of a modus vivendi in mixed churches, 
nothing was done. This representation is much less 
natural than the other. 

Nor is the case different in regard to the picture of Paul 
which these two sources give us. In Acts, everything 
is clear and simple. The Apostle appears at first rather 
as an assistant to Barnabas, but afterwards makes himself 
independent, and maintains his position in relation to the 
original apostles by the force of his personality, in a free 
but not a hostile fashion. 

In the letters^ on the other hand, everything is unin 
telligible. Stress is laid on the fact that the Apostle of 



ACTS OR EPISTLES? 127 

the Gentiles after his conversion has no intercourse with 
the original apostles and the Church, receives nothing 
whatever of the doctrinal tradition about Jesus, and 
draws his gospel entirely from revelation. 

The statements regarding the external facts of his 
life are extremely confused. After his conversion he 
is said to have first spent three years in " Arabia " and 
then to have gone to Damascus, and from there, three 
years after his conversion, to have paid his " visit of 
ceremony " to the Church at Jerusalem, during which, 
however, he says that he saw only Peter, and James the 
Lord s brother. After that he spent fourteen years in 
Syria and Cilicia. 

Who can form a clear picture of the journeys implied 
in the letters, or of the relation of Paul to his churches ? 

Who can understand the character here presented ? 
Sometimes the Apostle is radical, sometimes conservative, 
sometimes bold, sometimes despairing ; in small things 
firm, in great things weakly yielding ; now violent, then 
again mild ; in all ways full of uncertainties and contra 
dictions. 

Far from arousing belief, the statements of the letters 
about the Apostle create difficulty upon difficulty and 
doubt upon doubt, if once one ventures to read them 
with an open mind. On the one side it seems as if a 
certain tendency to bring him into opposition with the 
original apostles made itself felt throughout, while on 
the other hand the traits are thrown together without 
any reference to an integral psychologically intelligible 
picture. 

The most natural view is, therefore, that Acts represents 
what is historically most authentic, while in the letters 
an imaginary picture is drawn, exhibiting throughout the 
same tendency, but composed by various hands. 

The external attestation in the early literature of a 
Pauline collection of letters, which is in any case not too 
brilliant, is further reduced by the radicals. The Ignatian 
letters are held as they also are by the Tubingen school 



128 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

to be spurious ; and they endeavour to bring down the 
first epistle of Clement from the time of Domitian to 
the middle of the second century. 1 If all this is admitted, 
the first attestation of the letters is that of Marcion. 
What, then, is there to oppose to the view that they had 
their origin in Gnostic circles and were only later forced 
upon the Church ? 

With this agrees, too, the fact that the Second Epistle 
of Peter, which alone in the New Testament makes 
mention of Paul s literary activity, 2 and which itself 
certainly belongs to the period of the struggle with 
Gnosticism, treats it as something in the nature of a 
" gift from the Greeks." 3 

In any case, in view of the silence of Justin, the 
Shepherd of Hermas, the Didache, and the Epistle of 
Barnabas, the attestation of the Pauline letters is no 
better than that of the Johannine literature. 4 

Great stress is laid on the fact that among the Gnostics 
the Epistles existed in a shorter form than in the Church, 
as appears from the reckoning which Tertullian holds 
with Marcion. 5 If this shorter text can be reconstructed 

1 The first epistle of Clement mentions (xlvii. i) " the letter of the 
blessed Paul " to the Corinthians, has a direct borrowing from Romans 
(xxxv. 5 = the catalogue of vices in Rom. i. 29-32), and in other respects 
also frequently shows dependence on the main epistles. For the 
detailed attempt to place it at a later date see Steck, 294-310. 

2 2 Peter iii. 15-17, "And count the long-suffering of the Lord as 
salvation, as also our beloved brother Paul, according to the wisdom 
given to him, wrote to you, as in all his Epistles when he mentions 
these things, in which no doubt occur some things which are difficult 
to understand, which the unlearned and unstedfast wrest, as they do 
also the other Scriptures, to their own destruction." (The German 
follows Weizsacker s rendering.) 

3 As in the present context this phrase might possibly be misleading, 
it may be worth pointing out that it is simply an allusion to the famous 
" timeo Danaos et dona ferentes," Aen. ii. 49. TRANSLATOR. 

4 The puzzle in the case of Justin is that he uses Pauline phrases, 
and therefore seems to know the E*plstles, but never mentions their 
author. According to Steck the explanation of this silence lies in the 
Tact that the Epistles are, for the author of the Apology and the Dia 
logue, mere literary works and not as yet Church books. The Didache, 
the Shepherd of Hermas, and the Epistle of Barnabas show no certain 
evidence of acquaintance with the Pauline Epistles. 

6 Tertullian adversus Marcionem, bk. v., goes through the Epistles 
of Paul as used by Marcion in those " Antitheses " which are now 
lost to us. 



THE MARCIONITE TEXT 129 

and proves to be the better, this would show that the 
Epistles passed from the hands of the Gnostics into that 
of the Church, and underwent in the process an expansion 
of a certain " tendency." 

In the hope of showing this, van Manen in the year 
1887 reconstructed the Marcionite text of the Epistle to 
the Galatians. 1 In regard to the other Epistles he does 
not attempt this, as Tertullian s indications are in 
sufficient. 

The examination of the internal arguments takes the 
following form. These " Ultra-Tubingen " critics analyse 
the letters and point out all the difficulties which come 
to light in the course of exegetical study. They triumph 
antly establish the fact that there are many seams and 
divisions between the various verses and sections, that 
an ethico-mystical doctrine is found alongside of the 
juridical doctrine of justification, that the view of the 
law is subject to remarkable vacillations, and that it is 
not possible to weld together the different parts of the 
Epistles to the Romans and Corinthians, to determine the 
proper address of the Epistle to the Galatians, whether 
to the district or the province, to decide whether Romans 
presupposes Jewish-Christian or Gentile-Christian readers, 
and various questions of that kind. 

The next point is to discover, if possible, some kind of 
system in the difficulties, inconsistencies, and contra 
dictions. Steck and van Manen profess to be able to 
show that there is such a system. 

What the letters tell us regarding the conversion, 
the life and work of Paul is not, according to them, to be 
considered earlier and more authentic than Acts, but is 

1 Theologisch Tijdschrift, 1887, pp. 382-533, " Marcions Brief van 
Paulus aan de Galatiers." The text thus arrived at is given on pp. 
528-533. 

Van Manen is also inclined to hold that early Church witnesses 
may be found for a shorter recension of Romans. See Die Unechtheit 
des Romerbriefs, 94-100. 

A reconstruction of the Marcionite text of Galatians had already 
been undertaken by Adolf Hilgenfeld, Der Galaterbrief, 1852, 239 pp., 
pp. 218-234. He holds that it was not the original but a mutilated 
form. 



130 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

based on information which either coincides with the 
reports there given or points to an earlier common source. 
The material supplied by Acts is worked up in the letters 
under the influence of a tendency. 

The existence of a written Gospel is also implied. All 
the passages in the Epistles which recall sayings of the 
Lord, and what the Epistles to the Corinthians in par 
ticular have to tell us about the institution of the Lord s 
Supper and the resurrection of Jesus, make, they think, 
the impression of having been drawn from Luke, or 
an earlier Gospel which is one of his sources. Steck 
and van Manen are even inclined to hold that in Rom. 
ii. 16 and xvi. 25 the words " my Gospel " refer to a 
written Gospel, as indeed the Church Fathers also 
thought. 

That the four main Epistles cannot all be from the 
same hand is, they think, manifest from the differences 
between them. Further, the order in which they were 
written can, these writers think, be recognised. This 
order does not agree with that generally accepted, since 
the Epistle to the Galatians is not placed before 
Corinthians and Romans, but concludes the series. 
Steck endeavours to give a detailed proof that it was 
written after Romans and presupposes the latter. Where- 
ever in Galatians there appear gaps and obscurities, a 
glance at Romans always, he affirms, gives the desired 
explanation. The more strongly the opposition to the law 
comes to expression, the later is the writing in question to 
be placed in the series of the Pauline writings, in which a 
development is traceable. 

Another point to which the " Ultra-Tubingen " critics 
attach importance is to discover criteria by which various 
strata can be distinguished in the main Epistles themselves. 
They propose to regard the Epistles to the Corinthians as 
fragments of Pauline literature which have gradually 
been worked up together into letters. In regard to 
the letter to the Romans, van Manen holds that it 
originally consisted, roughly speaking, of chapters 



" TIME AND SPACE " 131 

i.-viii., and was only gradually extended to its present 
form. 1 

It is also, these critics consider, certain that a number 
of hands have been at work on the letters, and that 
the increasingly anti- Jewish tendency shows us the 
direction followed by the efforts of the Pauline school. 

Steck and van Manen assume that the teaching re 
presented in the Epistles is of a Greek character. They 
think they can show that the Pauline school were in 
fluenced by Philo and Seneca, and seek to explain Paulin- 
ism as an " attempt to spiritualise primitive Christianity." 

Essentially, they think, it belongs to Gnosticism, since 
it sets aside the " authority of tradition " and derives 
all knowledge, without historical mediation, from the 
revelation of the Spirit, and conceives of this knowledge 
as a system. The deification of Jesus Christ which is 
represented in the letters is also to be regarded as Greek 
and Gnostic. 

By these observations Steck and van Manen are 
inevitably led to the decisive consideration regarding 
" time and space." 

Could a Christology of this kind come into being a 
few years orily~after the death of the historical Jesus ? 
Is an intense anti- Judaism in primitive Christian times 
intelligible ? Can Greek, Gnostical ideas be assumed to 
have existed in the first generation ? 

Steck and van Manen deny that this is possible and 
demand a longer period for the transformation of which 
the evidence lies before us. Therefore the historic Paul, 

1 Even the letter consisting of chapters i.-viii. is not, according to 
van Manen, all of a piece, as is evident, he thinks, from the complicated 
opening salutation, the vacillating use of " Jesus Christ " and Christ 
Jesus," and other peculiarities of detail. One or more treatises on 
justification by faith, on the equal importance of the Gospel for 
Jews and Gentiles, on the significance of the law, on the sense in which 
believers are entitled to call Abraham their father even if they are 
not by birth of his posterity may have formed the basis of the longer 
writing. Its close was probably formed by Rom. xv. 14-33. Later 
on, the essays which we have in chapters ix.-xi., xii.-xiv. and xv.-xvi. 
were worked in. The Epistle is supposed to have undergone several 
successive redactions. 



132 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

if there ever was such a man, as is almost certainly the 
case, was not the creator of the Paulinism represented 
by the Epistles. 

How, then, is the origin of the letters and the doctrine 
to be explained ? 

On the basis of the facts which they observe in the 
documents, and the consideration regarding the necessity 
of time and space, the " Ultra-Tubingen " critics throw 
out the following hypothesis. 

Christianity, they hold, remained at first Jewish. But 
as time went on, and as it spread beyond Palestine, two 
different tendencies manifested themselves within it. 
One, as the result of contact with Gentiles, and no doubt 
in consequence of the destruction of the Jewish State, 
moved in the direction of attaching less and less import 
ance to the law, while the other maintained the older 
stand-point. 

In general the development, due to the influence of 
Graeco-Roman ideas, proceeded without a struggle. Its 
goal was a " Catholicism " such as meets us in Justin."" 

Within this " Gnostic " party, however, there appeared 
a school which put the question of the relation to Judaism 
and the law in its most trenchant form, as a question 
of principle, and sought to bring it to a decisive issue. 

Somewhere or other perhaps in the Roman Church, 
perhaps in several places at the same time where Gnostics 
and representatives of the older view were at odds, an 
open conflict broke out. The former party fought with 
literary weapons, dating back the controversy by means of 
an epistolary literature specially created for the purpose 
into primitive Christian times. 

In the course of the struggle the antithesis became 
more and more acute. The climax is marked by the 
Epistle to the Galatians. Here a " Gnostic " endeavours, 
with the aid of the already existing Pauline literature, 
and depending more particularly on Romans, to defend 
the stand-point of liberal Gentile Christianity against a 
" Jewish Christianity " which, as it seems, was " making 



THE RADICAL HYPOTHESIS 133 

headway." " With all the force of his intellectual 
superiority " he scourges the tendencies of a period 
which was endeavouring to make Christianity once 
more Jewish. 

The form of a letter to the Galatians was given to the 
work, according to Steck s hypothesis, " because the 
literary genre of Apostolic letters held an established 
position ; and since the churches at Rome and Corinth 
already had their Epistles, the Galatian province, familiar 
in connexion with the first missionary journey in Acts, 
suggested itself as the appropriate scene of the struggle, 
since it was there that the Apostle had first had to suffer 
from the persecutions of the Jews. As the Epistle to the 
Galatians followed on the three other main epistles, and 
the Epistle to the Romans had already selected as its 
time and place the last visit of the Apostle to Corinth, 
shortly before his arrest at Jerusalem, the time of the 
Roman imprisonment suggested itself as the situation of 
the writer to be implied in the Epistle. During his 
imprisonment Paul receives news of the threatened, and 
in part already accomplished, falling away of the Galatian 
churches from his Gospel, and feeling himself about to 
take leave of the world he directs to the wavering 
churches this letter as the purest and most intense 
expression of his heart and mind." 

The main Epistles originated about the years 120-140. 
The elements from which they are worked up may be 
ten or twenty years earlier. A final redaction may have 
taken place even subsequently to 140. 

Why, exactly, the school of thought which created this 
literature took Paul as its patron, it is, according to 
van Manen, impossible to explain. He holds that the 
historic Apostle had as little to do with Paulinism as 
John the Apostle with the theology of the Fourth Gospel. 
Steck, on the other hand, is inclined to admit the historical 
justification of this connexion. For him, it is to be held 
as certain that Paul was the first to " open the door of the 
Christian salvation freely to the Gentiles." The doctrine 



134 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

of justification by faith must therefore already in some 
shape or other have formed part of his preaching. Only 
the strictly systematic and sharply anti- Jewish develop 
ment of the doctrine was supplied by the later school. 

Steck is therefore here, as on some other points, more 
conservative and less " critical " than van Manen. 
Nevertheless the differences are not very noticeable in 
comparison with the extent of the views which they share. 

Theology of the post-Baur period generally had 
ignored Bruno Bauer ; it would willingly have treated 
in the same way those who took up his work again. 
Since this was not possible, and references to " wild 
hypotheses " and " rash, wrong-headed critics " did not 
completely suffice to dispose of them, the authorities 
great and small had necessarily to undertake a refutation, 
which they prudently confined to the most pressing and 
the easiest points. 

The discussions were for the most part carried on in 
periodicals. A work on the other side of an importance 
at all corresponding to those of Loman, Steck, and van 
Manen was not forthcoming. 1 

1 Steck in the introduction to his work gives references to the 
articles which had appeared up to 1888. The chronicles of the follow 
ing years appear in van Manen. At the head of the counter-movement 
among critics in Holland stood J. H. Scholten. His work, Historisch- 
critische Bijdragen naar Aanleiding van de nieuweste Hypothese aan- 
gaande Jesus en den Paulus der vier Hoofdbrieven (" Contributions to 
Historical Criticism with Reference to the latest Hypotheses regarding 
Jesus and the Paul of the four main Epistles "), 1882, 118 pp., is directed 
against Loman s arguments. 

From the German literature we may cite G. Heinrici, Die Forschun- 
gen uber die paulinischen Briefe : ihr gegenwdrtiger Stand und ihre 
Aufgaben ("The Study of the Pauline Letters; its present Position, 
and Task ") . Lectures given before the theological conference at Giessen, 
1886, pp. 69-120. Wilhelm Bruckner, Die chronologische Reihenfolge, 
in welcher die Briefe des Neuen Testaments verfasst sind (" The Chrono 
logical Order in which the Epistles of the New Testament were written "), 
1890, 306 pp. (An essay which received the prize offered for the 
treatment of this question by the Teylerian Society of Haarlem.) 
"On the Chronological Order of the Four main Epistles, pp. 174-203. 
Carl Clemen, Die Chronologie der paulinischen Briefe, 1893, 292 pp. 
By the same writer, Die Einheitlichkeit der paulinischen Briefe ("The 
Integrity of the Pauline Epistles "), 1894, 183 pp. 

In these writings Clemen makes some concessions to the Ultra- 
Tubingen critics. Thus, for example, he is prepared to put Galatians 
after Romans and Corinthians. The mediating views here offered, 



THE CRITICS CRITICISED 135 

How far is it possible to refute their view ? 

In the domain of the external arguments, the main 
strength of the revolutionaries, the position is not so 
favourable to them as Loman wished to represent it. The 
transference of the first Epistle of Clement to the middle 
of the second century is not possible. 1 The fact that 
Justin knew and used Paul s writings, while he does not 
name him, is not explained by the hypothesis that they 
did not rank for him as Church writings. 2 

The Marcionite text of Galatians reconstructed by 
van Manen is not better but worse than the canonical text. 3 
If the Ignatian letters, as is now generally held, are genuine, 
the attestation of the Pauline Epistles is in much better 
case than was formerly supposed. That Acts says nothing 
about the literary activity of the Apostle has at most the 
value of an avgumentum e silentio. It is not otherwise 
in regard to the fact that Acts has nothing to say of 
the conflicts between him and his churches. In regard to 
the question of priority as between its narrative and that of 
Galatians there is at least nothing certain to be said. 

The position of matters is therefore that the Epistles 
to the Romans and Corinthians are witnessed to by the 
first Epistle of Clement at the end of the first century, but 
that neither the legitimate nor the illegitimate representa- 



though sometimes interesting, need nevertheless no longer occupy us, 
as Clemen has in the meantime completely recovered his confidence 
and has contradicted himself. In the first volume of his Paulus (1904, 
416 pp., examination of the sources) he pronounces that the four main 
epistles are to be regarded as entirely genuine, if only we may divide 
the second Epistle to the Corinthians into four. In addition to I 
Thessalonians and Philippians, even Colossians and -2. Thessalonians 
are to be regarded as from the Apostle s pen. 

In the preface the author begs that he may not be held accountable 
for his views prior to his Damascus. 

The second volume of the work, Paulus. Sein Leben und Werken, 
1904, 339 pp., is in biographical form, and does not enter further into 
the problems of the doctrine. 

A writer who takes the " Ultra-Tubingen " side is J. Friedrich 
(Maehliss). In his work entitled Die Unechtheit des Galaterbriefs (" The 
Spuriousness of Galatians"), 1891, 67 pp., he defends both the rights 
of radical criticism and of a " simplified orthography." 

1 See p. 128, sup. 2 See p. 128, sup. 

3 See p. 129, sup. 



136 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

tives of the Tiibingen tradition can explain why Justin 
and the remaining writers of the beginning of the second 
century are not under the influence of these Epistles, 
and, with the exception of Clement, do not even mention 
them. 

The hypothesis brought forward by Steck and van 
Manen in regard to different strata within the Epistles 
and the development which culminates in the antinomian- 
ism of the Epistle to the Galatians cannot be proved from 
the texts ; the evidence is read into them by the exercise 
of great ingenuity. 

But the negative observation which formed their 
starting-point holds its ground. Ordinary exegesis has 
not succeeded in getting rid of the illogical transitions 
and contradictions and making Paul s arguments really 
intelligible. The impression of a certain disconnected 
ness is not to be denied. But Steck and van Manen 
have not succeeded in discovering the law and order 
which ought to prevail in it, and showing how the chaos 
arose in connexion with the creation of this literature. 

Against the hypothesis of the origin of Paulinism in 
the second century there lies the objection that it is built 
on purely arbitrary assumptions. Whence do Steck and 
van Manen know anything about anti - Jewish con 
flicts taking place at that time ? There is no evidence of 
any such thing in the contemporary literature ; and the 
writings of the apostolic Fathers make quite in the 
contrary direction. 

On the other hand, the general considerations which 
led them to adopt this hypothesis have not been in any 
way invalidated. The illegitimate Tubingen critics share 
with the legitimate school the presupposition that Paulin 
ism signifies a Hellenisation of the Gospel ; they are also 
at one with their adversaries in regarding this unproved 
and unprovable assumption as proved. The difference 
is that they do not follow the others in their second 
exhibition of naivete that of regarding this Greek 
religious faith as being coincident with primitive Christi- 



BAUR AND BAUER 137 

anity, but demand space and time for a development of 
this character. But the two wrestlers have the same 
chain about their feet ; whichever of them throws the 
other into the water must drown along with him. 

That they are both involved in the same fundamental 
view of Paulinism sometimes comes to the consciousness 
of the post-Baur theology and its radical opponents. 
In a momentary aberration of this kind Heinrici ventures 
to praise Bruno Bauer for having discovered the relation 
ship of Paul to the religious life of the ancient world, 
and is prepared to see his weakness only in the inferences 
which he draws from this discovery. 1 

Steck, on his part, praises Heinrici s commentary 
on the Epistles to the Corinthians, in which the Hellenistic 
element is so excellently traced, and expresses the hope 
that the exegete and his party will consider carefully 
whether the composition of this work " does not stand 
in an even much closer relationship to Hellenism than had 
previously been supposed." 

The more the theologians who derive from Baur 
emphasise the Greek element in Paulinism the more 
helpless they are against the " Ultra-Tubingen " critics. 
For it is after all merely a matter of clearness and courage 
of thought whether they venture to raise the question 
about space and time. The moment they take this step 
they are lost. Nevermore can they find the way which 
leads back through the green pastures of sound common- 
sense theology, but are condemned to wander about 
with the revolutionaries in the wilderness of flat unreason. 
Wearied with problems, they come at last, like Steck and 
van Manen, to a condition of mind in which the wildest 
hypothesis appeals to them more than rational knowledge, 
if the latter demands the suppression of questioning. 

How is it conceivable that a man of the primitive 
Christian period could, in consequence of a purely practical 
controversy regarding the observance or non-observance 
of the law by Gentile believers, go on, as Baur and 

1 See pp. 114 and 115 of the work cited above, p. 134. 



138 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

his successors represent to reject the law on principle ? 
How could it be possible that, at that time, doctrine 
should take a frankly Gnostic shape, and in deliberate 
contempt of the tradition of the historic Jesus, should, 
under the eyes of the men who had been His companions, 
appeal only to revelation ? 

That is the element of greatness in the " Ultra- 
Tubingen " critics, that they did not forget the duty of 
asking questions, when it had fallen out of fashion among 
other theologians. To show that their hypothesis is 
untenable is by no means to get rid of it, as accredited 
theology wished to persuade itself. A few squadrons of 
cavalry which were skirmishing in the open have been 
cut off ; the fortress has not been taken, indeed the siege 
has not even been laid. 

The chronicle of the discussion between contemporary 
theology and the revolutionaries is quite without interest. 
As soon as the refutation on points of detail was finished, 
and the fundamental questions regarding time and place 
came on the scene, there remained nothing for it to do 
but to stammer, with an embarrassed smile, something 
about tradition, intuition, an unmistakable impression, 
the stamp of genuineness, and the like, and to break off 
the conversation as quickly as might be. 

What it could or could not refute, and what the other 
party could or could not prove, followed necessary from 
the form which the problem had assumed. The con 
struction of the illegitimate Tubingen critics answers, in 
reverse, to that of the legitimate school, like the reflection 
in a mirror to the object reflected. The presuppositions 
and the difficulties are the same in the two cases ; the 
two solutions correspond except that they go in opposite 
directions. Both recognise that not only a conflict of 
practice, but one involving theory and principle, for and 
against the law, is fought out in the letters. The legiti 
mate school place it in primitive Christian times, but 
cannot show how it was possible at that period, and how 
it could break off so suddenly that in the post-Pauline 



REVERSE DILEMMAS 139 

literature there is not an echo of it, and it seems as though 
it had never been. 

The illegitimate school represent the struggle as 
having occurred in the course of the second century, but 
can cite no evidence for this from the remaining literature, 
can point to no traces of the gradual growth of the opposi 
tion, or show how a struggle of that kind could break out 
at that time. 

Both explanations labour in vain at the problem of the 
inexplicable neglect of Paulinism in the post-Apostolic 
literature. 

Both parties assume as a datum that the doctrine of 
the letters is to be considered as a Hellenised Christianity. 
The one party represents the process which leads to this 
result as taking place in primitive Christian times, without 
being able to show how such a thing is possible, or how 
the Greek and the Jewish-eschatological elements mutu 
ally tolerated and united with one another. 

According to the other party, the Hellenisation came 
about in the course of a long development. But they 
cannot explain why Paulinism shows an entirely different 
character from that of the Greek Christianity which 
appears elsewhere in the literature of the second century. 
They assert that it belongs to Gnosticism ; and are right 
in this so far as regards the form of the system. On the 
other hand they cannot allow themselves to consider 
seriously the difference between the doctrine of the letters 
and the fundamental views of the known Gnostic schools, 
or the hypothesis flies in pieces. The Gnostics were 
real spiritualists, opposed to eschatology, and denying a 
corporeal resurrection ; Paul is an eschatologist, looking -, 
for the parousia and the transformation of the body. 
Therefore the " Ultra-Tubingen " critics must either 
explain the Jewish eschatological element in the system 
in such a way as to spiritualise it, or else drop it out 
of sight. 

And as a matter of fact the ominous word eschatology 
is, one might almost say, never mentioned in their works. 



140 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

The parallel between what the one and the other 
construction can and cannot make intelligible goes through 
to the last detail. For both it is true that the ostensible 
solution in each case introduces openly or otherwise a 
new problem which arises out of the solution itself. 
The sum of what is explained and unexplained is the same 
for both. 

At first sight the position of the legitimate successors 
of the Tubingen school is more favourable than that of 
the other party. They have tradition and natural 
impression on their side, and are able to regard the 
situation implied in the Epistles as historic, whereas their 
opponents are bound to show that it is fictitious. When 
subjected to critical examination, however, they are no 
better off, for they cannot give any proof that the main 
epistles can belong to primitive Christianity and to it only. 
When they declared again and again that the attacks of 
the radicals had served a useful purpose in inciting them 
to examine anew their results, and to make corrections 
where necessary, that was the mere cant of criticism. 
If they had dared to make an effort to understand the 
objection which Loman, Steck, and van Manen constantly 
repeated, and to consider whether they could really prove 
the Pauline origin of the main epistles, or whether they 
did not really by their conception of the doctrine make it 
improbable, they would have been bound to perceive 
that nothing could be done by revising and correcting ; 
it was a case of mutually exclusive alternatives. 

As matters stood, they had to choose between being 
consistent but irrational, or rational but inconsistent. 
They chose the latter form of the dilemma and left the 
other to the radicals. 

The Ultra-Tubingen critics on their part cannot escape 
the blame of raising the question in a one-sided purely 
literary form, and not concerning themselves with the 
thought contained in the Epistles, because they felt that 
herein lay the weak point of their undertaking. Instead 
of analysing the system, they made play with the catch- 



THEORIES OF INTERPOLATION 141 

words Greek and Gnostic, and thought to have got rid 
in that way of the question regarding the essential char 
acter of Paulinism. If contemporary theology did not 
grasp the problem which was presented to it in its full 
significance, that was partly due to the pettifogging way 
in which it was formulated. The representatives of 
radical criticism were like criminals who cannot rise to 
the height of their crime ! 

For a time it almost looked as if a modus Vivendi 
had been found between the successors of Baur s school 
and the radicals. Steck, who stood on the right wing of 
the revolutionaries, refused to give up the belief that the 
historic Paul had in some way or other fought a battle 
for freedom from the law, and might be indirectly claimed 
as the starting-point of the theology which reaches its 
full development in the Epistles. From this it was 
only a short step to the hypothesis that the Epistles 
were not wholly spurious but combined thoughts of the 
Apostle with later views. 

A criticism based on the distinction of original and 
interpolated elements did not need to be now for the first 
time called into being. It already existed, and had 
indeed made its appearance contemporaneously with 
Bruno Bauer s. Like the latter it had been either talked 
down or left to die of neglect. 

In the first volume of his " Philosophic Dogmatic " 
(1855), when speaking of the documentary sources of our 
knowledge of Christianity, Christian Hermann Weisse de 
fines his attitude towards the Pauline Epistles and offers 
the results of a study extending over many years, which 
he had undertaken in opposition to the conservatives on 
the one side and the Tubingen school on the other. 1 

His method he himself describes as criticism based on 
style. A man like Paul, he argues, has so characteristic 
a literary style that it will serve one who has made himself 

1 Christian Hermann Weisse, Phihsophische Dogmatik oder Philo 
sophic des Christentums, 3 vols., 1855, 60, 62 ; vol. i., 712 pp. On the 
Pauline Epistles, pp. 144-147. 



142 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

thoroughly familiar with it as an unfailing criterion of 
what is genuine and what is not. Such a method of 
criticism must of course be prepared to be accused of 
arbitrariness and subjectivity. But that is no great 
matter. The fruits will vouch for the goodness of the 
tree. 

The standard of indubitably genuine Pauline style is 
furnished, according to Weisse, by the First Epistle to 
the Corinthians. It bears in all its parts the stamp of 
the most complete integrity and genuineness. The eye 
which has acquired due fineness of perception by the 
study of this writing discovers that only the Second 
Epistle to the Corinthians, the First to the Thessalonians, 
and that to Philemon, " can boast of preserving in the 
same purity the original apostolic text." The Epistles 
to the Romans, Galatians, Philippians, and Colossians 
" have interwoven in them a regular series of inter 
polations, which so far efface the genuine apostolic 
character of the style in many places as to render it un 
recognisable, and have given rise to that difficulty of 
disentangling the meaning which has made Romans 
especially a crux interpretum, and by the forced artificiality, 
intrinsic falsity, and unnaturalness of these interpretations 
has made this Epistle the bane of theological study ; of 
which, in virtue of the character of its fundamental ideas, 
it was fitted to be the most precious treasure." l 

The whole of these interpolations are, he thinks, from 
one and the same hand, and go back to a time previous 
to the ecclesiastical use of the writings. The redactor 
cherished withal the most respectful awe of the Apostle s 
words, and has hardly deleted a single one of them. 

What remains after the elimination of the secondary 
stratum in the Epistles to the Romans and Philippians 

1 On Romans see also vol. iii. of the Philosophische Dogmatik (1862, 
736 pp.). PP- 263, 264. 

The Epistle to the Ephesians, the Second to the Corinthians, and 
the First to Timothy, Weisse holds to be " entirely unapostolic " ; in 
the Epistle to Titus and the Second to Timothy he is prepared to 
recognise as a possibility the genuineness of the personal notices. 



WEISSE AND VOLTER 143 

does not prove to be an integral whole. The latter 
consists of two letters to this church, the second beginning 
with iii. 3. With the former there has been worked up a 
letter to a church in Asia Minor, consisting of ix.-xi. and 
xvi. 1-20. l 

Weisse did not get the length of publishing the re 
constructed text of the Epistles. When his pupil Sulze 
carried it through after his death, 2 the prophecy which 
the author had put on record in his " Dogmatics " re 
garding his undertaking was fulfilled. It met with 
" universal disbelief." 

In part the cause of this ill-success lay in the one- 
sidedness of the principle maintained by the author. 
Weisse confines himself entirely to " stylistic criticism." 
While he recognises the possibility of a distinction between 
genuine and spurious based on the contents, the trains of 
thought, of the letters, he will have nothing to do with it. 

With the controversy about the genuineness of the 
main Epistles there began a new era of " interpolation 
criticism." Daniel Volter, rendered confident by the 
professedly " assured results " of the criticism of the 
Apocalypse in regard to the distinction of sources, thinks 
to find in a similar procedure the solution of the Pauline 
problem, and hopes that it will be possible by " careful 
criticism " to separate the genuine from the spurious. 3 

He differs entirely from Weisse in seeking the criterion 
for the distinction of what is genuine from what is spurious 
in the subject-matter. What is simple and " plain " 

1 In 2 Corinthians, which shows no evidence of interpolation, 
three different letters to this church are worked up together. 

2 Christian Hermann Weisse, Beitrdge zur Kritik der paulinischen 
Briefe an die Galater, Romer, Philipper und Kolosser (" Contributions 
to the Criticism of the Pauline Epistles to the Galatians, Romans, 
Philippians, and Colossians ") . Edited by E. Sulze, 1867, 65 pp. By 
way of introduction the pupil prefixes an essay on the principles of 
his master s " stylistic criticism." 

In the reconstructed texts it is apparent that the author had spent 
on them, as he says in his Dogmatic, the " diligent work of many years." 
It is a piece of really skilled workmanship. 

3 Daniel Volter, Die Entstehung der Apokalypse, 1882, 72 pp. Die 
Komposition der paulinischen Hauptbriefe, 1890, 174 pp. The Epistles 
examined are those to the Romans and Galatians. Paulus und seine 
Briefe. Kritische Untersuchungen zu einer neuen Grundlegung der 



144 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

the latter expression recurs again and again is to be 
regarded as primitive-Christian and Pauline, but anything 
which has the appearance of being complicated or having 
the character of a speculative system is to be regarded 
as of later origin. 

Thus wherever we find a highly developed Christology, 
speculations regarding the Spirit, and eschatology, strongly 
predestinarian views, and an advanced estimate of 
baptism and the Lord s Supper, we are, according to 
Volter, in the presence of interpolations. A further 
mark by which these may be recognised is an advanced 
antinomianism. 

The doctrine of the historic Paul includes, according 
to this author, the following points : The central point 
in it is the death of Christ, regarded as an atoning death 
appointed by God and ratified by the resurrection. 
Man becomes partaker of its fruits by faith, and thus 
obtains justification by the forgiveness of sins, of which 
lie is given assurance by the testimony of the Holy Spirit. 
Faith also includes within it, however, a " mystico-ethical 
partaking in the death of Christ." Therefore in the act 
of faith there takes place at the same time an inner 
conversion to a life well-pleasing to God, which causes 
the believer " to appear blameless on the day of Christ 
and makes him a partaker in the resurrection." 

As regards the relation of the Epistle to the Galatians 
to Acts Volter takes over the conclusions, unfavourable 
to the former, of the radical critics. Consequently this 
work is spurious throughout. It only reproduces the 
ideas of the interpolators of the letters to the Romans 
and Corinthians, and pushes to an extreme the anti 
nomianism there represented. It dates from near the 
end of the first century. 

paulinischen Briefliteratur und ihrer Theologie, 1905, 331 pp. Here he 
deals with Corinthians, Romans, Galatians, and Philippians. The 
results arrived at in the previous book are, as a rule, taken over. Volter 
rejects the genuineness of i Thessalonians, and sees in the letters to the 
Colossians and Ephesians, and in the Pastorals, new " phases in the 
development " of Paulinism. 



VOLTER S THEORY 145 

In the Epistles to the Corinthians we are still follow 
ing Volter the interpolations are not very extensive. 
The most important is the correction applied to the 
original Pauline doctrine of resurrection, in 2 Corinthians 
iv. and v., where the redactor has worked in his Platonico- 
Stoic doctrine of immortality. 

The Epistle to the Romans has been very extensively 
interpolated. 1 The original writing was addressed to 
Gentile readers. The interpolator, on the other hand, has 
in view readers " who occupy an Old Testament stand 
point." That is connected with the far-reaching de 
velopment which began at Rome after the Neronian 
persecution. At that time, as is proved, Volter thinks, 
by the Epistle to the Hebrews and the Epistle of 
Barnabas, together with the first Epistle of Clement and 
the Shepherd of Hernias, the Church at Rome " fell 
back upon a religious stand-point determined by Old 
Testament ideas." It is this " reduction of Christianity 
to Jewish Old Testament religion, modified by Chris 
tianity," that the interpolator is concerned to combat. 
In doing so he is forced to enter upon general specula 
tions regarding the flesh, sin, and the law ; in order " to 
defend the independence and superiority of Christianity " 
he develops an antinomianism, according to which the 
law had as its sole purpose, " by intensifying the misery 
of sin, to prepare men for deliverance from sin and the 
law, by the redemption which is in Jesus Christ. " 

Volter s work is one of the adroitest performances 
in the whole field of Pauline study. It is not only that 
it represents what is in its own way a brilliant synthesis 
between Weisse and the radicals ; its main significance 

1 In its original form it consisted, Volter thinks, of the following 
sections: i. I, 50-7, 8-17; v. 1-12, 15-19, 21 ; vi. 1-13, 16-23; chapters 
xii. and xiii. ; xiv. i-xv. 6; xv. 14-16, 230-33 ; xvi. 21-24. 

2 Volter is also able to indicate additions which have taken place 
subsequently to this redaction. 

The interpolations in Philippians relate, according to him, chiefly 
to Christology and eschatology. The author of these additions had 
before him Romans and Corinthians in their interpolated form, and 
was also doubtless acquainted with Galatians. 

10 



146 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

lies in the fact that it breaks off the barren literary- 
critical logomachy, and directs attention once more to 
the subject-matter. 

Steck and van Manen had failed, once they went 
beyond the simple registration of inconcinnities in the 
text ; Volter lets the theological problems have something 
to say for themselves. He observes more clearly than 
any one had stated it before exactly wherein the com 
plexity of the question of the law consists, and rightly 
refers it to the fact that some passages take for 
granted its observance by the Jews as unquestionably 
right and proper, and only seek to maintain the 
freedom of the Gentiles in regard to it, whereas others 
reject it in principle, in such a way that Paul would be 
obliged to maintain also the emancipation of the Jews . . . 
if the rules of logical inference are to be applied. As it 
is, however, there is a want of congruence between the 
negative theory and the limitation of the practical 
demand. 

In an equally thoroughgoing fashion Volter deals with 
the problems of Christology and of the doctrine of the 
Spirit, and eschatology. 

His solution is ingenious and elegant. Of the hypo 
thesis which places the controversies about the law in the 
post-apostolic period only so much is taken over as is 
absolutely necessary. The connexion between Paulinism 
and Gnosticism is made as loose as possible. The eschato 
logy has a certain importance given to it. Hellenic 
elements are not assumed to be present in the primitive 
doctrine ; on the other hand, a knowledge of the Book of 
Wisdom, Philo, Seneca and the Graeco-Roman philosophy 
in general is ascribed to the interpolators. 

The criterion by which to distinguish what is genuine 
from what is not is ingeniously chosen. It is not par 
ticularly difficult to separate in the letters the parts 
which are mainly plain and practical from those which 
relate to an antinomian speculative system. The resulting 
division between original text and interpolations has a 



CRITICISM OF VOLTER 147 

more natural and simple air than is the case in any of the 
other attempts to draw the line between them. 

Nevertheless, it was scarcely possible that this work 
should contribute anything to the solution of the Pauline 
problem. It is built upon sand, for the argument on 
which everything is based is unsound. 

Volter asserts that " simplicity " is the mark of what 
is genuinely apostolic and Pauline. Since when ? How 
does he know this ? How, if it were just the other way 
round, and the strange, the abstruse, the systematic, 
the antinomian, the predestinarian represented the 
original element, and what is simple came in later ! 

What he describes as the doctrine of the historic Paul 
has not a very convincing look. It has not the ring of 
what we find elsewhere in early Christian literature, 
but has a suspicious resemblance to the Good Friday 
and Easter-day meditations of the Christliche Welt. 1 

What does not strike the modern man and his theology 
as distinctly peculiar is gathered together and receives 
the stamp of approval as historic Paulinism ! Volter, 
like every one else, has failed to consider, or to grasp, 
that fundamental question as to what is primitive- 
Christian in the Apostle s teaching, which, since the 
encounter between Baur and Ritschl, had tacitly 
dominated the discussion and had been again forced 
on the theological centre-party by the radicals. Otherwise 
it would have been impossible that he, after promising a 
" cautious criticism," should have so incautiously decided 
that what is simple is what is primitive-Christian. 

Apart from Volter, the criticism which claims to 
distinguish various sources and detect interpolations 
is of a more innocent and guileless description. It does 
not plunge into the depths of the Pauline problems 
in the attempt to reach the firm ground that has never 
yet been reached, but amuses itself by determining 
what and how many original writings of the Apostle may 
have been worked up into the canonical Epistles to the 
1 The well-known German religious journal. 



148 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

Corinthians, Romans, and Philippians. This work, at 
which Semler had already made a beginning, is in itself 
necessary and interesting. The results, however, prove 
to be uncertain and contradictory, because the criteria 
by which the deletions, dissections, and combinations are 
determined, are always derived from subjective im 
pression. 

The one consolation in regard to them is that any 
importance which attaches to these results concerns 
almost exclusively the pre-canonical literary history of 
the Epistles and does not affect our knowledge of the 
Pauline system. The supposed interpolations are of a 
subsidiary character. The text as a whole is hardly 
seriously affected by them. The sense is scarcely altered 
by the dislocations and conflations by which one critic 
or another restores the original letters and releases the 
present-day reader from the tutelage of the so incon 
ceivably astute redactor. 

It remains to remark that most of the scholars who 
have occupied themselves with this work do not trouble 
themselves very much about the meaning and the 
connexion of Paul s statements, but are like surgeons 
who think more of their skill in handling the knife than 
of being quite sure about the diagnosis which is to direct 
the incision, and therefore not seldom fall victims to the 
temptation of having recourse to an operation in cases 
where it turns out to have been unnecessary or even 
injurious. 1 

As a work which stands much above the average of 

1 The labour of making an inventory of what has been done in this 
kind of criticism up to the year 1894 was undertaken by C. Clemen 
in his work, Die Einheitlichkeit der paulinischen Briefe an der Hand 
der bisher mit Bezug auf sie aufgestellten Interpolations- und Kompila- 
tionshypothesen (" The Integrity of the Pauline Epistles, with Reference 
to the Hypotheses of Interpolation or Compilation which have been 
applied to them"), 1894, 183 pp. He takes account also of all con 
tributions to the Journals. This gives a special value to this laborious 
and unselfish work. 

A survey of previous work in conjectural criticism is given by 
J. M. S. Baljon in De Tekst der Brieven van Paulus aan de Romeinen, 
de Corinthiers en de Galatiers, 1884, 189 pp. 



SPITTA S VIEW OF ROMANS 149 

the usual cutting -up hypotheses we may mention 
Spitta s work on Romans. 1 

He distinguishes in the canonical Epistle two writings, 
a longer one consisting of, in the main allowing for in 
cidental interpolations chapters i.-xi. with fragments 
from xv. and xvi., and a shorter writing which is made up 
of chapters xii., xiii. and xiv., with fragments of xv. and 
xvi. The longer one, which is the older, is supposed to 
have been preserved entire, the shorter is of later origin, 
and it lacks the introduction. 

The problem of the composite character of the main 
epistle in connexion with the address and similar questions, 
is solved by supposing that it is a working up of an earlier 
general treatise intended for Jewish Christians into a 
letter addressed to the Roman Gentile Christians. 

The controversy about the much-discussed series of 
greetings in Rom. xvi. is disposed of by attaching this 
to the shorter epistle, which is held to have been written 
between the first and second imprisonment. It is true 
this solution can only find favour with those who have 
made up their minds to take upon them the burdensome 
hypothesis of the second imprisonment along with the 
complete or partial acceptance of the genuineness of the 
Pastoral epistles. 

In working them up, the redactor is supposed to have 
followed the method of bringing in the arguments of the 
second letter in those places in the first where they seemed 
most appropriate. That he showed no remarkable 
address in this process is credited to him as a proof of 
his historical existence. 

Holtzmann has nothing very complimentary to say 
about the representatives of the dissection and inter 
polation criticism. In his New Testament Theology he 
reproaches them with " straining out the gnat," and 
indulging in critical vivisection, instead of studying the 

1 Friedrich Spitta, Untersuchungen tiber den Brief des Paulus an 
die Romer ("A Study of the Epistle to the Romans"), 1901, 193 pp. 
In the work Zur Geschichte und Literatur des Urchristentums, vol. iii. 
part i. 



150 CRITICAL QUESTIONS AND HYPOTHESES 

currents and undercurrents of Jewish and Hellenistic 
thought which run side by side through Paul s work, and 
so becoming cured of their mania. 

In connexion with this, it is, however, curious that he 
himself, when he was asked why he never lectured on the 
Epistle to the Romans, used to say that the composition 
of Romans was, in his opinion, too problematical for him 
to venture to deal with the Epistle, so long as he was not 
obliged to do so. 



VI 



THE POSITION AT THE BEGINNING OF THE 
TWENTIETH CENTURY 

1899. Paul Feine. Das gesetzesfreie Evangelium des Paulus nach 
seinem Werdegange dargestellt. (Paul s Gospel of Freedom from 
the Law : a Study of its Growth.) 

Paul Wernle. Paulus als Heidenmissionar. (Paul as a Missionary to 
the Gentiles.) 

Heinrich Weinel. Paulus als kirchlicher Organisator. (Paul as a 
Church Organiser.) 

Hermann Jakoby. Neutestamentliche Ethik. (New Testament Ethics.) 

1900. Arthur Titius. Der Paulinismus unter dem Gesichtspunkt 
der Seligkeit. (Paulinism with Special Reference to Final Salvation.) 

A. Drescher. Das Leben Jesu bei Paulus. (The Life of Jesus in 
Paul s Writings.) 

Karl Dick. Der schriftstellerische Plural bei Paulus. (The Literary 
Use of the First Person Plural in Paul s Writings.) 

Adolf Harnack. Das Wesen des Christentums. (Translated under 
the title " What is Christianity ? ") 

1901. Paul Wernle. Die Anfange unserer Religion. (Translated 
under the title " The Beginnings of Christianity.") 

1902. Otto Pfleiderer. Das Urchristentum, seine Schriften und 
Lehren. (Primitive Christianity, its Documents and Doctrines.) 
Second, revised and extended edition. (Translated, 4 vols., London, 
1906-1911.) 

Paul Feine. Jesus Christus und Paulus. 

G. F. Heinrici. Das Urchristentum. (Primitive Christianity.) 

1903. Georg Hollmann. Urchristentum in Corinth. (Primitive Chris 
tianity in Corinth.) 

Emil Sokolowski. Die Begriffe Geist und Leben bei Paulus in ihrer 
Beziehung zu einander. (The Conceptions of " Spirit " and " Life " 
in Paul, in their Relations to one another.) 

Wilhelm Bousset. Die Religion des Judentums im neutestament- 
lichen Zeitalter. (The Religion of Judaism in New Testament 
Times.) Die jiidische Apokalyptik, ihre religionsgeschichtliche 
Herkunft und ihre Bedeutung fur das Neue Testament. (Jewish 
Apocalyptic : its Origin as indicated by Comparative Religion, 
and its Significance for the New Testament.) 



152 NEW CENTURY S PROBLEMS 

Paul Volz. Jiidische Eschatologie von Daniel bis Akiba. (Jewish 
Eschatology from Daniel to Akiba.) 

W. Heitmiiller. Taufe und Abendmahl bei Paulus. (Baptism and 
the Lord s Supper in Paul s Teaching.) 

Martin Bruckner. Die Entstehung der paulinischen Christologie. 
(How the Pauline Christology arose.) 

1904. Heinrich Weinel. Paulus. (E. T. St. Paul : The Man and his 
Work, 1906.) 

Ernst von Dobschutz. Die Probleme des apostolischen Zeitalters. 
(The Problems of the Apostolic Age.) 

Maurice Goguel. L Apotre Paul et Jesus-Christ. 
Alfred Juncker. Die Ethik des Apostels Paulus. 
William Wrede. Paulus. (E. T. by E. Lummis, 1907.) 

1905. Hugo Gressmann. Der Ursprung der israelitisch - judischen 
Eschatologie. (The Origin of the Israelitish-Jewish Eschatology.) 

1906. Paul Feine. Paulus als Theologe. (Paul as a Theologian.) 

P. Kb lbing. Die geistige Einwirkung der Person Jesu auf Paulus. 
(The Spiritual Influence of the Person of Jesus upon Paul.) 

Eberhard Vischer. Die Paulusbriefe. (The Pauline Epistles.) 

Wilhelm Karl. Beitrage zum Verstandnis der soteriologischen Er- 
fahrungen und Spekulationen des Apostels Paulus. (Contributions 
towards the Understanding of the Soteriological Experiences and 
Speculations of the Apostle Paul.) 

W. Bousset. Der Apostel Paulus. 

1907. Adolf Julicher. Paulus und Jesus. 

Arnold Meyer. Wer hat das Christentum gegrundet, Jesus oder 
Paulus ? (Who founded Christianity, Jesus or Paul ?) 

A. Schettler. Die paulinische Formel " Durch Christus." (The 
Pauline Formula " through Christ.") 

J. Wellhausen. Israelitische und jiadische Geschichte (6th ed.). 

1908. Carl Munzinger. Paulus in Corinth. 

Hans Windisch. Die Entsiindigung des Christen nach Paulus. (The 
Purification of the Christian from Sin in Paul s Teaching.) 

Reinhold Seeberg. Dogmengeschichte. (History of Dogma.) 2nd 
edition. 

Wilhelm Walther. Pauli Christentum, Jesu Evangelium. 

1909. Adolf Haraack. Dogmengeschichte. 4th edition. 

Martin Dibelius. Die Geisterwelt im Glauben des Paulus. (The 
World of Spirits according to Paul s Belief.) 

Johannes Weiss. Paulus und Jesus. (E. T. by H. T. Chaytor, 1909.) 
Christus: Die Anfange des Dogmas. (Christ: The Beginning of 
Dogma. E. T. by V. D. Davis, 1911.) 

Johann Haussleiter. Paulus. 
R. Knopf. Paulus. 

W. Olschewski. Die Wurzeln der paulinischen Christologie. (The 
Roots of Pauline Christologie.) 

1910. A. Schlatter. Neutestamentliche Theologie. 



AFTER HOLTZMANN 153 

R. Drescher. Das Leben Jesu bei Paulus. 

Eberhard Vischer. Der Apostel Paulus und sein Werk. 

Julius Schniewind. Die Begriffe Wort und Evangelium bei Paulus 
(The Meaning of the Terms " Word " and " Gospel " in Paul s 
Writings.) 

1911. Adolf Deissmann. Paulus, eine kultur- und religionsgeschicht- 
liche Skizze. (Paul, A Sketch with a Background of Ancient 
Civilisation and Religion.) 

Johannes Muller. Die Entstehung des persSnlichen Christentums der 
paulinischen Gemeinden. (How the personal Christianity of the 
Pauline Churches arose.) 

THE dawn of the twentieth century found Pauline scholar 
ship in a peculiar frame of mind. The criticism of the 
Ultra-Tubingen critics had not succeeded in disquieting 
it, nor Holtzmann in reassuring it. 

That the problems by which Loman, Steck, and van 
Manen were tormented were mere cobwebs of the im 
agination was so completely taken for granted that in 
dealing with the Pauline teaching no further attention was 
paid to them. On the other hand, however, the problems 
previously recognised by critical scholarship had not been 
so completely solved by Holtzmann that they could be 
considered as done with. 

The disquisitions in which in his " New Testament 
Theology " he resumed the results of the whole study of 
the subject since Baur, did not have the effect which he 
had expected. They were much discussed and much 
praised ; the massive learning and wide reading, the art 
of the literary treatment and the subtlety of the dialectic 
compelled admiration. But behind all this chorus of 
appreciation, a certain sense of depression made itself 
felt. People were dismayed to find that Paulinism was 
so complicated, and that the web of Paul s thought must 
be so delicately and cautiously handled if it was to be 
disentangled. Was the doctrine of the Apostle of the 
Gentiles really a product of such extremely intricate 
mental processes as it was here represented to be ? 

The process of disillusionment did not go so far as 
to lead to the calling in question of the fundamental view 
there offered. But results were not put forward with 



154 NEW CENTURY S PROBLEMS 

the same confidence as before ; effort was directed rather 
to strengthen them by revision and correction. 

It was in this frame of mind that Pfleiderer prepared 
the second edition of his " Primitive Christianity." l 
Whereas he had formerly taken for granted the influence 
of the Greek world upon Paul, as being something self- 
evident, he now feels obliged to offer proof of it, in a newly 
inserted chapter upon Hellenism, Stoicism, and Seneca, 
in order to arrive at the result . . . that his Greek educa 
tion was in any case " a problematical possibility." While 
he had previously held that the combination of the 
Alexandrian Platonic doctrine of immortality with 
eschatology was the great work accomplished by the 
Apostle of the Gentiles, he now is inclined to see a spiritu- 
alisation of the future-hope already prepared for in 
Judaism, and quotes the Apocalypse of Ezra and Jewish 
Hellenistic literature in testimony of this. 2 

Fate willed that about the same time theology should 
be seized by the impulse of popularisation, and now 
found itself in the position of being obliged to offer 
assured, absolutely assured, results in reference to Paulin- 
ism. The most important works of this character are 
Paul Wernle s " Beginnings of Christianity " and Heinrich 
Weinel s " Paul." 3 

1 Otto Pfleiderer, Das Urchristentum, seine Schriften und Lehren, 
2nd ed., 1902, vol. i. 696 pp. On Paul, pp. 24-335. (Eng. trans. 
" Primitive Christianity," vol. i. pp. 33-471.) 

2 On this point Pfleiderer follows suggestions given by Teichmann 
in his work, Die paulinischen Vorstellungen von Auferstehung und 
Gericht (" The Pauline Conceptions of Resurrection and Judgment "), 
1896, 125 pp. As a matter of fact he cannot any more than his pre 
decessors give any proof of this evolution. 

3 Paul Wernle, Die Anfdnge unserer Religion, ist ed., 1901, 410 pp. 
On Paul, pp. 95-220. By the same author, Paulus als Heidenmissionar 
(" Paul as a Missionary to the Gentiles ") t Lecture, 1899, 36 pp. Heinrich 
Weinel, Paulus, 1904, 316 pp. The book grew out of essays which 
the author published in the Christliche Welt. By the same author, 
Paulus als kirchlicher Organisator. (Inaugural Lecture.) 1899, 30 pp. 

Other works from this popular literature are : Adolf Harnack, Das 
Wesen des Christentums, 1900, 189 pp. On Paul, pp. 110-118. Georg 
Hollmann, Urchristentum in Corinth, 1903, 32 pp. Paul Feine, Paulus 
als Theologe, 1906, 80 pp. Carl Munzinger, Paulus in Corinth. Neue 
Wege zum Verstdndnis des Urchristentums (" Paul in Corinth. New 
Ways of arriving at an Understanding of Early Christianity.") 1908, 
208 pp. The author pictures the work of the Apostle in the Greek 



ERA OF POPULARISATION 155 

The efforts of these writers are directed to bring the 
author and his thoughts into close relations with our 
time. It is not his theology in its subtleties and its 
contradictions that they seek to grasp and to portray, 
but his religion what lies behind the system and the 
formula. In this way they hope to escape many diffi 
culties over which Holtzmann had laboured, and to be 
able to bring out the fundamental and intelligible elements 
which in him had been rather to seek. 

Wernle makes Paul discourse in the character of the 
great missionary apologist ; Weinel draws him as the 
preacher of the religion of inwardness, who as " Pharisee," 
" Seeker after God," " prophet," " apostle," " founder of 
the Church," " theologian," and " man," was all things 
in one. 

The lively portraiture, quite different from the con 
ventional works on the subject, found a ready welcome, 
and incited others to imitation. 

In consistently emphasising the apologetic aspect of 
Paul s teaching Wernle brought up many ingenious 
ideas for discussion. Weinel, on his part, brought again 
to the consciousness of both theologians and laymen the 
poetic and emotional element in the Apostle s world of 
ideas. 

But they found no new way of grasping and under 
standing him. 

They walk in a shady path which runs parallel to the 
main road. But its pleasantness is associated with certain 
dangers, which they themselves, and those who followed 
them, have not always escaped. 

When earlier writers on the subject modernised, they 
did so unconsciously. Wernle and Weinel, however, dj 

city in the light of analogies offered by modern missionary practice. 
Whether the new way really leads to a better understanding of 
primitive Christianity remains open to question. 

As a special investigation of a point of detail at this date we may 
mention Karl Dick s work, Der schriftstellerische Plural bei Paulus 
(" The Author s We in Paul s Writings.") 1900, 169 pp. There are 
not many of these studies at this period since the tendency among 
theologians has been more to popularisation than to scientific research. 



156 NEW CENTURY S PROBLEMS 

so on principle, and have no scruple about throwing light 
on what is obscure in Paulinism by the use of more or 
less appropriate catchwords of the most modern theology. 

Not seldom they imagine they are explaining some 
thing when they are in reality only talking round the 
subject. In this way there enters into their treatment a 
kind of forced ingenuity, one might almost say flimsiness. 

Their love of graphic description also sometimes 
becomes a temptation to them. They do not always 
remember to keep it within bounds, and sometimes allow 
themselves to fall into a kind of artificial naivete". Wernle 
in particular delights to wield a pre-Raphaelite brush. 
He pictures the Apostle, for instance, in the evening at 
his inn, receiving visitors, exhorting and consoling them, 
weaving tent-cloth, busy with a letter, all at the same time. 
" Sometimes stones would come flying into the room as 
he was dictating the Jews had set on the city mob to 
attack him. Many an abrupt transition in his letters 
may have had its origin in a violent interruption of this 
kind." l 

Feine and Titius begin with a critical examination of 
previous views. They are not in this wholly disinterested, 
being in search of a Paulinism which has more to offer to 
modern religion, as they apprehend it, than the one- 
sidedly historical post-Baur liberalism. The result is 
that while they show themselves free from many of the 
presuppositions and prejudices which are common to 
the others, they are at the same time not in a position to 
put Paulinism on a new historical basis. They agree 

1 Paulus als Heidenmissionar, p. 36. Ernst von Dobschiitz calls 
attention to the dangers of this method, which easily becomes un 
scientific in Probleme des apostolischen Zeitalters. (Five Lectures, 1904, 
138 pp. See p. 61.) Paul Feine, Das gesetzesfreie Evangelium des 
Paulus nach seinem Werdegange dargestellt, 1899, 232 pp. Jesus Christus 
und Paulus, 1902, 309 pp. Arthur Titius, Der Paulinismus unter dem 
Gesichtspunkt der Seligkeit (and Part of the work Die neutestamentliche 
Lehre von der Seligkeit und ihre Bedeutung fur die Gegenwart "The 
New Testament Doctrine of Final Blessedness and its Significance 
for the present Time"), 1900, 290 pp. A. Schlatter, in his NTle. 
Theologie (Pt. ii. The doctrine of the Apostles, 1910, 592 pp. On Paul, 
199-407), follows a conservative biblico-theological method like that 
of B. Weiss. 



RELATION OF PAUL TO JESUS 157 

in opposing the separation of Paulinism from Primitive 
Christianity which is practised by Holsten and Holtzmann. 
They refuse to be converted to the unsatisfactory view 
that Paulinism, as being a so unique personal creation, 
must have remained unintelligible even to Paul s con 
temporaries. Before making up their minds to derive 
the whole of Paul s doctrine from the vision at his con 
version and the influence of Greek ideas, they propose to 
examine it in reference to the conceptions which connect 
it with Jesus, with primitive Christianity, and with 
Judaism. 

Consequently they are loth to admit Greek elements 
and the resulting duality in the Apostle s thought. 
Feine maintains that in the Apostle s mind before his 
conversion, Greek ideas were only present in so far as they 
had already been adopted by Pharisaism. Titius " will 
not deny that there is a touch of Hellenism in the great 
Apostle," but is far from seeking to explain the doctrine 
of flesh and spirit and the mysticism connected with the 
" new creation " purely from this point of view. On 
the other hand both of them assign a large part in the 
formation of Paul s doctrine to his Jewish consciousness, 
and consequently are led to a comprehensive recognition 
of eschatology. 

In his examination of the individual views Titius 
always takes the future-hope as his starting-point 
indeed his book begins with chapters on God and eschato 
logy. He shows that redemption, in the most general 
conception of it, is a liberation from the present evil 
world and a deliverance looking to the world which is 
to come, and that justificatioa was originally bound up 
with the thought oT the judgment at the parousia. 
Instead, however, of systematically carrying out the 
analysis in this fashion, he breaks off and begins to work 
up the historical material which he has brought to light 
on the lines of the problems, definitions, and distinctions 
of modern theology, because, as the very title of his 
book shows, he undertakes his investigation with a view 



158 NEW CENTURY S PROBLEMS 

to showing the significance of New Testament teaching 
for the present day. In order to portray the " religious 
life " he makes it a principle " not to hesitate to turn 
aside from the highway, to which the technical terms 
serve as sign-posts." Thus he comes finally to discover 
everywhere that Paul clarified the doctrines which he 
took over and transformed them into ethico-religious 
teaching and subjective experience. From " the edifice 
of eschatologico-enthusiastic thought, most closely con 
nected with it but unmistakable in its distinctive 
character," he sees, to his satisfaction, " the spiritual 
life of the new religion " showing forth. 

Here also, therefore, as with Wernle and Weinel, there 
is conscious and intentional modernisation, in order to 
discover the religion of Paul behind his theology. 

One difference there is, however. The others brought 
to this undertaking a certain naivete and enthusiasm 
which enabled them to see the modern and the historical 
the one in the other. Titius is an observer with a keen 
eye for the really historical. He holds past and present 
side by side but separate, and must apply a mighty effort 
of will and understanding and do violence to his feelings 
in order to bring them into connexion. Out of these 
inner pangs a book has come to the birth which in matters 
of detail is full of just and suggestive remarks, but as a 
whole is unsatisfactory. 

The problem of the relation of Paul to Jesus stands for 
Titius and Feine as the foreground of the interest. Bothi 
hold the view that the connexion is a much closer one 
than criticism had hitherto been prepared to admit. 
The indifference which the Apostle professes regarding 
" Christ after the flesh " is not to be understood in the 
sense that he had no concern with His teaching. In his 
detailed monograph Feine endeavours to prove that Paul 
shows himself familiar with the words and thoughts of 
the historic Jesus, and in his eschatology, doctrine of re 
demption, ethics, attitude towards the law, and conception 
of baptism and the Lord s Supper, only carries to a further 



GOGUEL S ANTITHESIS 159 

point of development what is already present or fore 
shadowed in the teaching of Jesus. Titius set himself 
the same task, and believes himself to have proved " to 
how great an extent the Apostle bases his views on the 
thoughts of Jesus, attaches himself to them, and further 
develops them." 1 

This result is opposed by Maurice Goguel, 2 who offers 
a thoroughgoing defence of the usual view. He is pre 
pared to admit that Paul knew more of the life and teach 
ing of Jesus than his Epistles show ; but a fundamental 
difference in doctrine is, he thinks, not to be denied, and 
he finds that it consists in the fact that the one preaches 
" salvation," the other the way of obtaining it. In his 
utterances about redemption through the death and 
resurrection of Christ, the parousia, Christology, Church 
and sacraments, Paul expresses, according to Goguel, 
views which go much beyond the horizon of the historical 
Jesus. A point of contact is only to be found in the 
simple ethical teaching. In reference to the law, Jesus 
prepared the way for what the Apostle of the Gentiles 
accomplished, without fully measuring the far-reaching 
consequences of his attitude. 

The problem which theology since the time of Baur 
had always avoided now therefore came at last to dis 
cussion. Goguel s essay did not indeed greatly elucidate 
the matter. That the thesis of Feine and Titius goes far 
beyond what the material warrants was not difficult 
to prove. On the other hand, it had, in justice, to be 
conceded to them that they had shown that there was 

1 R. Drescher, too " Das Leben Jesu bei Paulus " in Festgruss 
an Stade, 1900, pp. 101-161, is of opinion that the letters, rightly 
understood, offer us "an imposing amount of material" on the 
life of Jesus. The author thinks that wherever possible Paul referred 
to the teaching of Jesus ; and he fought his battle for freedom from 
the law with such confidence " because he knew that he had Jesus 
on his side." 

It should be mentioned that J. Wellhausen takes up a similar 
standpoint. He gives it as his opinion, Israelitische und judische 
Geschichte (6th ed., 1907, 386 pp.), that Paul " was really the man 
who best understood the Master and carried on His work." 

2 L Apdtre Paul et J6sus-Christ, 1904, 393 pp. 



i6o NEW CENTURY S PROBLEMS 

something in common between the fundamental con 
ceptions of Jesus and Paul on which sufficient stress had 
not previously been laid. 

Goguel s sharp antitheses are at first sight more 
convincing than the somewhat involved argument of 
Feine, because he has the direct evidence of the text on 
his side. The difficulty, however, immediately makes 
itself felt when he endeavours to make it intelligible 
exactly why Paul was forced to create new conceptions. 
He cannot point to any objective factors to account for 
this development, and is consequently reduced to ex 
plaining everything psychologically. 

From this exceedingly complicated controversy one 
thing results with certainty, namely, that the problem, 
in the form in which it is stated, is an unreal one. The 
statement of the problem which is here presupposed 
leaves out of account the middle term, primitive 
Christianity. 

The credit of having expressed this clearly, and thus 
put an end to the unprofitable wrangling about " Jesus 
and Paul " and " Jesus or Paul," belongs to Harnack. 1 
If, he writes in the 1909 edition of his " History of 
Dogma," even in the first generation the religion of 
Jesus underwent a change, it must be said that it was 
not Paul who was responsible for this but the primitive 
Christian community. He is not, however, able to explain 
why the Apostle of the Gentiles goes still further than 
the primitive community. 

The question of the peculiarly inconsistent attitude of 
the Apostle towards the law is not elucidated by Titius 
and Feine. 

The ethics are treated in monographs by Jakoby and 
Juncker. 2 The former gives a detailed description. 

1 Adolf Harnack, Lehrbuch der Dogmengeschichte, 4th ed., 1909, 
vol. i., 826 pp. See p. 107. To the same effect, Adolf Jiilicher, Paulus 
und Jesus, 1907, 72 pp. See p. 34. 

2 Hermann Jakoby, N eutestamentliche Ethik, 1899, 480 pp. On 
Paul, pp. 243-406. Alfred Juncker, Die Ethik des Apostels Paulus, 
part i., 1904, 288 pp. 

Among other monographs we have to notice Emil Sokolowski s Die 



IMPORTANCE OF LATE JUDAISM 161 

The latter tries to discover the fundamental principle, 
and naturally finds himself obliged to deal with the whole 
doctrine of redemption. In the method which he applies 
he recalls Titius. With historical insight he recognises, 
in his fine chapter upon the origin of the new life, that all 
the ethical conceptions of Paul are in one way or another 
of an eschatological and " physical " character. Later 
on he fails a victim to the temptation to modernise. 

Thus he tries, for instance, to show that Paul did not 
think of the influence of the Spirit in man as analogous 
to a physical process, but, on the contrary, " regarded the 
feeling of thankful love towards God and Christ as the 
subjective root of the new way of life." So that we find 
here, too, the dread of recognising anything objective in 
the Apostle s views and the tendency, not indeed to fall 
into the " one-sidedly intellectual view," but to bring 
into the foreground the " specifically religious estimate of 
the Apostle s person and gospel." 

It is no accident that the scholars of this period are 
so anxious to distinguish between theology and religion. 
This expedient covers dismay and apprehension. 

Meanwhile the study of Late Judaism had been going 
its own way. The further it advanced the more evident 
it became that this was the soil on which the theology 
of Paul had grown up. Holtzmann s New Testament 
Theology had not availed to render theological science 
proof against the assaults which it was to experience in 
the next few years from this direction. The impression 
was too strong to be escaped. And when the results 

Begriffe Geist und Leben bei Paulus in ihrer Beziehung zu einander, 
1903, 284 pp. The author ascribes little importance to Greek influence 
in comparison with Jewish, and tries to explain what is peculiar and 
vital in the Apostle s views as due to his individual experience, especi 
ally the vision on the Damascus road. 

Hans Windisch, Die Entsiindigung des Christen nach Paulus, 1908, 
132 pp. The difficulties raised for Paul by his mysticism are pointed 
out. It is shown that this, strictly speaking, makes it impossible for 
him to admit sin in the case of baptized persons. The eschatological 
character of the sacramental-mystical theory of deliverance from sin 
is strongly brought out. The author continues the investigation which 
Paul Wernle, in his work Der Christ und die Sunde bei Paulus (1897, 
138 pp.), was the first to undertake. See p. Goof the present work. 



162 NEW CENTURY S PROBLEMS 

of the study were presented, with a certain provisional 
completeness, in Bousset s powerful book on " Jewish 
Religious Life in New Testament Times," it became certain 
that the apprehension had not been unfounded. 1 

The naive spiritualisation of the theology as practised 
by Holsten, Pfleiderer, and Holtzmann by the latter no 
longer quite naively, was over and done with. 2 The 
recognition of a " physical " 3 aspect in Paul s expecta 
tions of the future was no longer sufficient. It had to be 

1 Wilhelm Bousset, Die Religion des Judentums im neutestament- 
lichen Zeitalter, 1903, 512 pp. Simultaneously appeared the same 
writer s work, Die judische Apokalyptik, ihre religionsgesckichtliche 
Herkunft und ihre Bedeutung fitr das neue Testament (" Jewish Apoca 
lyptic, its Origin in the Light of Comparative Religion and its 
Significance for the New Testament." A Lecture, 1903.) 

Eschatology receives special attention in the fine work of Hugo 
Gressman, Der Ursprung der israelitisch-jiidischen Eschatologie (" The 
Origin of the Israelitish and Jewish Eschatology "), 1905, 378 pp. The 
author takes up an attitude of some reserve in regard to the " religious- 
historical method," and seeks to determine in the case of every state 
ment whether it can have arisen in Israel or must be regarded as having 
been introduced from without. 

Paul Volz, Judische Eschatologie von Daniel bis Akiba, 1903, 412 pp., 
endeavours, somewhat unconvincingly, to give a sketch of Jewish con 
ceptions of the future age. 

Everling s investigations are continued, on modern lines, by a study 
of Martin Dibelius, Die Geisterwelt im Glauben des Paulus, 1909, 249 pp. 
(" The World of Spirits as conceived in Paul s Belief "). In addition to 
the Late Jewish passages the author cites also the Rabbinical and 
those suggested by the Comparative Study of Religion. The ex 
cursuses on the linguistic history of the subject are very instructive 
(pp. 209-232). On Everling, see pp. 55-57 of the present work. 

2 G. F. Heinrici s work, Das Urchristentum, 1902, 142 pp., still 
occupies the old stand-point. On Paul, pp. 71-101. For what he has to 
say against the "physical " in the doctrine of redemption, see pp. 95, 96. 

W. Bousset, Der Apostel Paulus, 1906, holds that we shall never 
completely understand the Apostle s doctrine. We must make up 
our minds to the fact .... that in his letters we liave before us 
only fragments of his spiritual life, the full wealth of which we can only 
vaguely imagine. The individual arguments of Paul look to us like 
erratic boulders ; only toilsomely and partially can we reconstruct the 
connexion of thought. 

3 Rendering naturhaft. Dr. Schweitzer has favoured me with the 
following note on this difficult concept, which from this point becomes 
prominent in the discussions. After consultation with him, the word 
has been rendered " physical," but placed in quotation marks to 
indicate the special use. TRANSLATOR. " In the special sense in 
which it is here used naturhaft is intended to convey that it is not a 
question of a purely spiritual redemption, but that the whole physical 
and hyperphysical being of the man is thereby translated into a new 
condition. Body and soul are redeemed together ; and in such a 
way that not only the elect portion of mankind, but the whole world 
is completely transformed in a great catastrophic event." 



THE " PHYSICAL " MYSTICISM 163 

admitted that his doctrine of redemption as a whole bore 
this character, and that the fundamental strain in his 
mysticism was not ethical but physical, as Liidemann 
hud declared as long ago as 1872 without suspecting the 
far-reaching consequences of his observation. 

The only question now was how much had to be con 
ceded to this alien system of thought which was endeavour 
ing to draw Paul within its borders, and how much could 
be saved from it. 

In this quandary theologians had recourse to the 
expedient of applying the distinction between " theo 
retical " (theological) and " religious " to the doctrine 
of the Apostle, as Holtzmann had already tried to do 
when he could no longer refuse to recognise its Gnostic, 
intellectualistic character. 

The position became especially critical in view of the 
concessions which had to be made regarding the Pauline 
conception of baptism and the Lord s Supper. Up to this 
time, that chapter had given little trouble to theological 
science. It had been taken for granted that at bottom 
it could only be a question of symbolism. The doctrine 
of redemption on its ethical side found, it was thought, 
in the sacred ceremonies its cultual expression. 

Holtzmann, too, in the section on " Mystical Con 
ceptions " * (Mysterioses) had still to all intents and 
purposes taken the same ground. Baptism and the 
Lord s Supper are, he explains, in the first place, acts of 
confession by which the death of the Lord is proclaimed. 
To this has to be added, in the case of the Lord s Supper, 
the significance of a communion meal, and in the case of 
baptism the value of a symbolic act. It creates, accord 
ing to Romans vi., a mystical fellowship with the buried 
and risen Christ. " The outward symbol of complete 
immersion signifies and represents the disappearance of 
the old, fleshly man, the coming forth out of the water 
represents the forthgoing of a new, spiritual man." 

Paul, Holtzmann thinks, puts the content of his 

1 Neutestamentliche Theologie, vol. ii., 1897, PP- 1 75- I &7- 



164 NEW CENTURY S PROBLEMS 

" experience " into this ceremonial act, and thereby cuts 
it loose from the earlier view which had arisen from its 
connexion with John the Baptist. Strictly speaking, 
he transforms both the cultus-acts, by bringing his new 
conception of Christianity into connexion with them in 
order to give it cultual expression. 

Probably we are still following Holtzmann he did 
this under the guidance of analogies which he found in the 
Mystery-religions of the period. The expressions which 
he uses at any rate remind us sometimes of the language 
which is associated with them. This, then, was the point 
from which the later transformation began. " It was, 
in fact, Paul who from an outlying, one might almost 
say a remote point of his system of thought, opened up 
for the early Catholic Church a road which it would, 
indeed, most probably have followed even without this 
precedent, which was given, as it were, merely incident 
ally and casually." 

It is interesting to observe precisely what views are 
intended to be excluded by these guarded explanations. 
Holtzmann is concerned to emphasise the view that 
baptism and the Lord s Supper have in the Apostle s 
doctrine a rather subordinate importance, and that they 
are not real sacraments but quasi-sacramental acts. 
He deliberately avoids the plain issue, on which after 
all everything really depends, whether baptism and the 
Supper ef|gct redemption or only represent it. 

But those who came after him were obliged to raise 
this question, and so far as they were willing to respect 
the documents were obliged to answer that the _sacraments 
not only represent but effect redemption. Wernle 
remarks regretfully that the cultus-acts have in Paul a 
much greater importance than one would be inclined to 
expect, and that in certain passages he tolerates or even 
suggests " pagan " views. Weinel is obliged to admit 
that alongside of the religion of inwardness which he has 
discovered in the Apostle s teaching, a sacramental 
religion, which is inherently opposed to it, from time to 



PAUL S SACRAMENTAL DOCTRINE 165 

time appears. " Sometimes," he writes, " it is faith 
that brings the Spirit, sometimes baptism, sometimes it is 
faith that unites with Christ, sometimes the Lord s 
Supper." Titius feels himself obliged to give up the 
symbolical interpretation of Romans vi., which for 
Holtzmann still forms a fixed datum, and admits that 
the atmosphere of this chapter is " supranaturalistic," 
and that the baptism there referred to is a real_batism 
into the death of Christ and an equally real partak 
ing in His resurrection. Feine, in Jesus Christus and 
Paiilus, insists that the sacramental character of the 
cultus - acts described by Paul should be universally 
acknowledged. 

Heitmuller, in his work on " Baptism and the Lord s 
Supper in Paul s Writings," * gives the old and the new 
view side by side, and shows that it is the latter which 
alone is justified by the documents. The mystical con 
nexion which in baptism and the Lord s Supper is set 
up between the believer and Christ is a " physico-hyper- 
physical one," and has as its consequence that the believer 
shares realiter in the death and resurrection of Christ. 

For the liberal conception of Paulinism this was a blow 
at the heart. If redemption is effected through the sacra 
ments, these are no longer an " outlying point " in the 
Apostle s doctrine, but lie at its centre. And at the 
same time the distinction between " theoretical " (theo 
logical) and " religious " is rendered impossible. A 
doctrine of redemption which is thus bound up with 
Mysteries which work in a physico-hyperphysical way 
is in its essence purely supernaturalistic. 2 

1 W. Heitmiiller, Taufe und Abendmahl bei Paulus, 1903, 56 pp. 

2 How unwilling theology was to draw this inevitable inference is 
to be seen from the works of Weinel and Heitmuller. They refuse to 
go beyond the statement that the sacraments stand in sharp opposition 
to the real " religion " of Paul, and think that they have solved the 
problem by asserting that the Apostle of the Gentiles did not notice 
the contradiction. Weinel remarks, "JPaul himself is quite uncon 
scious of the problem raised by the collision of the physical doctrine of 
redemption of the Mysteries with the ethical doctrine of Christianity." 
Heitmuller says, " These views of baptism and the Lord s Supper 
stand in unreconciled and unreconcilable opposition with the central \ 



166 NEW CENTURY S PROBLEMS 

The courage of theological thinkers was put to a severe 
test. When Baur and his followers made their profession 
of faith in unbiassed free investigation they could have 
had no inkling that it would become so difficult for a 
later generation to remain true to this principle. 

To give up the distinction between " theoretical " and 
religious and to follow a purely historical method meant, 
as things stood at the beginning of the twentieth century, 
to be left with an entirely temporally conditioned Paulin- 
ism,of which modern ways of thought could make nothing, 
and to trace out a system which for our religion is dead. 

At this crisis theology encountered in William Wrede 
a candid friend who sought to keep it in the path of 
sincerity. His Paulus, short and written in such a way 
as to be universally intelligible, appeared in the year 
I904. 1 

The " theology," he writes, is in Paul not to be 
separated from the " religion." His religion is through 
and through theological ; his theology is his religion. 

The theory which Holtzmann introduced in his " New 
Testament Theology," and which Wernle, Weinel, Heit- 
muller, Titius, and the rest had developed, thus came to an 
untimely end before it had left its nonage. It survived 
only seven years. 

And then the second expedient that Paul had thought 
out no system, but just put down his thoughts in any kind 
of fortuitous order is set aside. The framework of 
the doctrine of redemption, Wrede declares, is very 
closely articulated. Further, it is not really compli 
cated, but is at bottom quite simple, if once we take 
account of the thought-material out of which it is con 
structed and take the most general conceptions as the 
starting-point. 

Redemption this is, according to Wrede, Paul s train 

significance of faith for Pauline Christianity, that is to say, with the 
purely spiritual, personal view of the religious relation which stands in 
the foreground of Pauline religious life and religious thought." 

1 William Wrede, Paulus, 1904, 113 pp. (In the series entitled 
" Religionsgeschichtliche Volksbiicher. ") 



WREDE S VIEW 167 

of thought is not something which takes place in the 
individual as such, as the later Christian view was, but 
signifies a universal event in which the individual has a 
part. 

It consists in the deliverance of mankind from the 
dominion of the powers which hold sway over this world. 
These powers have been destroyed by the death and 
resurrection of Jesus, as will become manifest at the 
parousia. Thus redemption is essentially an insurance 
for this future. 

But it is even in the present real, though not visible. 
Christ is the representative of the human race. What 
happened to Him, happened to all. 

" All men are therefore from the moment of His death 
set free, as He is Himself, from the hostile powers ; and 
all are by His resurrection transferred into a condition of 
indestructible life." The proof of this change is given by 
the Spirit. He represents in the redeemed the super- 
earthly life, as a " gift of the last times in which the powers 
of the world to come already exercise an influence upon 
the present existence." 

This wholly " objective " conception of redemption 
is, Wrede admits, for our modern modes of thought 
rather impersonal and cold. " It takes place in a way 
which is wholly external to the individual man, and the 
events seem, as it were, to be only enacted in Christ." 

Redemption is effected in the sacraments. " The , 
physical transformation is effected by physical pro 
cesses." Paul s thought moves, therefore, among crude, 
unsubtilised conceptions. 

His statements about justification by faith and about 
the law are based upon this fundamental view, 
and represent merely the " controversial teaching " to 
which he was forced in order to maintain the cause of 
freedom from the law. 

The material of his world of thought was, therefore, 
Jewish. What was the transformation by which it 
became Christian ? 



168 NEW CENTURY S PROBLEMS 

Paul s conception of the Christ l was fully formed 
before he came to believe in Jesus. At his conversion, 
by the vision on the road to Damascus, the only new 
element that he took up into his conception was that this 
heavenly being had temporarily assumed a human 
form of existence in order by His death and resurrection 
to redeem mankind and to bring in the new order of 
things. An influence of the teaching of Jesus upon the 
theology of the Apostle to the Gentiles is not to be re 
cognised. Wrede makes the gap between the two as 
wide as possible, and insists that Paul s gospel must be 
considered as independent of, and essentially different 
in character from, that of Jesus. 

The Apostle s adoption of the view that the end of the 
law had come, is, according to Wrede, partly due to his 
experiences at his conversion, partly to the exigencies 
of the mission to the Gentiles. 

Of the value and the remarkable literary beauty of the 
book it is impossible to say too much. It belongs, not 
to theology, but to the literature of the world. 

But one must not, in one s admiration, forget justice. 
What is here set forth is not absolutely new. A view 
of a similar character, and more closely reasoned, had been 
put forward by Kabisch Kabisch, 2 whom theologians 
had passed over in complete silence, because they did 
not know what to make of him. Wrede does nothing 
else than to give to the presentation of the latter s dis 
coveries the advantage of his literary skill, while at the 
same time showing that the separation of " theory " 
(theology) and " religion " which had barred the way to 
their acceptance is not tenable. There is one thing which 
is to be regretted in Wrede s book, and that is that the 
terse popular method of presentation forbids any detailed 
discussion of the problems. If the author had worked 

1 In the sense of the Messiah. TRANSLATOR. 

2 How far Wrede was consciously influenced by Kabisch, and how 
far he has the sense of creating something new, is not quite evident. 
He reckons the book among the " very important studies on special 
points," to which he refers in the bibliography, but he does not quote it. 



CRITICISM OF WREDE 169 

out his arguments thoroughly, and replied to his opponents 
and predecessors, he would have been obliged to face 
many questions which, as it was, did not force themselves 
upon him. 

What are the points that remain obscure ? 

Wrede proposes to conceive the possibility of redemp 
tion in such a way that " mankind," in view of Christ s 
solidarity with the race by virtue of His earthly life, has a 
part in His death and resurrection. This view is, in this 
form, untenable. In Paul, salvation has not reference to 
mankind as a whole, but only to the elect. It is also 
questionable whether the idea of racial solidarity suffices 
to explain how the death and resurrection of Jesus can 
realise themselves in other men. 

What is the basis of the mystical union with Christ ? 
To this question Wrede has given no answer. 

Then, too, the inconsistent attitude of Paul towards 
the law was not explained by him. He does not even 
succeed in showing how the Apostle arrived at the idea 
that the law was no longer valid. The suggestion that 
it was in part through his experience at his conversion, 
in part through the exigencies of the mission to the 
Gentiles, is a mere expedient. Unless it is possible to 
explain Paul s attitude, with all its inner contradictions, 
as a logical and necessary conclusion from his system 
as a whole, it remains for us practically unexplained. 1 

Again, Wrede gives no scheme of the events of the End, 
although such a scheme obviously belongs to the 
" system." 

It is not explained, either, how the death of Jesus can 
be interpreted at the same time as taking place for the 
forgiveness of sins. In general, the relation between the 
essential theology, as laid down in the mystical doctrine of 
redemption, and the "controversial doctrines" is not clear. 

1 C. von Dobschiitz, Probleme des apostolischen Zeitalters (" Problems 
of the Apostolic Age," 1904, 138 pp.), does not enter in detail into the 
question regarding the genesis of the Pauline view of the law, although 
he treats Jewish Christianity and Gentile Christianity with some 
fulness. 



170 NEW CENTURY S PROBLEMS 

In regard to the question of the relation of Paul to 
Jesus, Wrede holds that they lived in two wholly different 
worlds of thought. This is connected with his view that 
the Galilaean Master made no claim to the Messiahship, 
but was first raised to Messianic dignity after His death, 
and that this claim was then projected back into the 
Gospels in the form that Jesus had made His rank known 
to His disciples only, and had enjoined upon them to keep 
silence until after His death. 1 His preaching was, above 
all things, ethical. So far as concerns eschatology and 
the meaning to be attached to His death, the Apostle of 
the Gentiles received no impulse of a theological character 
from Him. 

Paul, therefore, created something essentially new, 
which has, one might almost say, nothing to do with the 
thought of Jesus, and also goes far beyond the concep 
tions of primitive Christianity. 2 

Thus for Wrede, as for Holsten and Holtzmann, the 
doctrine of Paul is an isolated entity without connexion in 
the past or influence upon the future. And he, too, finds 
himself unable to explain why the system thus remained 
without influence. That the " controversial theology," 
with its insistence on the atoning death, lost its signifi 
cance when the question of the law ceased to be actual 
may appear plausible. But why did the mystical doctrine 
of redemption get pushed aside instead of being further 
developed ? Its presuppositions if Wrede s account of 

1 See the present writer s Von Reimarus zu Wrede, eine Geschichte 
der Leben-Jesu-Forschung (1906, 418 pp.)- On Wrede, pp. 327-347. 
(English translation, " The Quest of the Historical Jesus." A. and C. 
Black, London, 2nd ed., 1911. On Wrede, pp. 328-348.) 

2 This thesis of Wrede s called into being a new literature upon 
Paul and Jesus which attacked Wrede chiefly on the score of his one- 
sidedness. 

P. Kolbing, Die geistige Einwirkung der Person Jesu auf Paulus, 
1906 ("The Spiritual Influence of the Person of Jesus on Paul"). 
Adolf Julicher, Paulus und Jesus, 1907, 72 pp. Arnold Meyer, 
Wer hat das Christentum begrundet, Jesus oder Paulus ? 1907, 104 pp. 
("Who founded Christianity, Jesus or Paul ? ") Wilhelm Walther, Pauli 
Christentum, Jesu Evangelium, 1908, 51 pp. Johannes Weiss, Paulus 
und Jesus, 1909, 72 pp. Christus : Die Anfdnge des Dogmas, 1909, 88 pp. 
(" Christ : The Beginnings of Dogma "). 



A DIFFICULTY SOLVED 171 

matters is correct could hardly have been much altered 
in the next generation. 

A valuable supplement in many respects to Wrede s 
views is offered by Martin Briickner s study of the origin 
of the Pauline Christology. 1 

The author offers a detailed proof that the Pauline 
Christology arose by the insertion of the earthly episode 
of the incarnation, dying and rising again into the already 
present conception of a pre-existent heavenly Personality. 2 
Incidentally he gives an admirably clear account of the 
Jewish eschatology and its formation. 3 

He shows that the Jewish eschatology itself, in the 
Apocalypses of Ezra and Baruch, distinguished between 
the temporally limited Messianic Kingdom and the sub 
sequent complete renewal of the world, and that, in con 
formity with this, two resurrections have to be recognised. 
One, in which only a limited number have a part, takes 
place at the appearance of the Messiah ; the other, the 
general resurrection, only follows at the end of the inter 
vening Kingdom. The scene. of the latter was pictured, 
he thinks, by Paul, as by his Jewish predecessors, as the 
land of Palestine, with the New Jerusalem as its centre. 

It is interesting to notice how Wrede and Bruckner, 
without themselves remarking it, have refuted one of 
the weightiest objections of the Ultra-Tubingen critics. 

1 Martin Bruckner, Die Entstehung der paulinischen Christologie, 
1903, 237 pp. 

The work appeared some months before Wrede s Paulus, but the 
author, who had the opportunity of personal intercourse and the inter 
change of ideas with him, was acquainted with his method and funda 
mental views. As he is also an independent thinker, his work re 
presents not only a supplement but a real advance. 

a Viz. the Jewish conception of the Messiah. TRANSLATOR. 

3 William Olschewski replies to Wrede and Bruckner in his thought 
ful but obscure and heavily written dissertation, Die Wurzeln der 
paulinischen Christologie (1909, 170 pp.) (" The Roots of the Pauline 
Eschatology"). He thinks that the origin of Christianity which they 
suggest does not explain the " characteristic and peculiar connexion of 
Christology with Pneumatology," and insists that in the Damascus 
vision is to be found the sufficient reason for " the intimately organic 
fusion " of the conception of Christ with that of the Spirit which operates 
through Him. In any case he holds it to be " false in principle and 
method to try to derive the roots of the Pauline Christology from the 
Jewish Apocalyptic Christology." 



172 NEW CENTURY S PROBLEMS 

The latter had asserted that it was impossible that the 
process of deification of the Person of Jesus could have 
reached its completion within a few years, and had claimed 
for it at least two generations. Now, however, it is 
shown that it is not this process at all, but another, ivhich 
could take place in a moment, which has to be considered, 
since it is only a question of the taking up of the episode 
of the incarnation, death, and resurrection into the 
already present and living conception of the Messiah. 

The immediate effect of Wrede s presentation of matters 
was that writers ventured more confidently to accept the 
" physical " view of the Pauline doctrine of redemption, 
and that the distinction between " theory " (theology) 
and religion, where writers could not make up their minds 
to do without it, was applied with moderation. 1 

1 From the literature we may mention A. Schettler, Die paulinische 
Formal " Durch Christus" ("The Pauline Formula Through Christ"), 
1907, 82 pp. J. Haussleiter, Paulus, 1909, 96 pp. (Lectures, popular.) 
R. Knopf, Paulus, 1909, 123 pp. Eberhard Vischer, Der Apostel 
Paulus und sein Werk, 1910, 143 pp. By the same author, Die 
Paulusbriefe, 1906, 80 pp. A remarkably good, clearly and simply 
written guide to questions of " Introduction." Julius Schniewind, 
Die Begriffe Wort und Evangelium bei Paulus ("The Meaning of the 
Terms Word and Gospel in Paul s Writings "), 1910, 120 pp. 

Johannes Miiller, Die Entstehung des personlichen Christentums 
der paulinischen Gemeinden, 1911, 306 pp. A good analysis of 
the general contents of Paul s gospel. The theological system and 
the mysticism of the Apostle are not explained. The book is the 
second edition of a study which appeared in 1898 under the title Das 
personliche Christentum der paulinischen Gemeinden nach seiner Ent 
stehung untersucht ("An Investigation of the Origin of the Personal 
Christianity of the Pauline Churches"). 

Adolf Deissmann, Paulus, 1911, 202 pp. The book grew out of 
lectures. The author is opposed to the method of investigation which 
aims at understanding the " System of Pauline Theology," and thinks 
that in following these " doctrinaire interests " it would go further 
and further astray. For him Paul is primarily " a hero of the religious 
life " for whom " theology is a secondary matter." He holds that the 
Apostle was more a man of prayer and testimony, a confessor and a 
prophet, than a learned exegete and laborious dogmatist. 

His aim is, with the aid of reminiscences of two journeys to the 
East, to " place the man of Tarsus in the sunlight of his Anatolian home, 
and in the clear air of the ancient Mediterranean lands," and he believes 
that when this is done " what previously tired our eyes, like a set of 
faded and rubbed pencil sketches, becomes at once plastic and living 
in its light and shadow." This hope is by no means realised in his 
work. It appears here, as was also noticeable in the writer s earlier Licht 
vom Osten (" Light from the East "), that he has a high appreciation of 
local colour and the memorials of ancient civilisation, but when it comes 



VARIETIES OF THE " PHYSICAL " 173 

But he did not succeed in forcing on a thoYough 
revision of previous views. Harnack, for instance, in 
the 1909 edition of the " History of Dogma " stands by 
his account of 1893, unshaken. 1 

Reinhold Seeberg 2 undertook in 1908 a very interesting 
attempt to walk in new paths, but does not deal with 
Wrede and his problems. He holds to the view that the 
Apostle did not create " a unified system," but that his 
thought moved amid a number of different sets of ideas, 
which for him were held together by " religion as an 
experience." 

This neglect of Wrede s work does not mean anything ; 
it was simply that the history of dogma could make 
nothing of his view. It is significant, however, that 
among those who accepted his view in substance, no one 
made the attempt to carry it to victory by a comprehen 
sive presentation of it on an adequate scale. 

The cause of this lies in the peculiar difficulties 
which lie concealed in the scheme which he sketched out. 

The fact is that the " physical " element which is to 
be recognised in Paul s doctrine is neither all of one piece 
nor wholly to be explained from Late Judaism. Strictly 

really to explaining the ideas he is not able to draw nearly so much 
profit from them as he expected. And his contempt for " doctrinaire 
interests " revenges itself upon his treatment. It is obscure and con 
fused, and does not get at the essence of the thoughts. In regard to 
Paul s mysticism Deissmann has applied new catchwords to old psycho 
logical considerations, but in nowise contributes to the explanation of 
it. After Wrede s Paulus, his book seems a kind of anachronism. 
It is, besides, not fitting that what professes to be a new view should 
be presented in the inadequate form of a collection of lectures. 

1 Adolf Harnack, Lehrbuch der Dogmengeschichte, 4th ed., vol. i., 
1909, 826 pp. On Paul, pp. 96-107 (3rd ed., 1893). 

2 Reinhold Seeberg, Lehrbuch der Dogmengeschichte, 2nd ed., vol i., 
1908, 570 pp. On Paul, 68-78. The first circle of ideas embraces the 
thoughts regarding flesh and spirit, the power of grace and the strength 
of sin, Christ and the new creation ; the second consists of the formulas 
which were created in opposition to Jewish Christianity ; the third 
has to do with the mystical body of Christ, in which the natural 
distinctions between men are abolished. On points of detail there are 
many discriminating observations. The first edition, of 1895, did not 
even contain any section on Paul. 

The 4th ed. of Loof s Dogmengeschichte (1906, vol. i., 576 pp.) does 
not deal with the Apostle of the Gentiles, any more than the preceding 
editions. 



174 NEW CENTURY S PROBLEMS 

speaking, it takes three different forms, of which one is 
peculiar to the eschatology, another to the mystical 
doctrine of redemption, and the third to the sacraments. 

The " materialism " of the conception of redemption 
which is directed towards the future has to do with super- 
earthly powers, with judgment, bodily resurrection and 
transformation. 

Somewhat different is the " realism " of the mystical 
doctrine of the new creation, which asserts that believers 
here and now experience death and resurrection in fellow 
ship with Christ, and so put on, beneath the earthly 
exterior which conceals it, a nature essentially immune 
from corruption. 

Different from this conception again is the sacramental, 
inasmuch as it represents in some inexplicable fashion 
an externalisation of it. What, according to the mystical 
doctrine, seemed to take place by itself without being 
connected with an external act, is here to be thought of as 
the effect of eating and drinking, and cleansing with water. 
The sacramental conception is a magical conception. 

Of these three varieties of the " physical," only the 
first can be immediately explained from Late Judaism. 
For the two others it offers no analogy. Late Judaism 
remained true to its Judaic character in knowing nothing 
of either mysticism or sacraments. 

On the other hand, these three varieties of the " physi 
cal " in the Paul s doctrine of redemption do not stand 
side by side unrelated, but seem to be somehow connected 
in such a way that the eschatological element dominates 
and supplies the basis of the other two. The most 
obvious procedure would have been to attempt to derive 
the mystical and sacramental conceptions from the 
eschatological, as being the root-conception. 

A beginning in this direction had been made by Kabisch 
when he attempted to exhibit the connexion between 
eschatology and the mystical doctrine of the real dying 
and rising again with Christ. 1 

1 On Kabisch see above, pp. 58-63. 



THE " COMPARATIVE " METHOD 175 

But in doing so he did not take into account the sacra 
ments. It was just these, however, which seemed to 
make it a priori impossible to explain Paulinism exclu 
sively on the basis of Late Judaism. Therefore Wrede 
and his followers seek other sources. They try to explain 
the system, not solely from the side of eschatology, but 
from that of " Comparative Religion," and hold that it 
betrays the influence not only of Late- Jewish but also of 
Oriental ideas generally, such as are found in the Mystery- 
religions. 

No doubt the first question which here arises is whether 
the methods of Comparative Religion are essentially 
applicable to the explanation of Paulinism. 

To apply the methods of Comparative Religion means 
to study the individual religions, not in isolation, but with 
the purpose of investigating the mutual influences which 
they have openly or covertly exercised on one another. 

At bottom, therefore, it is a necessary outcome of the 
application of scientific methods generally, and it only 
received a special name because theological scholarship 
so long shut its doors against it. 

Under this distinctive name the method attained to 
influence and honour in connexion with the critical study 
of the Old Testament and the Graeco-Oriental cults. 
In the former department of study it made an end of the 
prepossession that Judaism had developed entirely by 
its own inner impulses, and showed how much material 
of a generally Oriental character it had adopted. In 
particular it showed that Late- Jewish Apocalyptic is full 
of conceptions from the Babylonian and the Irano- 
Zarathustrian religions, and represents a combination of 
universal cosmological speculations with the future-hope 
of the ancient Jewish prophetism. 1 

In the comparative study of the heathen religions it 
became apparent that the Mystery - religions, which 

1 A sifting and a survey of results is offered in the closing chapter, 
" Das religionsgeschichtliche Problem " (448-493) in Bousset s book, 
Die Religion des Judentums im neutestamentlichen Zeitalter, 1903 ("The 
Religion of Judaism in New Testament Times "). 



176 NEW CENTURY S PROBLEMS 

entered on their conquering progress westwards about the 
same time as Christian Gnosticism, combined Greek 
religious feeling and a Greek cosmogony with Oriental 
cultus-ideas. 

In both these cases it is a question of contacts and 
influences which were due to political and cultural re 
lations, and produced their effect in the course of extended 
periods of time and under favourable historical circum 
stances. The method cannot simply be applied without 
more ado to the explanation of the ideas of an individual 
man, since most of its presuppositions would not here be 
valid. In the case of religions, syncretism can work 
its way in and develop ; in the case of individuals it can 
only be recognised in a very limited degree. The taking 
over and remoulding of foreign conceptions is a process 
requiring numbers and time. The individual comes 
into question only so far as he is organically united with 
a community which is active in this way, and allows its 
instincts to influence him. 

Paul belongs to Late Judaism. Whatever he received 
in the way of influences such as Comparative Religion 
takes account of came to him mainly through this channel. 
The suggestion that apart from this he might be personally 
and directly affected by " Oriental " influences calls for 
very cautious consideration. In particular we ought to 
be very careful to guard against raising this possibility 
to a certainty by general considerations regarding all 
that the child of the Diaspora might have seen, heard, and 
read. The question can only be decided by what we 
actually find in the Epistles. 

It is further to be remarked that Late Judaism was 
no longer in his time so open to external influences that 
any and every kind of religious conception which was 
floating about anywhere in the Orient could necessarily 
impose itself on Paul s mind through this medium. The 
period of assimilation was, speaking generally, at an end. 
The new material had been before Paul s day worked 
up along with the old into a set of Apocalyptic conceptions, 



AN INEVITABLE STEP 177 

which, in spite of the elbow-room which the heterogeneous 
ideas necessarily claimed for themselves, did form a 
system, and appeared from without as relatively complete 
and self-sufficing. The Oriental material has been poured 
into Jewish moulds and received a Jewish impress. 

A still further point is that any one whose thought 
moves in the Apocalyptic system created by the books of 
Daniel and Enoch is not so much exposed to, as withdrawn 
from, the action of free Oriental influence. He is already 
saturated with those elements in regard to receptivity 
which the Jewish mind possesses and the tendency to 
assimilation, and possesses it not as something foreign to 
himself but as Jewish. Apocalyptic tends to produce in 
him immunisation as against further syncretistic infection. 

This assertion is susceptible of historical proof. Late 
Judaism stands, even before the beginning of our era, 
apart from the Oriental religious movements. And it 
continues unaffected by them. Not one of its representa 
tives was concerned in the syncretistic movement. Philo 
seeks to rationalise Judaism by the aid of Platonico-Stoic 
philosophy, but he gives no place to the religious and 
cultual ideas by which he was surrounded in Egypt. It 
is as though they had no existence for him. 

To apply the comparative method to Paul would, 
therefore, generally speaking, mean nothing more or less 
than to explain him on the basis of Late Judaism. Those 
who give due weight to the eschatological character of 
his doctrine and to the problems and ideas which connect 
it with works like the Apocalypse of Ezra are the true 
exponents of " Comparative Religion," even though they 
may make no claim to this title. Any one who goes 
beyond this and tries to bring Paul into direct connexion 
with the Orient as such commits himself to the perilous 
path of scientific adventure. 

Considerations of that kind were not taken into account 
by Wrede and his followers. But even if they had become 
conscious of the difficulties in the way of the application 
of the method to Paul, they could not have acted otherwise. 



178 NEW CENTURY S PROBLEMS 

In spite of all theoretical warnings this path had to be 
followed. 

If once the mystical doctrine of the dying and rising 
again with Christ is recognised to be " physical," and the 
view of baptism and the Supper to be sacramental, and 
if it is a further datum of the question that Late Judaism 
knows nothing of mysticism or sacraments ; and if one 
is not content to assume that the Apostle has created or 
invented this non- Jewish element out of his inner con 
sciousness ; there is at first sight no alternative but to 
make the attempt to explain it from conceptions and 
suggestions which are supposed to have come into it 
from without, from some form or other of Oriental 
syncretism. 



VII 
PAULINISM AND COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

Gustav Anrich. Das antike Mysterienwesen in seinem Einfluss auf 
das Christentum. (The Ancient Mysteries in their Influence on 
Christianity.) 1894. 

Martin Briickner. Der sterbende und auferstehende Gottheiland in 
den orientalischen Religionen und ihr Verhaltnis zum Christentum. 
(The Saviour-God who dies and rises again in the Oriental Re 
ligions ; and their Relation to Christianity.) 1908. 

Karl Clemen. Religionsgeschichtliche Erklarung des Neuen Testa 
ments. (An Explanation of the New Testament on the basis of 
Comparative Religion.) 1909. 

Franz Cumont. Les Mysteres de Mithra. 1899. (E. T. by T. J. 
McCormack, 1903.) Les Religions orientales dans le paganisme 
remain. 1906. 

Adolf Deissmann. Licht vom Osten. 1908. (E. T. by L. R. M. 
Strachan, " Light from the Ancient East," 1910.) Die Urgeschichte 
des Christentums im Lichte der Sprachforschung. (The Early 
History of Christianity in the Light of Linguistic Research.) 1910. 

Albrecht Dieterich. Abraxas. 1891. Nekyia. 1893. Eine Mithras- 
liturgie. 1903. 

Arthur Drews. Die Christusmythe. 1909. (E. T. by C. D. Burns.) 

Albert Eichhorn. Das Abendmahl im Neuen Testament. (The 
Lord s Supper in the New Testament.) 1898. 

Johannes Geffken. Aus der Werdezeit des Christentums. (From the 
Formative Period of Christianity), 2nd ed., 1909. 

P. Gennrich. Die Lehre von der Wiedergeburt ... in der dogmen- 
geschichtlichen und religionsgeschichtlichen Betrachtung. (The 
Doctrine of Regeneration . . . from the point of view of the 
History of Dogma and of Comparative Religion.) 1907. 

Otto Gruppe. Die griechischen Kulte und Mythen in ihrer Beziehung 
zu den orientalischen Religionen. (The Greek Cults and Myths in 
their Relation to the Oriental Religions), vol. i., 1887. Griechische 
Mythologie und Religionsgeschichte. (Greek Mythology and 
Comparative Religion), 2 vols., 1906. 

Hermann Gunkel. Zum religionsgeschichtlichen Verstandnis des Neuen 
Testaments. (Contributions to the Understanding of the New 
Testament from the point of view of Comparative Religion.) 1903. 

179 




i8o PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

Adolf Harnack. Mission und Ausbreitung des Christentums in den 
ersten drei Jahrhunderten, vol. i., 1906. (E. T. by J. Moffatt, 
" The Mission and Expansion of Christianity in the First Three 
Centuries," 2nd ed., 1908.) 

Hugo Hepding. Attis, seine Mythen und sein Kult. (Attis, his 
Myths and Cultus.) 1903. 

W. Heitmuller. Taufe und Abendmahl bei Paulus. (Baptism and 
the Lord s Supper in Paul s Teaching.) 1903. 

Im Namen Jesu. Eine sprach- und religionsgeschichtliche Unter- 
suchung zum neuen Testament, speziell zur altchristlichen Taufe. 
1903. (In the Name of Jesus. A Study of the New Testament 
from the point of view of the History of Language and of Com 
parative Religion, with Special Reference to Early Christian 
Baptism.) 

Adolf Jacoby. Die antiken Mysterienreligionen und das Christentum. 
(The Ancient Mystery-religions and Christianity.) 1910. 

Georg Mau. Die Religionsphilosophie Kaiser Julians in seinen Reden 
auf Konig Helios und die Gottermutter. (The Emperor Julian s 
Philosophy of Religion as shown in his Orations on King Helios 
and the Dea Mater.) 1908. 

Max Maurenbrecher. Von Jerusalem nach Rom. (From Jerusalem 
to Rome.) 1910. 

Salomon Reinach. Cultes, mythes et religions. (1905-1906-1908.) 
Richard Reitzenstein. Poimandres. 1904. 

Die hellenistischen Mysterienreligionen. Ihre Grundgedanken und 
Wirkungen. (The Hellenistic Mystery- Religions. Their funda 
mental Ideas and their Influence.) 1910. 

E. Rob.de. Psyche. 1894. 3rd ed. 1903, 2 vols. 

H. R. Roscher. Lexikon der griechisch-romischen Mythologie. 
(Lexicon of Graeco-Roman Mythology.) 3 vols. 1884-1909. 

Ernst Eduard Schwartz. Paulus. Charakterkopfe aus der antiken 
Literatur. (Character Sketches from Ancient Literature.) 1910. 

W. B. Smith. Der vorchristliche Jesus nebst weiteren Vorstudien 
zur Entstehungsgeschichte des Urchristentums. (The pre-Christian 
Jesus, with other Preliminary Studies for a History of the Origin 
and Growth of Christianity.) 

Wilhelm Soltau. Das Fortleben des Heidentums in der altchristlichen 
Kirche. (The Survival of Paganism in the Early Christian Church.) 
1906. 

Hermann Usener. Religionsgeschichtliche Untersuchungen. (Studies 
in Comparative Religion.) 1889; 1899. 

Paul Wendland. Die hellenistisch-romische Kultur in ihren Bezie- 
hungen zu Judentum und Christentum. (Hellenistic-Roman Civilisa 
tion in Relation to Judaism and Christianity.) 1907. 

Paul Wernle. Die Anfange unserer Religion. 1901. (E. T. by 
G. A. Bienemann, " The Beginnings of Christianity," 1903.) 

Georg Wobbermin. Religionsgeschichtliche Studien zur Frage der 
Beeinflussung des Urchristentums durch das antike Mysterienwesen. 
(Studies in Comparative Religion with reference to the Question of 
the Influence of the Ancient Mysteries on Primitive Christianity.) 
1896. 



SOURCES OF THE CULTS 181 

To the Bonn philologist Hermann Usener belongs the 
credit of having been the first to bring the Comparative 
Study of the pagan religions as they existed at the be 
ginning of the Christian era into contact with theological 
science. 1 In E. Rohde s Psyche the Greek and late-Greek 
conceptions regarding ghost-worship and immortality 
were introduced to a wider circle of readers. 

A generally intelligible survey of the cults which come 
into question is offered by Franz Cumont in his work on 
the Oriental religions in Roman paganism. 2 

It was Phrygia in Asia Minor which gave to the world 
the worship of Attis and the Dea Mater ; from Egypt 
came that of Isis and Serapis ; Syria supplied the great 
sun-god whom Heliogabalus and Aurelian, for reasons of 

1 Hermann Usener, Religionsgeschichtliche Untersuchungen : " Das 
Weihnachtsfest " (1889, 337 pp.) ; " Die Sintflutsagen " (1899, 276 pp.) 
("Studies in Comparative Religion, Christmas, 1889. The Flood- 
legends, 1899"). Other works which played an important part in 
creating the new horizon were Albrecht Dieterich s works on Com 
parative Religion, Abraxas (1891, 221 pp. On a Hellenistic myth of 
the Creation, and Judaeo-Orphico-Gnostic cults) and Nekyia, con 
tributions to the explanation of the " Apocalypse of Peter" (1893, 238 
pp.). The description of the torments of hell in the Akhmim fragment 
is based, he thinks, not on Jewish eschatology, but on .conceptions which 
are found in the Orphic literature. 

* Les Religions orientates dans le paganisme romain, ist ed., 1906 ; 
2nd ed., 1909, 427 pp. Based on Lectures delivered in the year 1905 
in the College de France. 

We may note also some of the essays in Salomon Reinach s Cultes, 
mythes et religions, 3 vols., 1905-1906-1908 (466, 466, and 537 pp.). 

Otto Gruppe, Die griechischen Kulte und Mythen in ihrer Beziehung 
zu den orientalischen Religionen ("Greek cults and Myths in their 
relation to the Oriental Religions"), vol. i., 1887, 706 pp.; and 
Griechische Mythologie und Religionsgeschichte (" Greek Mythology 
and the History of Greek Religions "). In Iwan Miiller s Handbuch der 
klassischen Altertumswissenschaft (" Handbook of Classical Antiqui 
ties"), 1906, 2 vols., embracing 1923 pp. 

Georg Mau. Die Religionsphilosophie Kaiser Julians in seinen 
Reden auf Konig Helios und die Gottermutter ("The Emperor Julian s 
Philosophy of Religion in his Orations on King Helios and the Dea 
Mater "), 1908, 169 pp. In the appendix there is a German translation 
of both discourses. 

Of a popular and unscientific character is H. E. de Jong s Das 
antike Mysterienwesen in religionsgeschichtlicher, ethnologischer und 
psychologischer Beleuchtung ("The Ancient Mystery-religions in the 
Light of Comparative Religion, Ethnology, and Psychology"), 1909 
362 pp. The author is disposed to cite the modern occult " mani 
festations " in relation to the astral body in order to explain certain 
" appearances " in the ceremonies of initiation to the mysteries. 



i82 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

state, proclaimed as the supreme divinity. The religion 
of Mithra is of Persian origin. 

Of these cults, ancient literature, both pagan and 
Christian, has preserved some records, but it is only since 
discoveries of inscriptions and papyri have supplemented 
this information 1 that any real understanding of the 
character and history of these religions has become 
possible. 

The myth on which the worship of Cybele and Attis is 
based has been handed down in various and conflicting 
versions. 

So much, however, is certain, that Attis, the beloved 
of the Dea Mater, was represented as having been killed 
by a boar sent by Zeus, or by the jealous goddess herself. 
Every year in the spring-time there took place at Pessinus 
the great orgiastic lamentation for him, which, however, 
ended with a joyful festival. It seems, therefore, as if a 
resurrection of the slain Attis was assumed to have taken 
place, although the myth had nothing to say about that, 
but only in some of the versions related that he was 
changed into an evergreen fir tree. 

At bottom it is a form of nature-worship, which 
shows a close relationship with that of the Thracian 
Dionysus-Sabazios and with that of Adonis as wor 
shipped at Byblos in Syria, and it has in some respects 
undergone modification due to contact with these. The 
primary idea underlying both myth and cultus is the 
decay and revival of vegetable life. 

The worship of Cybele and Attis penetrated to Rome 
as early as the year 204 B.C. In the previous year the 
Sibylline books had given the oracle that Hannibal 
would not be driven out of Italy until the sacred stone 
from Pessinus was brought to Rome. This was done ; 

1 On what follows see Hugo Hepding, Attis, seine Mythen und sein 
Kult, 1903, 224 pp. First volume of the series of " Religions- 
geschichtliche Versuche und Vorarbeiten," edited by Dieterich and 
Wiinsch. Cf. also Ernst Schmidt, Kultiibertragungen (Cultus- Trans 
ferences : "Magna Mater," "Asklepios," "Sarapis"). In the same 
series vol. viii., 1909. 



THE MYSTERIES OF ATTIS 183 

and the Carthaginians vacated the country. The foreign 
divinities had a temple assigned to them on the Palatine. 
But when the Senate came to know of the orgiastic feast 
which was associated with their worship, it forbade the 
citizens to take part in it and placed the cult under 
strict control. Thus, in spite of its official recognition, it 
led a somewhat obscure existence until Claudius, by the 
public festival which he established for it which lasted 
from the I5th to the 27th March gave it a high position 
in public esteem. 

In the deepening of its religious character which it 
underwent in becoming associated with Greek religious 
feeling of the decadence period, the worship of Attis was 
brought into connexion with the thought of immortality. 
In the " Agape," in which the partakers were handed 
food in the " tympanon " and drink in the " cymbalon," 
they were initiated as " mystae " of Attis and thereby 
became partakers of a higher life. 

Mysteries were also celebrated in which a dying and 
rising again was symbolised ; and there were others 
based upon the thought of a union with the divinity in 
the bridal chamber. 

From the middle of the second century onward the 
" taurobolium " appears in connexion with the service ^ ^cs 
of Cybele and Attis. This is a kind of blood-baptism. 
The " mystes " lies down in a pit, which is covered with 
boards. Through the interstices there trickles down on 
him the blood of a bull offered in sacrifice. The lamenta- ^nfl 
tion for the dead Attis sounds forth ; the " mystes " 
applies it to himself. Then when the hymn of jubilation 
follows, he rises out of the grave as one who is now initiate 
and deified. 1 

The process by which the worship of Attis was trans 
formed into a mystery-religion which gave guarantees 
of immortality remains for the most part shrouded in 
obscurity. In view of the scantiness of our information 

1 On the original significance of the Taurobolium see Cumont, Les 
Religions orientales, pp. 101-103. 



184 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

we are thrown back upon hypothetical reconstruction 
for the details of the development and the significance 
of the mysteries. 1 

The worship of Serapis was a creation of Ptolemy Soter, 
who desired to unite the Greek and Egyptian populations 
of his empire by the bond of a common worship. The 
derivation of the word Serapis is uncertain. Whether it 
arose from Osiris-Apis or from the Chaldaean Sar-Apsi 
is a debated point. The cultus language was Greek. 
Serapis was doubled with Osiris. The new cult went 
forth into the world as the religion of Serapis and Isis. 
In Rome it was vehemently opposed as being immoral ; 
the temples of Isis, who was identified with Venus, justified 
this reputation. It was not officially recognised until the 
time of Caligula. By this time it was, however, widely 
diffused wherever the Greek language was spoken. Its 
adherents were found chiefly among the slaves and 
freedmen. From the third century onwards it is over 
shadowed by the worship of Mithra. 

The myth, which was represented annually, makes the 
mourning Isis seek out the scattered fragments of the 
corpse of Osiris and raise a lament over it. Then the 
limbs are laid together and wound round with bandages, 
whereupon Thoth and Horus raise the slain Osiris to life 
again, and this is announced amid jubilant outcries. 

In the service of Osiris-Serapis the worshipper gains 
assurance of eternal life. Therein consisted the attraction 
of this religion. 

The early Egyptian doctrine was simple enough. 
After his resurrection Osiris became lord of the world 

1 Note the admission of Hugo Hepding at the close of his chapter 
on the Mysteries (p. 199) : " I am well aware that this account of the 
Phrygian Mysteries is in its details mainly hypothetical. In view of 
the paucity of the information which has come down to us, nothing 
else is possible. In particular the association of the blood baptism 
with the March festival cannot be shown from our documentary 

material " He wants to distinguish between an earlier and 

a later form of the taurobolium. The earlier form is not a ceremony of 
initiation but a sacrifice. It was only the later which had in view 
the initiation of the individual. " The first person whom we know 
by literary evidence to have undergone the ceremony of the taurobolium 
is Heliogabalus. " 



THE MYSTERIES OF SERAPIS 185 

and at the same time judge of the dead. Those who at 
their trial before him are not approved fall a prey to 
destruction ; others have eternal life with him in a realm 
below the earth. 

Life and this was the tremendously serious feature 
of this religion was therefore regarded as a preparation 
for death. This is the thought reflected in the mysteries, 
no doubt modelled on those of Eleusis, 1 which were 
attached to the Egyptian cultus after the worship of 
Serapis-Osiris had been ordained by authority. They 
represent the esoteric element. By means of the tests 
which he undergoes in the Serapeum, of the ecstasy which 
he experiences and the ceremonies of initiation in which 
he takes part the believer wins his way, along with 
Osiris, from death to life, and acquires the assurance of 
eternal being. 

Distinct from these mysteries is the exoteric religion 
with its daily acts of worship. These consist in the un 
veiling, awaking, clothing, and feeding of the statues of 
the gods. The " liturgy," which was everywhere punc 
tiliously followed, is derived from the primitive Egyptian 
religion. Speaking generally, the exoteric form of the 
worship of Osiris could come to terms with any, even the 
lowest, forms of paganism. 

The Syrian Baal-cults had no doubt from the second 
century onwards become widely diffused, and in the third 
century enjoyed the favour of the Emperors. For the 
development of popular religion, however, they were of 
less significance than the religions of Attis and Osiris, 
because they were not capable of becoming ennobled 
and deepened by the religious yearnings of the Greek 
spirit. 

Mithra was the father of the sun-god. 2 The origin of 

1 On the Eleusinian Mysteries see Rohde, Psyche (3rd ed., 1909) 
pp. 278-300. From his account it clearly appears how little we know 
about these ceremonies of initiation. In any case they were quite 
different from those of the later Mystery-religions. They belong to 
early Greek religion. 

a Franz Cumont, Les MystHres de Mithra (ist ed., 1899 ; 2nd ed., 
1902). 



i86 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

the cult is obscure. It first became known through the 
pirates who were taken prisoners by Pompey. It spread 
through the Roman armies which in the first century 
advanced towards the Euphrates ; they took it over from 
their opponents. Thus Mithra was primarily a soldiers 
god. With the legions he penetrated to the utmost 
bounds of the Roman Empire. He therefore passed direct 
from the barbarians into the Roman world without 
previously becoming at home in the Greek world. From 
the middle of the third century onwards the new cult 
spread so vigorously that it was regarded as the strongest 
rival of Christianity. 

In the intervening period, from the first century on 
ward, it adopted in growing measure elements from all 
the other cults, and in this way became the universal 
" worship." 

Regarding the myth, little is known ; and in the cultus 
it played no special part. As the " slayer of the bull " 
Mithra doubtless belongs to the class of star-gods, and 
represents the supreme sun-god. 

The characteristic feature of this religion is its dualism. 
Mithra, as the supreme, good god, is opposed by the powers 
of the evil under-world. Hence the earnest character of 
its ethic, which is not contemplative as in the Osiris cult, 
but active. 

The secret of the power of this new faith lies indeed 
mainly in the impulse to action which essentially belongs 
to it, and in the large and simple ethical life to which 
this conception of the divinity gives rise. The Mithra- 
religion, differing in this from the Egyptian cults, places 
the scene of eternal life in an upper realm of light and 
not in the under-world. The supreme divinity himself 
guides the souls of departed believers through the seven 
planetary spheres to the land of the blessed, and thus 
becomes their " Redeemer." 

As Mysteries there are observed here, as in other cults, 
sacred meals and baptismal rites. Above these again 
there was, according to Dieterich, a supreme initiation, 



THE RELIGION OF MITHRA 187 

which represented a progress to the throne of Mithra. 
The actions and the formulae used in this ceremony 
are, he thinks, preserved almost complete in the great 
Parisian " magic " papyrus. Dieterich, who is opposed 
on this point by Cumont and Reitzenstein, denominates 
this document a " Mithra-liturgy," and supposes the 
prayers to be used in the course of the ascent which 
conducts the " mystes " from the world of the four 
elements through the stars to the realm of the gods, 
where, under the guidance of the sun-god, he passes 
through the heaven of the fixed stars and attains to the 
presence of the highest god. 1 

This process he conceives as having been represented, 
as part of the cultus, in the Mithra-grottos, which is 
rendered not improbable by the discoveries of objects 
which might have to do with a mise en sctlne corresponding 
to this conception. In any case there was some sacra 
mental representation of the heavenward journey of the 
soul towards the attainment of immortality. It remains 
questionable whether, as the supreme mystery which 
the religion possessed, it was " experienced " by the 
believers only once, or had its regular place in the 
cultus. 

The prayers extol in lofty language re-birth from the 
mortal to the immortal life. The invocation with which 
the " mystes " approaches Mithra is highly impressive. 
" Hail to thee, lord, ruler of the water ; hail to thee, 
stablisher of the earth ; hail to thee, disposer of the spirit. 
Lord, I that am born again take my departure, being 
exalted on high, and since I am exalted, I die ; born by 
the birth which engenders life, I am redeemed unto death, 

1 Albrecht Dieterich, Eine Mithrasliturgie, ist ed., 1903 ; 2nd ed., 
1910 (edited after the author s death by Richard Wiinsch), 248 pp. 
The excursuses, pp. 92-212, really give a sketch of the fundamental ideas 
of the Mystery-religions in general. Cumont refuses to regard the 
document as a fragment belonging to a Mithras-liturgy because he 
cannot find in it the specific characteristics of the Persian eschatology 
and conception of heaven. On this controversy see the 2nd edition 
of the Mithras-liturgy, pp. 225-228. It would certainly have been 
better if Dieterich had not given the book the unnecessary and con 
tentious title. 



i88 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

and go the way which thou hast appointed, as thou hast 
made for a law and created the sacrament . . ." l Here 
the text breaks off. Perhaps later on the return of the 
initiate to earth was described. Dieterich, however, 
thinks this improbable. 

According to Dieterich the liturgy arose in the second 
century, and belongs to the Graeco - Egyptian Mithra- 
cult ; about 200 A.D. it was annexed by the " magians " 
and from that time forward was preserved among them ; 
about 300 it was embodied in the Paris manuscript which 
has come down to us. 

A valuable insight into the feelings and impressions 
associated with the Mysteries is given by the Hermetic 
writings, preserved mainly in " Poimandres." They 
profess to be derived from Hermes, who in the thought of 
later times became the god of revelation, and in the 
prominence which they give to the philosophico-religious 
element they mark a stage in the development of Greek 
religious thought from the Mystery-religions to Neo- 
Platonism. In their present form the documents of this 
later Hermetic religion, which is marked by a certain 
profundity, doubtless belong to about the third century ; 
but the original form dates, perhaps, from before the 
beginning of the second century. 

These are the cults and religions which have to be 
taken into account. They are parallel to Christianity 
in so far that they, like it though in general doubtless 
somewhat later make their appearance in the ancient 
world as religions of redemption. Certain analogies 
are not to be denied. The only question is how 
far these go, and how far the Mystery-religions really 
exercised an influence upon the views and the cultus- 

1 From Dieterich, p. 15. 

2 Richard Reitzenstein, Poimandres. Studies in Graeco-Egyptian 
and Early Christian literature, 1904, 382 pp. The Poimandres " com 
munity " \Gemeinde, the word is in quotation marks in the German, 
perhaps to recall its frequent use in speaking of the Early Christian 
Church] is supposed to have been founded in Egypt about the time of 
the birth of Christ. Its main characteristic is the mystical basis of the 
doctrine. Later on, in the course of the third century (?) the Poimandres 
community was gradually merged in the general Hermetic communities. 



FIRST COMPARATIVE STUDIES 189 

forms of the early, and especially of the primitive, 
church. 1 

The first to examine the facts with any closeness was 
Anrich in his work, " The Ancient Mysteries and their 
Influence on Christianity." 

He comes to the conclusion that both the Pauline and i . 
the Johannine views of Christianity " are to be -understood 
as in the main original creations of the Christian spirit 
on the basis of genuine Judaism," and if they show the 
influence of Greek thought, it is at most in a secondary 
fashion. There is, he asserts, " no apparent reason to 
refer the views on baptism and the communion-meal 
which meet us in the two cases to influences of the latter 
character." It is only at a later time that a real influence 
comes into question. 

1 From the literature we may note : Hermann Gunkel, Zum re- 
ligionsgeschichtlichen Verstdndnis des Neuen Testaments (" Contributions 
to the Understanding of the New Testament on the Basis of Comparative 
Religion"), 1903, 96 pp. 

Paul Wendland, Die hellenistisch-romische Kultur in ihren Bezie- 
hungen zu Judentum und Ckristentum ("The Hellenistic - Roman 
Civilisation in Relation to Judaism and Christianity "), 1907, 190 pp. 

Adolf Deissmann, Licht vom Osten (" Light from the Ancient East "), 
1908, 364 pp. This book, which is rather rhetorically written, treats 
mainly the general literary side of the matter without entering specially 
into the religious problems and the ideas of the Mystery-religions. The 
same author has published a lecture, Die Urgeschichte des Christentums 
im Lichte der Sprachforschung (" The History of Primitive Christianity 
in the Light of Linguistic Research"), 1910, 48 pp. 

Karl Clemen, Religionsgeschichtliche Erkldrung des Neuen Testaments 
(" Interpretation of the New Testament on the Basis of Comparative 
Religion"), 1909, 301 pp. 

Works which to a large extent deal with the same class of subject 
are : Wilhelm Soltau, Das Fortleben des Heidentums in der altchristlichen 
Kirche ("The Survival of Paganism within the Early Christian 
Church"), 1906, 307 pp. Adolf Harnack, Mission und Ausbreitung des 
Christentums in den ersten drei J ahrhunderten (" Mission and Expansion 
of Christianity in the first three Centuries "), vol. i., 1906, 421 pp. 

2 Gustav Anrich, Das antike Mysterienwesen in seinem Einfluss auf 
das Christentum, 1894, 237 pp. From the same stand-point, and in 
some respects supplementing Anrich s work, is Georg Wobbermin s 
Religionsgeschichtliche Studien zur Frage der Beeinflussung des Urchris- 
tentums durch das antike Mysterienwesen (" Studies from the Point of 
View of Comparative Religion on the Question of the Influence of the 
ancient Mysteries upon Christianity "), 1896, 190 pp. 

Johannes Geffken in his popular work, A us der Werdezeit des Chris 
tentums, 2nd ed., 1909, 126 pp. (" From the Formative Period of Christi 
anity "), does not hold that any very deep influence was exercised by the 
Graeco-Roman Syncretism on early Christianity. He is, however, of 
opinion that Paul " adopted all kinds of oriental views." 



190 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

This negative conclusion has since been much disputed. 
That the author, in accordance with the position of Pauline 
scholarship at that period, did not sufficiently take into 
account the " physical " element in the mystical doctrine 
of redemption and in the conception of baptism and the 
Lord s Supper, and consequently does not give sufficient 
weight to the analogy between the religion of the Apostle 
of the Gentiles and that of the Mysteries, is certain. But 
it ought to be recognised as equally certain that to many 
points he has given the prominence which they deserved, 
and that the students of Comparative Religion would have 
in many respects done better if they had allowed their bold 
advance to be somewhat checked by his prudent warnings, 
and had learned something from him in regard to the 
formulation of the problems. 

A point which ought to be more clearly grasped than 
it has hitherto been, in the investigation of Paul s relation 
to the Mystery-religions, is that for^jpurposes of compari 
son Paulinism must be regarded as a distinct entity ; 
very often Paul s doctrine has been included in the 
" Religion of the New Testament " or taken together 
with the Johannine and the Early Greek theology. On 
this method only false results can be looked for. Paulin 
ism, and therein lies the special problem which it offers 
to scholarship, is an original phenomenon which is wholly 
distinct from Greek theology. 

This implies, too, that only the literal sense of the 
language of the Epistles must be considered, and that it is 
not permissible to interpret it through the Johannine 
theology, as is almost always done. It is nothing less 
than incredible that, to take the most flagrant example, 
philologists like Dieterich and others in discussing Paulin 
ism, always calmly talk about " Re-birth," although in 
the Epistles which rank as certainly genuine, this 
word and the corresponding verb never occur. 1 That 

1 See e.g. Dieterich, Mithrasliturgie, 2nd ed., p. no. Typical also are 
pp. 176, 177, where he continually speaks of the " death and re-birth " 
of believers as taught by Paul. 

[Wiedergeburt has been translated "re-birth" when the general 



" RESURRECTION " NOT " RE-BIRTH " 191 

many theologians fall into the same confusion is no 
excuse. 1 

The surprising thing is precisely that Paul, when he is 
speaking of the transformation of the man into a new *^fj/* 
creature, always makes use of the two words death and 
resurrection, and describes the new thing that comes 
about as an already experienced resurrection, without 
ever introducing the conception of re-birth which seems 
to lie so near at hand. In this limitation lies his as yet 
unexplained peculiarity, and therewith the problem of 
his relation to Greek theology and, in general, to every 
thing that can be called Greek religious life. 

The Johannine doctrine, that of the earlier Greek 
Fathers, and the Mystery-religions, have this in common, 
that they make use of the conception of re-birth. In that, 
they show themselves to be growths of the same soil, 
and stand together over against Paulinism. Any one 
who interprets the language of the Apostle of the Gentiles 
in accordance with the conception of re-birth, has, by the 
aid of the Johannine theology, first conformed it to the 
Mystery-religions, and has himself introduced the concep 
tion which forms the common basis. 

The same procedure has been followed in regard to 
other points also. The Paulinism which the students of 
Comparative Religion have in view is mainly an artificial 
product which has been previously treated with the 
acids and reagents of Greek theology. 

Another point which calls for close attention is the 
chronological question in connexion with the history of 
the Mystery-religions. It is from the beginning of the 

sense implied in the comparison with other religions is in view ; "re 
generation " when the reference is primarily to the specific Christian 
doctrine as such.] 

1 P. Gennrich in his book, Die Lehre von der Wiedergeburt . . . in 
dogmengeschichtlicher und religionsgeschichtlicher Beleuchtung ("The 
Doctrine of Regeneration ... in the Light of the History of Dogma, 
and of Comparative Religion "), 1907, 363 pp., notes that Paul speaks 
only of the "new creature" and not of regeneration; but he dors not 
"investigate the cause of this peculiarity, tut hastens to give a psycho 
logical explanation of his utterances as a " precipitate from his personal 
experience." 



4***" i y &gt;r^^ irin ^ 

t^ ^v-f &lt;","- 



192 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

second century onwards that these cults become widely 
extended in the Roman empire. It is only at this period 
the worship of Serapis as an artificial Graeco-Egyptian 
creation is perhaps an exception that they come under 
the influence of late Greek religious thought and feeling, 
which developed with the decline of the Stoa, and be 
come transformed from imported cults into universal 
Mystery-religions. The dates and the inner course of this 
development are for us obscure. So much, however, is 
certain, that Paul cannot have known the mystery- 
religions in the form in which they are known to us, 
because in this fully-developed form they did not yet 
^xlst. Assuming the most favourable case, that from his 
youth up he had had open eyes and ears for the heathen 
religions by which he was surrounded, he can only have 
known the cults as they were in their uncompounded 
state, not as what they passed into when they became 
filled with the Greek yearning for redemption, and mutu 
ally influenced one another. 

Considerations of this kind lead an authority like 
Cumont to insist again and again upon the difficulties 
which stand in the way of assuming an influence of the 
Mystery-cults on the earliest Christianity. 1 Especially 
does he hold it to be quite impossible that the Mithra- 
religion should have had any point of contact with 
Paul. 

Another point which should be mentioned is that 
those who are engaged in making these comparisons are 
rather apt to give the Mystery-religions a greater definite- 
ness and articulation of thought than they really possess,^ 
and do not always give sufficient prominence to the 
distinction between their own hypothetical reconstruction 
and the medley of statements on which it is based. 
Almost all the popular writings fall into this kind 
of inaccuracy. They manufacture out of the various 
fragments of information a kind of universal Mystery- 

1 See the introduction to Les Religions orientales dans le paganisme 
romain, 2nd ed., 1909. 



THE " REDEEMER-GOD 



193 



religion which never actually existed, least of all in 
Paul s day. 1 

In particular, these works aim at getting hold of the 
idea of a " Greek Redeemer-god " who might serve as an 
analogue to Jesus Christ. No figure deserving of this 
designation occurs in any myth or in any Mystery- 
religion ; it is created by a process of generalisation, 
abstraction, and reconstruction. Before using the phrase 
Redeemer-God, one should remember that it means a 
God who for the sake of men came into the world, died 
and rose again. Having realised that, one may then try 
how far the Mystery-religions supply anything correspond 
ing to this the only adequate definition. 2 

1 Typical in this respect is the work of Martin Bruckner, Der ster- 
bende und auferstehende Gottheiland in den orientalischen Religionen 
und ihr Verhdltnis zum Christentum (" The divine Saviour who dies 
and rises again in the Oriental Religions ; and their Relation to Chris 
tianity "). In the series of Religionsgeschichtliche Volksbucher, 1908, 48 pp. 
" As in Christianity, so in many Oriental religions, a belief in the death 
and resurrection of a Redeemer-God, who was subordinated to the 
Supreme God (sometimes as His Son) occupied a central place in the ; 
worship and cultus." What manipulation the myths and rites of the 
cults in question must have undergone before this general statement 
could become possible ! Where is there anything about dying and . 
resurrection in Mithra ? It is instructive to see how the author on p. 30 , 
argues away the effect of this admission ! 

A popular treatment which is kept within due bounds is Adolf 
Jacoby s work, Die antiken Mysterienreligionen und das Christentum 
("The ancient Mystery-religions and Christianity"), 1910, 44 pp., in 
the series of Religionsgeschichtliche Volksbucher. The author deserves 
special credit for offering his readers typical texts from which they 
can form their own impression. 

Dieterich remarks with great justice in the Mithrasliturgie (2nd ed., 
207) how necessary it is to get beyond the catchword " Syncretistic," 
and point out in every case the source of particular mythological state 
ments and ideas. 

2 O. Gruppe, too, is obliged to admit that the Jate Greek religious 
thought never really had the conception of a " world-redeemer " 
(Gricchische Mythologie und Religionsgeschichte] , vol. ii., pp. 1485-1489. 
It cannot, in fact, be otherwise. The " world-redeemer " of Jewish and 
Christian apocalyptic thought corresponds to the " new world " which 
he is in some supernatural fashion to bring in, in order to reign in it 
along with the elect. Graeco-oriental religions did not look for a 
kingdom of that kind, and therefore the idea of the ruler of such a king 
dom was also undiscoverable and unattainable for them. The Messiah 
is the World-redeemer or Lord of the coming age. He does not make 
atonement for the guilt of mankind nor for that of individuals, but 
suffers and dies vicariously for the elect, and in order to set the events 
of the End in motion. His earthly fate is nothing in itself, but falls 
wholly under the conception of the " Messianic woes " which are &gt; 

13 



jf^ 194 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

It is also to be remarked that, on the other hand, 
there is no " Redeemer-god " in Primitive Christianity. 
Jesus is, it cannot be sufficiently emphasised, not thought 
of as a god, but only as a heavenly being, who is entrusted 
with the mission of bringing in the new world. It was 
only later in the Greek and Gnostic theology that He was 
deified. For Paul he is " Son of God " in the simple, 
Old-Testament and Apocalyptic sense. 

We may further recall Cumont s warning that analogies 
do not necessarily imply dependence. " Resemblances," 
he writes in the preface to his Religions orientates, " do 
not always imply imitation, and the resemblance of views 
or usages must often be explained by community of 
origin, not by any kind of borrowing." In the same essay 
he points out that analogies are sometimes exaggerated, 
if not actually created, by the use of language chosen by 
the critic. 

And Dieterich expresses himself in the following terms 
against this mania for finding analogies. " It is," he writes, 
in his edition of the " Mithra-liturgy," " one of the worst 
faults of the science of Comparative Religion, which is at 
present becoming constantly less cautious, to overlook 
the most natural explanations, not to say ignore and 
avoid them, in order to have recourse to the most far 
fetched, and, by the most eccentric methods, to drag out 
analogies which, to the unsophisticated eye, are absolutely 
invisible." 

These are the principles by which it has to be decided, 
whether Comparative Religion has hunted down its 
game according to fair forest-law, or whether its " bag " 
is poached. 

The chief point to which research was at first directed 
was the discovery of relationships between the two sets 
of sacramental views. 

It seemed so easy to discover common conceptions 

thought of as the tribulation of the Times of the End. How can it be 
proposed to find an analogue to a figure of this kind in myths, the 
scene of which is laid in the dawn of the world, and which have no 
sort of relation to its ultimate fate. 



# 



ANALOGUES FOR THE SACRAMENTS 195 

here, in view of the fact that in both cases cultus^meals 
and lustrations played a part and had a sacramental 
value. But, on closer examination, it appears that it is 
very difficult to get beyond the simple fact of resemblance 
of a very general character. 

Dieterich, in his commentary on the " Mithra-liturgy," 
is obliged to admit that we have very little exact know 
ledge regarding the sacred meals of the Mystery-religions. 1 
That they were supposed to convey supernatural powers 
is about the only thing that can be said with safety. 
Regarding the special conceptions and actions which 
made this eating and drinking sacramental no information 
has been preserved. A comparison not to speak of the 
establishment of a relation of dependence is therefore 
impossible. 

As soon as the students of Comparative Religion at 
tempt to bring forward concrete facts, they are obliged 
to leave the domain of the mystery-religions and draw 
their material from the primitive Nature-religions. Here 
they find the primary conception a man believes that 
he unites himself with the divinity by eating portions 
of him, or this is a secondary stage of the conception 
by consuming some substance which has been marked 
out for this purpose as representative of the divinity and 
has had his name attached to it. 

The following series of examples recurs in all the 
books : 

The dead Pharaoh, when he enters heaven, causes his 
servants to seize, bind, and slay the gods, and then devours 
them in order thus to absorb into himself their strength 
and wisdom, and to become the strongest of all. 

In Egypt anyone who wishes to become truthful 
swallows a small image of the goddess of truth. 

In the Thracian orgiastic worship of Dionysos Sabazios 

1 P. 102 ff. He has at this point a detailed discussion of the relations 
between the cultus-meal in Paul and that of the Mystery-religions. 

On the sacraments see also K. Clemen, Religionsgeschichtliche 
Erkldrung des Neuen Testaments, 1909, 301 pp. Baptism and the 
Supper, 165-207. 



196 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

the sacrificial ox is torn to pieces by the participants 
while yet alive, and swallowed raw. 

A Bedouin tribe in the Sinai peninsula slaughters, amid 
chanting, a camel bound upon the altar, and then eagerly 
drinks its blood and immediately devours the still bloody 
flesh half raw. 

The Aztecs, before sacrificing and eating their prisoners 
of war, give them the name of the deity to whom the sacri 
fice is offered. 

Now, by the round-about way of this primitive con 
ception the connexion between Paul s cultus-feast and 
that of the Mystery-religions which cannot be directly 
shown is supposed to be established. 

It is suggested that this primitive conception of union 
with the god in the cultus, by an act of eating performed 
with this special purpose, after it had in the normal de 
velopment of the various religions been transformed or 
completely laid aside, came to life again in the mysticism 
of the Mystery-religions and of Paulinism. Mysticism, 
according to Dieterich s view, draws its nourishment 
from the lowest strata of religious ideas. The belief 
in the union of God and man which, among the cultured 
classes, was no longer anything but a metaphor, rises up 
again from below with irrepressible power. " Rising from 
below, the old ideas acquire new power in the history of 
religion. The revolution from beneath creates new 
religious life within the primeval, indestructible forms." 

That we have here a combination of two still unproved 
hypotheses is not sufficiently emphasised. In the Mystery- 
religions ancient cults certainly enter into direct union 
with higher religious conceptions, so that the general 
presupposition on which this hypothesis of Comparative 
Religion is based is to a certain extent admissible. But 
whether precisely this primitive conception of the mystic 
fellowship created by eating and drinking the god 
awakened to new life in them, must remain an open 
question, since our information does not suffice to prove 

1 Mithrasliturgie, 2nd ed. pp. 107, 108. 



THE SACRIFICIAL FEAST 197 

it. Of an eating of the god there is nowhere any mention. 
And the primitive Mysteries were not founded on this 
idea. Rather, they consist essentially in the representa 
tion of the actions performed by the divinity, and rest 
on the thought that the reproduction of these events 
will create in the participant some kind of corresponding 
reality. It is a symbolism which is charged with a certain 
energy, a drama which becomes real. 

This being so, the significance of the cultus-meal 
comes much less into view than that of the pattern actions 
which had to be further developed and interpreted. If 
we possess so few typical statements about the Mystery- 
feasts, is it not partly because they had no very remark 
able features and did not take a very exalted position in 
the hierarchy of cultus-acts ? If in the Paris Magic- 
papyrus we really possess a Mithra-liturgy, and if the 
inferences and explanations which Dieterich has attached 
to it are sound, then we have proof that in this developed 
cultus of the second century the highest sacrament was a 
pictorial mystery in which the " mystes " believed that 
he in some way experienced the heavenly journey of the 
soul which he, along with others, enacted. 

In any case, the assertion that in the Mystery-religions 
the ancient cultus-conception of a union with the divinity 
effected by a meal, came to life again, goes far beyond 
what can be proved. That union is, even in its secondary 
forms, always closely connected with a sacrificial feast, 
and cannot properly be detached from it. The sacrificial 
feast, however, is not a feature in the Mystery-religions, 
and so far as we can get a glimpse of their beginnings never 
had any supreme importance in them. The interpreta 
tion of these cults on the analogy of the primitive religions 
of various races, ancient or modern, who devoured oxen, 
camels, or prisoners of war as substitutes for the divinity, 
cannot therefore be established. 

The vestiges of this ancient conception are to be 
found, not in the Mystery-religions, but in the ordinary 
heathen sacrificial worship, in cases where the sacrificial 



ig8 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

feast has been retained in connexion with it. Here 
there certainly exists in some form or other the concep 
tion of a fellowship with the god set up by eating. It is 
to be noted that Paul in I Cor. x. draws a parallel between 
the Lord s Supper, which unites us to Christ, and these 
feasts. How expositors have arrived at the idea of mak 
ing him refer here to the cultus-meal of the Mystery- 
religions is quite inexplicable. 

The hypothesis that the earliest Christian conception 
of the Lord s Supper in some way represented the sur 
viving influence of an ancient cultus idea, is at first sight 
much more plausible than the corresponding hypothesis 
in the case of the Mystery-religions. At anyrate the 
existence of the desiderated fact is here proved. The 
conception of the sacramental eating stands in the centre 
of the belief ; by this act, fellowship with a divine Being 
who has died and risen again is maintained ; and what 
is eaten and drunk is brought into relation to the person 
of Christ, inasmuch as it is called, in some sense or other, 
His body and blood. 

Nevertheless in the decisive point the alleged facts 
break down. 

Paul knows nothing of an eating and drinking of the 
body and blood of the Lord. When Dieterich gives it as 
the Apostle s view that " Christ is eaten and drunk by the 
believers and is thereby in them," and adds that nothing 
further need be said about the matter, what he has done 
is, instead of taking Paul s words as they stand, to inter 
pret Paul through John and through a misunderstand 
ing of John at that. 

It is not of an eating and drinking the body and blood 
of Christ that Paul speaks in the First Epistle to the 
Corinthians ; he always speaks only of eating and drinking 
the bread and the cup. He assumes, no doubt, that this 
somehow or other maintains a communion with the body 
and blood of Christ (i Cor. x. 16, 17), and that anyone 
who partakes unworthily sins against the body and blood 
of the Lord (i Cor. xi. 27). He quotes, too, the words 



DIFFICULTIES OF PAUL S DOCTRINE 199 

in which the Lord, on the historic night, after the Supper, 
speaks of bread and wine as His body and His blood. 
But the conception which seems inevitably to arise out 
of this, that the participant partakes of the body and 
blood of the Lord, is not found in him. 

The recognition of this fact does not make his sacra 
mental doctrine any clearer. It is a question of fulfilling 
the demand of sound scholarship that we should respect 
the text, and not interpret it on the basis of inferences 
which the Apostle neither drew nor could draw. His 
fundamental view that the feast effects or maintains 
fellowship with the exalted Christ is perfectly clear. 
What is not clear is how he brought this view into relation 
with the historic words of Jesus about the bread and wine 
as being His body and blood, and interpreted it in accord 
ance therewith. Did it arise out of these words, or did he 
receive it from some other quarter and afterwards make 
use of it for the interpretation of the historic words ? 

The difficulty lies in the fact that for Paul the body 
and blood of the historic Christ no longer exist, and that, 
on the other hand, while the glorified Christ has, indeed, a 
body, it is not a body through which blood flows and which 
is capable of being consumed on earth. To speak of 
the body and blood of Christ is, from the stand-point of 
the Apostle s doctrine, an absurdity. He cannot in his 
doctrine of the Supper bring the historic words into 
harmony with his Christology, and yet is obliged to do so. 
The compromise remains for us obscure. 

It is certain, however, that neither he nor the primitive 
Christian community held that the body and blood of 
Christ was partaken of in the Supper. That is evident 
from the fact that the historic words of Jesus did not 
form part of the service, and this is the case down to a 
later date. No kind of consecration of the elements as 
the body and blood of the Lord occurred in the liturgy. 

If there is anything which may be considered as a 
definite result of recent research, it is that the view of 
primitive and early Christianity regarding the Lord s 



200 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

Supper was not arrived at by way of inference from the 
words of Jesus about bread and wine and flesh and blood, 
but, strange as it may appear, arose from a different 
quarter. The Church s celebration was not shaped 
by the " words of institution " at the historic Supper ; 
it was the latter, on the contrary, which were explained 
in accordance with the significance of the celebration. 

It is a no less serious error when Dieterich asserts that 
the Gospel of John in chapter vi. proclaims the Pauline 
doctrine " only in a still more corporeal fashion." 

In the Evangelist, bread and wine are as is evident 
to anyone who will take the trouble to acquaint himself 
with his presuppositions in the spiritually related works 
of Ignatius, Justin, and Tertullian not the body and 
blood of Christ, but the flesh and blood of the Son of Man. 
In this change in the expression lies the logic of the 
thought. The elements of the Lord s Supper perpetuate 
the appearance of the Son of Man in the world inasmuch 
as they, as being the flesh and blood of that historic 
Personality, possess the capacity of being vehicles of the 
Spirit. As a combination of matter and Spirit which can 
be communicated to the corporeity of men, they execute 
judgment. The elect can in the sacrament become 
partakers of that spiritual substance, and can thus be 
prepared for the resurrection ; others who are not from 
above, and are not capable of receiving the Spirit, receive 
simply earthly food and drink, and fall a prey to corrup 
tion. Therefore the Evangelist makes the Lord close 
His discourse about the eating and drinking of the flesh 
and blood of the Son of Man with the words, " It is the 
spirit that giveth life," 

This is the language of the early Greek theology, which 
explains the working of the sacraments by the combination 
of the Spirit with matter which takes place therein. The 
Fourth Evangelist projects this later view back into the 
discourses of the historic Jesus, and makes Him pro 
phetically announce that after His exaltation a time will 
come when the Spirit which is now in Him will unite itself 



THE JOHANNINE SACRAMENTS 201 

with the bread which, by the miracle of the loaves, has 
just been raised in a significant way out of the category 
of simple earthly elements, and will subsequently manifest 
its power in preparing men for the resurrection. 

In this sense, as vehicles of the Spirit, the elements 
carry on the manifestation of the Son of Man ; in this 
sense it is possible to speak of eating and drinking His 
flesh and blood, and to regard this as necessary to life. 
But all this is not thought of " corporeally " in the naive 
sense of an eating and drinking of the body and blood 
of Jesus, but can only be understood on the basis of the 
doctrine of the working of the Spirit in the sacraments. 
Apart from the Spirit, there is in the Supper no body and 
no blood of Christ. 

That is for the Fourth Evangelist so much a fixed 
datum that he is obliged to omit the account of the 
historic Last Supper of Jesus with His disciples. That 
the Lord could have so designated the bread which was 
eaten and the wine which was drunk on that occasion, 
is for him unthinkable. As long as He Himself is alive 
there is certainly no Spirit ; it is only on His exaltation 
that the Spirit is liberated from the historic personality 
of the Son of Man and becomes separated from the Logos as 
the Holy Spirit, in order in the sacraments to lead a new 
existence and this time an existence capable of being 
communicated to others. From this moment onwards 
bread and wine become, in the Church s celebration of 
the sacrament, the flesh and blood of the Son of Man 
in the sense explained above. Previously this had by 
no means been the case, any more than there had been a 
Christian baptism which effected regeneration. The 
Spirit who associates Himself with the water and pro- 
duces this effect, did not as yet exist in this form of being. 
Jesus cannot, therefore, on this view, have baptized, any 
more than He can celebrate the Supper with His disciples. 
Therefore, the Fourth Evangelist, in order to guard against 
possible misunderstandings, definitely asserts that even 
if the disciples did baptize a mere baptism with water 



202 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

which is incapable of working regeneration the Master 
Himself made no use of water in this fashion. 1 His 
task consisted only in marking out water for this use by 
the miracle at Cana of Galilee, and, by His discourses 
about the water of life and regeneration by water and the 
Spirit, pointing men s minds to the thought that in the 
future, water, in association with the Spirit, would be 
necessary to life and blessedness. In that day " out of 
his body shall flow rivers of living water " because the 
Spirit will be present (John vii. 37-39). 

The students of Comparative Religion are so far in the 
right as against ordinary theology that they make an end 
of the unintelligent spiritualising of the Johannine doctrine, 
and try to give due weight to the " physical " element in 
its conception of redemption. They are mistaken, how 
ever, in regarding this " physical " element as something 
primitive, and in thinking to explain it by analogies 
drawn from the primitive nature-religions. 

The Fourth Gospel represents the views of a speculative 
religious materialism which concerns itself with the 
problem of matter and spirit, and the permeation 
of matter by Spirit, and endeavours to interpret the 
manifestation and the personality of Jesus, the action 
of the sacraments and the possibility of the resurrection 
of the elect, all on the basis of one and the same funda 
mental conception. 

According to this theory, Christ came into the world in 
order to accomplish in His own Person the as yet non 
existent union of the Spirit with the fleshly substance of 
humanity. In consequence of this act the elect among 
mankind can in the future become partakers of the Spirit. 
Jesus Himself, however, cannot as yet impart this to them 
either as the Spirit of knowledge that is why the disciples 
are portrayed as so " unintelligent " or as the Spirit of 
life. The Spirit always needs, in the world of sense, to 

1 Therefore the statement that Jesus baptized in the Judaean country 
(Jn. iii. 22) is corrected to the effect that He Himself did not baptize, 
but only the disciples (Jn. iv. 2). 



BASIS OF JOHANNINE DOCTRINE 203 

be connected with material vehicles. He cannot work 
directly, in the sense of communicating Himself from 
Jesus to believers. He must, therefore, in order to enter 
into the elect, be received by them in combination with 
some material element. The material media chosen for 
this purpose are made known by Jesus by means of 
miracles and by references to the future. 

The naive and unhistorical conception that Jesus 
instituted the sacraments is not recognised by the 
Johannine gnosis. According to it He did not establish 
them, but created and predicted them. 

By His incarnation the possibility of the union of 
humanity and Spirit upon which the working of the sacra 
ments depends, is provided. By His action in regard to 
the food and wine and the words He spoke in connexion 
therewith, He pointed to a mystery which was to be 
revealed in connexion with these -substances ; by His 
death, resurrection, and exaltation He abolished His 
earthly mode of existence and set the Spirit free for the 
new method of working, in virtue of which He was able 
to prepare men for the resurrection. Jesus, according to 
this view, came into the world to introduce the era of 
effectual sacraments. It was thus that He became the 
Redeemer. 

The teaching of the Johannine theology, therefore, rests 
upon the two principles, that the Spirit can only work , 
upon men in combination with matter, and that it only . 
becomes present in this state as a consequence of the 
exaltation of the Lord. Anyone who has once recognised 
these presuppositions will give up once for all the search 
for a primitive element which is to be explained from the 
nature-religions. On the other hand, it is certain that 
Christianity here presents itself as the most highly de 
veloped Greek Mystery-religion which it is possible to 
conceive. 

Now for Paul again. Anyone who ascribes to him the 
conception of a sacramental eating and drinking of the 
body and blood of Christ does violence to his words. 



204 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

But admitting that he really thought in this way, that 
would prove nothing. It would first need to be shown 
that it really was a cultus-conception drawn from the 
primitive nature-religions which came to life again in 
him. Now, for the Mystery-religions the necessary pre 
suppositions might appear to be present, since they arise 
out of ancient cults which sprouted and grew up again 
in later times. Paul, however, is a Jew, and even as a 
believer in Christ he stands, in spite of his polemic against 
the law, wholly and solely on the basis of the absolute, 
transcendent Jewish conception of God. Any relation 
on his part to the nature-cults cannot be proved and 
ought not to be assumed. By what wind were the seeds 
of this primitive conception wafted to his mind ? And 
how could they suddenly sprout and grow in the stony 
soil of a Jewish heart ? The Apostle would certainly be 
the first and the only Jewish theologian to fall under the 
spell of the primitive conception of eating the god ! And 
where was such a conception at that time to be found ? 

But what matter such prosaic considerations when 
it is a question of great ideas, of ideas, moreover, fathered 
by Comparative Religion ? 

When Heitmiiller in the spring of 1903 appeared before 
the members of the Clergy Theological Society l in 
Hanover to give them the latest information about 
baptism and the Lord s Supper, he led them abroad, 
after an introduction on the " physico-hyperphysical " 
in Paul, first to the Aztecs, then in the clouds of night, 
by the torch s gleam, to the Thracian mountain sides, and 
thence to Sinai. 2 And when they had assisted at the 
slaughtering and devouring of the prisoners of war, the 
ox, and the camel, he expressed himself to the following 
effect : " Little as the Sdirvov Kvpiaicov of Paul might 
seem to have in common with these . . . proceedings, and 

1 Der wissenschaftliche Predigerverein. 

2 W. Heitmiiller, Taufe und Abendmahl bei Paulus ("Baptism and 
the Lord s Supper in Paul s teaching "). A description and an investiga 
tion in the light of Comparative Religion, 1903, 56 pp. These journey- 
ings on pp. 40-42. 



THE " MYSTERY-BACILLI " 205 

loth as we at first are even to name the Lord s Supper 
in the same breath with them, as little is it to me a 
matter of doubt that, when looked at from the point of 
view of Comparative Religion, the Lord s Supper of 
primitive Christianity has the closest connexion with 
them. Those pictures supply the background from 
which the Lord s Supper stands out ; they show us 
the world of ideas to which the Lord s Supper belongs 
in its most primitive, and therefore perspicuous, 
form." 

Entering more into detail, this " Hylic " l of the 
Comparative method explains that the primeval concrete 
and sensuous conception of the communio established by 
partaking of the flesh and blood of the animal in which the 
divinity itself dwelt, comes to light again in the primitive 
Christian Lord s Supper, at the highest stage of the 
development of religion, and under this new form acquires 
a new life. 2 It would be precarious, he further observes, 
in view of the fragmentary condition of the sources to 
attempt to prove a direct dependence on definite pheno 
mena on the cultus feast of the Mithra-mysteries, for 
example : "It will be safer to point to the general 
characteristics of the time, which abounded with ideas 
of that kind. The infant Christianity lived in an 
atmosphere which, if I may be allowed the expression, 
was impregnated with Mystery-bacilli, and grew up on 
a soil which had been fertilised and made friable by the 
decay and intermixture of the most various religions, and 

1 i.e. Materialist in his explanation, in contrast, as appears later, 
with Reitzenstein, who is described as the " Pneumatic " of the 
science. 

2 Albert Eichhorn, Das Abendmahl im Neuen Testament ("The 
Lord s Supper in the New Testament," 1898, 31 pp.), similarly holds 
that in Paul we have before us a sacramental eating and drinking of 
the body and blood of Christ which can only be explained as based 
on Oriental Gnostic presuppositions. He is, however, constrained to 
admit that we have no knowledge of a " sacramental meal which could 

"have served as the model for the Lord s Supper." But this does not 
shake his faith in his theory. He thinks that proof is only wanting 
because there is here a gap in our historical knowledge. He has 
calculated out the position of the planet ; the mere fact that it cannot 
be discovered with the telescope is wholly due to the inadequacy of 
the instrument. 



206 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

was specially adapted to favour the upgrowth of seeds 
and spores which had been long in the ground." 

Now, there is no such thing as an atmosphere impreg 
nated with bacteria. Medical science has long since 
shown that this conception rests on an error, the air being 
practically free from germs. In theology it is more 
difficult to get rid of fantastic imaginations, since historical 
proofs are only available for those who are capable of 
thinking historically. 

It must not be overlooked that the eating and drinking 
which establishes communion with Christ is only one side 
of the Pauline conception of the Supper. Alongside of 
it there exists the other, which sees in the feast a con 
fession of faith in the death and the parousia of the Lord, 
and is quite as significant as the former. It is in I Cor. 
xi. developed in connexion with the repetition of the 
historic words of Jesus ; on it is based the argument that 
a careless partaking is a transgression against the body 
of the Lord. And on the basis of this conception, cases 
of illness and death in the church are to be understood 
as a warning chastisement pointing to the Last Judgment. 
This conception must be somehow or other eschatologically 
conditioned. 

The communion which is established in the Lord s 
Supper is a communion of the eagerly-waiting man with 
the coming Lord of Glory. The only thing which remains 
obscure is how this is brought about. The confession of 
faith in the death and parousia which is combined with 
the act of eating and drinking does not suffice to explain 
this further effect. Further, it remains inherently obscure 
how by eating and drinking the dying and return of the 
Lord can be shown forth, especially as the Early Christian 
celebration consisted only in a common meal, and in no 
way reproduced, as present - day celebrations do, the 
actions and words of Jesus at the Last Supper. 

What are the results to which the students of Com 
parative Religion have to point in regard to the Lord s 
Supper ? They are obliged at the outset to give up the 



BAPTISM 207 

attempt to explain it from the Mystery -religions, or 
even to point out in the latter any very close analogies. 
In place of this they attempt to make intelligible both the 
meal which formed part of the mystery-cults, and that 
of Pauline Christianity, as growths which, from scattered 
seeds of ancient conceptions of the cultus-eating of the 
divinity, spring up from the soil of syncretism in two 
different places at the same time. Neither in the one 
case nor the other, however, can they render this even 
approximately probable. Up to the present, therefore, 
neither a direct nor an indirect connexion between the 
cultus-meal of Paul and those of the Mystery-religions has 
been shown. The only thing which is certain is that in 
both cases a cultus-meal existed. About that of the 
Mysteries we know almost nothing ; about that which 
Paul presupposes we have more information, but not 
such as to enable us at once to understand it. 

The question regarding baptism took from the first 
a simpler form, since the hypothesis of a renas 
cence of primitive cultus - conceptions has not to be 
considered. 

Both Paul and the Mystery-religions attach a religious 
significance to washings. That, however, does not 
suffice to establish a peculiarity which would connect 
them together, since the attachment of this signifi 
cance to lustration is bound up with the elemental 
symbolism of cleansing and is found more or less in all 
religions. 

The real question is whether Paulinism and the 
Mystery-religions, when they go beyond the most general 
notions, and advance from the symbolic to the effectively 
sacramental, follow the same lines and present the same 
views. 

Once again, Paul s view is the more fully, that of 
the Mystery-religions the less fully known. Developed 
baptismal doctrines and rites seem only to have been 
present in the Egyptian cults. These distinguish between 
the bath of purification and baptism, the latter consisting 



208 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

in a sprinking with a few drops of a consecrated and con 
secrating fluid. 1 

The advance beyond the idea of purification, where 
it is to be observed, moves in the direction of the idea of 
Re-birth, Regeneration. A clear formulation of this 
developed view comparable in definiteness with the 
Early Christian reference to the " bath of regeneration " 
does not occur. The thought remains hovering between 
purification and renewal. 

That is as much as to say that, so far as our information 
goes, no typical points of contact with Paulinism present 
themselves. 

The Apostle implies a baptism in the name of a divine 
person. Of a baptism performed in the name of Osiris, 
Attis, or Mithra we know nothing, though no doubt the 
assumption naturally suggests itself that the lustrations 
and baptisms practised in these cults were considered to be 
at the same time acts of confession of faith in the divinity 
with whose worship they were associated. But this 
character was by no means so distinctly stamped on them 
as was the case in Christian baptism as is, indeed, readily 
intelligible. In the Mystery-religions the confession of 
the god is naturally implied ; in Christianity there is the 
special confession of faith in the Messiahship of Jesus. 
To this there was nothing analogous. 

As regards the utterance of the name of the divinity 
and the magical efficacy attaching thereto according to 
ancient conceptions, many illustrations can be adduced 
from Comparative Religion. But the really important 
point, the association of the utterance of the name with 
a baptismal rite, cannot be directly shown to have existed 
in the Mystery-religions. 3 

1 See on this R. Reitzenstein, Die hellenistischen Mysterienreligionen 
("The Hellenistic Mystery Religions"), p. 38. 

2 Tit. iii. 5 (R. V. marg. : laver of regeneration). 

3 Wilhelm Heitmiiller, Im Namen Jesu. Eine Sprach- und religions- 
geschichtliche Untersuchung zum Neuen Testament, speciell zur altchrist- 
lichen Taufe (" In the Name of Jesus. A New Testament Study based 
on Linguistics and Comparative Religion, with special Reference to 
Early Christian baptism "), 1903, 347 pp. In this thorough and ex- 



POINTS OF DIFFERENCE 209 

In order to arrive at his sacramental view Paul does 
not follow the natural method of advancing by way of the 
thought of purification to that of renewal by regeneration, 
but follows a different route, which leads him to an 
estimate of it that has nothing to do with the fundamental 
conception of purification, and therefore remains without 
analogy in the Mystery-religions. This is a fact of great 
significance. 

The Mystery - religions speak, as Paul also does, of 
the pneuma and its workings, but the possession of the 
pneuma is never represented as an immediate and in 
evitable consequence of baptism. 

With the Mystery-religions are associated speculations 
about the renewal of man s being, represented as taking 
place in regeneration, which they bring into some kind of 
relation, closer or more remote, with baptism. But when 
Paul speaks of the new creature which comes into being 
in the sacrament, the thought of regeneration does not 
for him come into view, for he makes no use of it at all. 
Instead of that he asserts in Rom. vi. that in baptism 
there is an experience of death and resurrection in fellow 
ship with Christ, from which results newness of life and the 
new ethic associated therewith. How the act and the 
result are logically connected he does not explain. He 
is content to place them side by side. 

tremely interesting study the author arrives at the result that in the 
employment of the name of Jesus it is taken for granted that the name 
in some way or other represents a power. The Christian " belief in 
the name," he holds, stands on the same footing as Jewish and 
heathen beliefs. " The solemn pronouncement of the name of Jesus 
at baptism is not a merely symbolic form, having to do, for example, 
with the confession of the Messiahship of Jesus, but is thought of as 
associated with real mystical, mysterious effects ; the effects must, 
however, be similar, mutatis mutandis, to those which are ascribed to 
the use of the name in other cases : a being actually taken possession 
of by the power which is designated by the name of Jesus, the ex 
pulsion of all hostile powers, consecration and inspiration." " Baptism 
in the name of Jesus represents, therefore, the combination of two 
sacramental factors water and the name." 

Unfortunately, Heitmiiller has not emphasised the fact that the 
Mystery-religions offer no typical analogies to this double sacrament. 

It is also open to question whether the power of the name 
and of water suffice, as he thinks, to explain the Pauline view of 
baptism. 

14 



210 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

So far as we know, there exists in the Mystery-religions 
no analogue to this dying and rising again effected solely 
by the use of water. To interpret Rom. vi., as Dieterich 
does, as referring to a spiritual death and " new birth " 
is not permissible, since the text says not a word about 
that. The post-Pauline theology, that is the Johannine 
and Early Greek theology, explain baptism as regenera 
tion, and seek to find a logical basis for this effect in the 
doctrine that the Spirit unites with the water as the 
generating power. Paul has nothing of all this. 

Nor does he show any knowledge of the idea that 
Christian baptism arose out of the baptism of Jesus as an 
imitative reproduction of it. He never, in fact, mentions 
the baptism of Jesus. Nowhere does he suggest that in 
baptism the new man, the " Child of God," is born in the 
believer, as Jesus was in this act raised to His Messianic 
office. 

There is in fact no evidence from the earlier litera 
ture which suggests the existence of views of that 
kind regarding the origin and significance of Christian 
baptism. In early Christianity it is as far from being 
an imitative reproduction of the baptism of Jesus as the 
Church s Lord s Supper was from being an imitative 
reproduction of the historic Last Supper. The conception 
of an " imitative reproduction " was first introduced 
by modern theology. 

To cite the taurobolium as an analogue of Paul s baptism, 
with the death and resurrection which it effects, is not 
admissible. In the first place, the taurobolium is a baptism 
of blood ; in the next place it is closely connected with a 
sacrifice ; in the third place, the burial and rising again are 
actually represented. The sacramental significance is thus 
derived from the many-sided symbolism. In Paul there 
is no trace of all this. " Plain water " effects everything. 

One point in regard to which great hopes had been 
placed on the Mystery-religions was the solution of the 
enigma of i Cor. xv. 29. Wernle regarded it as self- 
evident that the Apostle in permitting and approving 



BAPTISM FOR THE DEAD 211 

baptism for the dead had allowed himself to become 
infected by the heathen superstition of his Corinthian 
converts, and took him to task for this lapse in his book 
on the " Beginnings of Christianity." In his zeal he 
forgot to enquire whether the heathen had any super 
stition of the kind. 1 

Those who tried to supply this omission did not meet 
with much success. The heathen showed themselves 
better than their reputation and less " superstitious " than 
the Christians ! Of a baptism for the dead, or anything at 
all of this nature, they show no trace. 

Failing more relevant evidence, some have quoted 
Plato, who in the Republic (ii. 364-5) makes Adeimantos 
say, appealing in confirmation to the Orphic writings, 
that by means of offerings and festivals, atonement 
and purification for past misdeeds is effected for whole 
towns as well as for single individuals, for the living 
and also for the dead. 

This passage, however, does not refer at all to personal 
dedications with a view to " renewal," such as the 
baptism practised in the Mystery-religions and in Christi 
anity, but to expiatory sacrifices in the ancient Greek 
sense. 2 

In the Taurobolia, representation of one living person 
by another is supposed to have been possible, but there 
is no mention of a representation of the dead. 3 

1 Paul Wernle, Die Anfdnge unserer Religion, 1901, p. 129. 

2 In order to preclude this misuse of it the passage may be quoted 
here in full : 

ireiOovres ov fibvov ISitljTas d\Xd Kal 7r6Xets, ws (Lpa Ai5&lt;rets re Kal Ka.Qapij.ol 
d.SiKrj/J.a.Twv 5td dvei&v Kal iraiSiat rjSovuv e/ai p-tv rt fwffiv, ei oi 8 Kal rereXeu- 
T~f}Ka(riv, as Sr) reXerds Ka\ov&lt;riv, al rCiv tKei /ca/cuJv a.Tro\vovffiv i]/J.as, fj.r) Ouffavras 
6 Sfiva Trepi/xeVet. 

..." And they persuade, not only individuals, but whole cities 
that sacrifices and pleasureable amusements afford absolution and 
purification from crimes committed, both for the living and also for 
the dead ; these they call Mysteries (initiations) , and they free us from 
the torments of the other world, whereas terrible things await those 
who neglect to offer sacrifice." On expiation see Rohde, Psyche, i. 
(1903), 259 ff. 

3 Regarding the evidence which has a more remote bearing on the 
question, see Hollmann, Urchristentum in Korinth (" Primitive Christi 
anity in Corinth"), 1903, 32 pp., pp. 22-24. 



212 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

The baptism of the dead which is attested by a papyrus 
is not a baptism for the dead. 1 

That living persons went through the ceremonies of 
initiation for the dead is not known. 

Thus baptism for the dead has not, so far at least, 
proved susceptible of explanation from heathen sources, 
but must be regarded as a peculiarity of Christianity ! 

The outcome of the study of the sacraments from the 
point of view of Comparative Religion is a very curious 
one. The Apostle thinks sacramentally ; in fact his 
doctrine is much more " mysterious " than that of the 
Mystery-religions. But the nature of the sacramental 
conception is quite different in him from what it is in 
them ; it is as if they had grown up on different soils. 

The difference relates both to the conception of the 
supernatural working of the sacraments, and also to the 
position which the sacramental element takes in the 
doctrine as a whole. 

In the Mystery-religions the sacramental idea arises 
by way of an intensification and materialisation of the 
symbolic. The act effects what it represents. The result 
can in a sense be logically understood when once the 
thought is grasped that the world of appearance and the 
world of reality stand in mysterious connexion with one 
another. 

In Paul we have an unmediated and naked notion of 
sacrament such as is nowhere else to be met with. Sym 
bolism is no doubt involved in the most general significance 
of the act. In this sense baptism is a " cleansing " and a 
" consecration," 2 and the sacred feast establishes fellow- 

1 R. Reitzenstein, Die hellenisiischen Mysterienreligionen, p. 84. 
The dead man is, according to Spiegelberg, represented as standing 
between two gods, who sprinkle the sacred fluid upon his head. 

2 In i Cor. vi. n, after saying that thieves, adulterers, slanderers, 
and robbers cannot inherit the Kingdom of God, the Apostle proceeds, 
" And such were some of you. But ye were cleansed, ye were con 
secrated, ye were justified." The passage is no doubt intended sar 
castically, ironically, with reference to the fact that, in spite of their 
baptism, according to present appearances they have not changed 
much. In regard to self-delusion on the ground of baptism see also 
i Cor. x. 



DIFFERENCE OF ATMOSPHERE 213 

ship among the partakers. But the assertions which go 
beyond this show not the faintest connexion with the 
outward significance of the rite. Contact with the water 
is supposed to effect a dying and rising again with Christ, 
a partaking in His mystical body, and the possession of 
the Spirit. The eating and drinking at the Lord s Supper 
is a confession of faith in the death and the parousia 
of Christ, and is also fellowship with Him. 

The sacramental is therefore non-rational. The act 
and its effect are not bound together by religious logic, 
but laid one upon the other and nailed together. 

With that is connected the fact that in Paul we find 
the most prosaic conception imaginable of the opus 
operatum. In the Mystery-religions there is a mysterious 
procedure surrounded by imposing accessories. The 
impressive appeal of symbolism is brought to bear in 
every part. Every detail is significant, and lays hold 
upon the attention. 

In Paul everything is flat and colourless. While some 
of his references might suggest the impression that his 
conception of Christianity bore some kind of analogy 
to the Mystery - religions, yet as a whole it entirely 
lacks the corresponding atmosphere. There is nothing 
of the effective mise en scene characteristic of the 
Greek sacramental beliefs. How lacking in solemnity 
must have been the method of celebrating the Lord s 
Supper, when it could degenerate into an ugly and 
disorderly exhibition of gluttony ! How little does the 
Apostle think of the external act of baptism, when he 
founds a church in Corinth and himself performs the rite 
only in the case of one or two individuals ! 1 He preaches 
sacraments, but does not feel himself to be a mystagogue ; 
rather, he retains the simplicity in regard to forms of 
worship which belongs to the Jewish spirit. 

There were no long preparations for the cultus cere 
monies, and nothing is known of a distinction between 
higher and lower grades of initiation, such as form an 

1 i Cor. i. 14-16. 



214 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

essential part of the Mystery-religions. The first cere 
mony of initiation confers at once final perfection. 
Among those who are admitted there prevails the most 
complete equality. The conception of the " mystes " 
does not exist. 

In the Mystery-religions everything centres in the 
sacred ceremonies. They dominate thought, feeling, and 
will. If they are removed the whole religion collapses. 

In Paulinism it is otherwise. The doctrine of redemp 
tion is no doubt closely connected with the sacraments, 
but the latter are not its be-all and end-all. If baptism 
and the Lord s Supper are taken away the doctrine is 
not destroyed, but stands unmoved. It looks as though 
the weight of the building rested upon these two pillars, 
but in reality it does not totter even if these supports are 
withdrawn. 

The Johannine and the early Greek doctrine are con 
ceived as real Mystery-religions. The Fourth Evangelist 
and Ignatius know no other redemption than that which 
is bound up with the sacraments. In Paul the redemption 
can be thought of apart from them, since the whole 
mystical doctrine of fellowship with Christ rests upon the 
single conception of faith. Nevertheless he allows it 
to be closely bound up with the external ceremonies, 
and seems to have no consciousness of the fact that 
this connexion is unnecessary and illogical. 

The remarkable duality in Paulinism lies, therefore, in 
the fact that the sacramental idea is intensified to an 
extreme and unintelligible degree, while at the same time 
the necessity of the sacred ceremonies does not logically 
result from the system as a whole, as this would lead us 
to expect. 

The sacramental views of the Apostle have thus 
nothing primitive about them, but are rather of a 
" theological " character. Paul connects his mystical 
doctrine of redemption with ceremonies which are not 
specially designed with reference to it. It is from that 
fact, and not from a specially deep love for Mysteries, 



PECULIARITY OF PAULINE SACRAMENTS 215 

that the exaggeratedly sacramental character of his 
view of baptism and the Lord s Supper results. It is 
in the last resort a question of externalisation, not of 
intensification. 

It is therefore useless to ransack the history of religions 
for analogies to his conceptions. It has none to offer, 
for the case is unique. The problem lies wholly within 
the sphere of early Christian history, and represents only 
a particular aspect of the question of Paul s relation to 
primitive Christianity. The fact is, he did not introduce 
the sacramental view into the sacred ceremonies, but 
found already existing a baptism and a Lord s Supper 
which guaranteed salvation on grounds which were 
intelligible from early Christian doctrine. He, however, 
transformed the primitive view of salvation into the 
mystical doctrine of the dying and rising again in fellow 
ship with Christ. Since the connexion between redemp 
tion and the sacraments was given a priori, he draws the 
inference that the sacraments effect precisely that wherein, 
according to his gnosis, the inner essence of redemption 
consists. How far they are appropriate to the effect 
which, on the ground of his mystical doctrine, he holds 
to take place, does not for him come into question. 

In the sacraments the believer becomes partaker in 
salvation. Therefore, he concludes, in them that happens 
which constitutes redemption, namely, the dying and 
rising again with Christ. 

Paul therefore takes the sacraments by storm. He 
does not theorise about the ceremony, but ascribes to it 
without more ado the postulated effect. That is not a 
procedure which could have been followed either by a 
Greek or by a modern mind. 

Paulinism is thus a theological system with sacra 
ments, but not a Mystery-religion. 

This may be confirmed by a further observation. 
The Apostle occupies a strongly predestinarian stand-point. 
Those who are " called " inevitably receive salvation ; 
those who are not, can never in any way obtain it. There 



216 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

is no analogue to this in the Mystery-religions. They 
can only conceive of election in the sense and to the extent 
of holding that there is a calling and predestination to 
the receiving of the initiation which confers immortality. 
And there are actually some beginnings of such a con 
ception. 1 

But Pauline predestination is quite different. It is 
absolute, and seems inevitably to abolish the necessity 
and meaning of the sacraments. Anyone who belongs 
to the number of the elect becomes ipso facto partaker 
of the resurrection. At the end of all things a great 
company from the generations of long-past times will 
arise to life without ever having received baptism or 
partaken of the Lord s Supper. That being so, what 
becomes of the sacraments ? In what respect are they 
necessary ? 

A good deal of energy has been expended in seeking 
analogies from other religions for the Corinthian baptism 
for the dead ; it would really have been much more to 
the point to enquire why baptism for the dead was 
considered desirable. If the dead are among the elect, 
they have no need of it ; if not, they could not have in 
herited life, even if they had received the sacrament 
during their sojourn on earth. To what end, then, is 
this baptism for the dead ? 

The most important point to notice is that everywhere 
in the Pauline sacraments the eschatological interest 
breaks through. They effect, not re-birth, but resurrec 
tion. That which in the near future is to become visible 
reality, they make in the present invisibly real by an 
ticipation. The Greek Mysteries are timeless. They 
reach back to primitive antiquity, and they profess to be 
able to manifest their power in all generations. In Paul 
the sacraments have temporal boundaries. Their power 
is derived from the events of the last times. They put 
believers in the same position as the Lord, in that they 

1 See Reitzenstein, Die hellenistischen Mysterienreligionen (1910), 
pp. 99, zoo. 



ESCHATOLOGICAL BASIS 217 

cause them to experience a resurrection a few world- 
moments before the time, even though this does not in 
any way become manifest. It is a precursory phenomenon 
of the approaching end of the world. 

Separated from the eschatology, the Pauline sacra 
ments would become meaningless and ineffectual. They 
are confined to the time between the resurrection of Jesus 
and His parousia, when the dead shall arise. Their 
power depends on the present, and also on the future, 
fact. In this sense they are " historically " con 
ditioned. 

While therefore in the Mystery-religions and in the 
Johannine theology the sacraments work of themselves, 
in Paul they draw their energy from a universal world- 
event, from which it is, as it were, transmitted. 

It now becomes clear why the Apostle cannot describe 
as a " Re-birth " the condition brought about by baptism. 
The renewal consists in the fact that the coming resurrec 
tion-life is, for the short period which remains of the 
present course of the world, received by anticipation. Re 
birth, on the other hand, implies an uneschatological 
system of thought in which the individual reckons more 
or less on a normal span of life, for which he seeks an inner 
divine being which shall subsist alongside of or above 
the earthly. It is only at a period when eschatology 
is falling into the background that the Greek conception 
of re-birth, such as is associated with the Mysteries, 
can supersede the old mystico-eschatological conception 
of the proleptic resurrection. Accordingly it presently 
appears in Justin and the Fourth Evangelist. From that 
point onwards baptism brings re-birth. In Paul it 
produced only an antedated dying and rising again. 

The sacramental conception of the Apostle is therefore 
derived from an entirely different world of thought from 
that of the Mystery-religions. 

It is a different question, however, in what relation his 
" physical " l mysticism hi itself, apart from the sacra- 

1 See above, p. 162, note 3. 



218 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

ments, bears to the world of ideas associated with the 
Greek Mystery-religions. 

To this question Reitzenstein, the " pneumatic " l 
among the students of Comparative Religion, devotes 
a careful study. He avoids conventional catchwords 
and rash conclusions, and endeavours to discover the 
conceptions and ideas which are common to both, and to 
follow them out in detail. 

With this purpose he brings together everything which 
he can find in the language of the Mysteries and the 
Hermetic literature relating to such ideas as " service " 
and " military service " of God, " justification," " pre- 
existence," " gnosis," " spirit," " revelation," " pneu 
matic," " heavenly garment," and " transformation." 

For the first time the material for a study of Paul from 
the point of view of Comparative Religion is brought 
together with a certain completeness, and the impression 
which it makes is very powerful. The theologian who 
reads these passages with an open mind will be lifted out 
of the ruts of conventional interpretation. It is as if a 
flood of new thought had streamed into the channels of 
ordinary exegesis, whether critical or otherwise, and swept 
away the accumulations of rubble. 

Whether all the explanations are sound, and whether 
many expressions, such as e.g. " servant " and " prisoner " 
of Christ, and imagery for example, that taken from the 
military life could not be just as well explained directly 
as by the roundabout way of their use in the Mystery- 
religions, may be left an open question. What is certain 
is, that Reitzenstein has made an end of the cut-and-dried 
conception that Paul simply translated his theology 
from Jewish thought into Greek language, and proves that 

1 In contrast with Heitmiiller, who was described above as the 
" hylic," materialist (see p. 205). 

R. Reitzenstein, Die hellenistischen Mysterienreligionen. Ihre 
Grundgedanken und Wirkungen ("The Hellenistic Mystery -religions. 
Their fundamental Ideas and Influence"), 1910, 217 pp. The work is 
composed out of a lecture delivered in the Clerical Theological Society 
of Alsace-Lorraine (pp. 1-60), along with extensive notes and excur 
suses (pp. 63-214). 



COMMON LINGUISTIC ELEMENT 219 

he knows the scope and exact application of the words of 
the religious vocabulary, and along with the terms and 
expressions has taken over suggestions for the presentation 
of his ideas. Without the possibilities and presupposi 
tions supplied by the religious language of the Greek 
Orient it would have been more difficult for him to create 
his mysticism. He found in existence a tone-system 
in which the modulations necessary for the development 
of his theme offered themselves for his disposal. 1 

Reitzenstein remarks with much justice that particular 
words and phrases do not of themselves prove very much, 
but that what is really of importance is the connexion of 
the passages. Are there sets of ideas in Paul which are 
allied with those of the Mystery-religions ? What realities 
stand in the two cases behind the references to the mysti 
cal doctrine of the miraculous new creation of the man 
while in his living body ? 

The description and paraphrasing which commentaries 
and New Testament theologies bestow upon the Apostle s 
assertions do not suffice for Reitzenstein. He wants 
to understand and come to grips with the thought, and to 
arouse in others the same discontent. 

The possibility that the Pauline mysticism might be 
capable of being explained from within appears to him 
excluded. With all the reserve which he imposes upon 
himself he nevertheless believes himself to have proved 
that the central conception of " the deification and 

1 Especially impressive are the investigations regarding the pneuma. 
Reitzenstein believes himself to be able to show that all the passages 
in Paul s writings which refer to this subject " are explicable from 
Hellenistic usage," and leaves open the question whether they " are 
all equally easy to understand on the basis of the Hebraic use of ruach 
or nephesh, or the LXX. use of Trvev/ma." 

A detailed discussion is given of the following passages, Rom. vi. 
1-14, xii. i ff . ; i Cor. ii., xiii., xv. 34 rf. ; 2 Cor. iii. 18, v. i ff., v. 6 
ff., x.-xiii., and some interesting light is thrown on the Epistle to 
Philemon (pp. 81, 82). 

It may also be mentioned that Eduard Schwartz in his essay 
" Paulus " (Charakterkopfe aus der antiken Literatur, 1910, 136 pp. 
pp. 107-136) estimates very highly the indirect influence of the Hellen 
istic surroundings and language. In the second edition (1911, 142 
pp.) he goes a little more fully into the individual problems of the 
doctrine. 



220 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

transfiguration of the living man is derived from the 
Mysteries." The conviction of a miracle of transforma 
tion taking place in his own person, is, he pronounces, 
not Jewish. Therefore he thinks that Paul represents 
a kind of ancient Jewish prophetism modified by the 
influence of the Hellenistic Mystery beliefs. 

The " history of the development " of Paul s thought he 
conceives as follows : The influence of Greek mysticism, 
with which he had already a literary acquaintance, 
helped to prepare the way for that momentous inner 
experience which eventually caused a rupture between 
the Apostle and his ancestral religion. " This influence," 
he thinks, " increased in the two years of solitary struggle 
for the working out of a new religion." A renewed study 
of Greek religious literature became necessary " from the 
moment when the Apostle dedicated himself to, and began 
to prepare for, his mission to the "E\\r)ve&lt;;." 

By the method which he applies, Reitzenstein is 
necessarily driven to adopt this far-reaching view. He 
makes no effort to take into the field of his argument the 
Late- Jewish eschatology, as preserved in the post-Danielic 
literature, in the discourses of Jesus, and the Apocalypses 
of Baruch and Ezra. Whatever is not self-explanatory, 
and cannot be explained from the Old Testament, is, 
according to him, derived from the world of thought 
associated with the Mystery-religions. 

The proper procedure would really have been to 
examine the conceptions drawn from apocalyptic thought 
and those from the Mystery-religions independently, and 
then to decide which of them rendered possible the better 
explanation. The best way would have been for Reitzen 
stein to discuss the matter step by step with Kabisch, 
who had sought to derive the fundamental conceptions 
of the Pauline mysticism from eschatology. 

The total neglect of eschatology forces him to some 
curious conclusions. After showing, in opposition to a 
canonised confusion of thought, that there is not the 
slightest connexion between Paul s doctrine of the first 



THE GOD " ANTHROPOS " 221 

and second Adam in I Cor. xv. 45-49 and Philo s theory 
about the two accounts of the creation in Genesis, since 
in that case the pneumatic heavenly man would be the 
first, and the psychic earthly man the second, 1 he comes 
to the conclusion that the view set forth in I Corinthians 
must have underlying it " the belief in a god Anthropos, 
who came to be identified with Christ. 

This hypothesis naturally suggests itself to Reitzen- 
stein, because in Poimandres he believes himself to have 
discovered a myth about Anthropos. 2 But is this, 
even if it were held to be proved, of such a character 
that the Pauline conception of the first and second 
Adam could without more ado be derived from it ? Is 
the complicated hypothesis necessary ? 

Paul s conception can be explained without the least 
difficulty on eschatological grounds. The first Adam 
brought mankind under the dominion of death. Christ 
is the Second Adam because He by His resurrection 
becomes the founder of a new race, which in virtue of 
that which has taken place in Him becomes partaker of 
an imperishable life, and acquires a claim to the future 
possession of the pneumatic heavenly body which He 
already bears. The Second Man comes from heaven 
because the pre-existent Christ, in order to become the 
founder of the " humanity of the resurrection," must 
appear upon earth and assume fleshly corporeity. He is 
" life-giving spirit " because the pneuma which goes forth 
from Him as the glorified Christ, works in believers as 
the power of the resurrection. This being so, what pur 
pose is served by bringing in the very doubtful myths 
about the god Anthropos, especially as Paul, though he 
certainly thinks of his Second Adam as a heavenly being, 
never anywhere speaks of Him as God. 

1 Even Holtzmann shares this confusion. " The Pauline doctrine," 
he pronounces in his New Testament Theology (ii. p. 56), " is not exactly 
Philonian, but doubtless, like the closely allied Philonian doctrines 
and the more widely divergent later views, grew out of the same stock 
of Jewish reflection on the Creation-narratives. . . ." 

a Poimandres, p. 81 ff. 



222 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

This is typical of a series of similar cases. 1 

On the other hand, it is just this one-sidedness which 
makes the charm and the significance of the book. 
Reitzenstein shows, both positively and negatively, how 
far the analogies from the Mystery-religions will take us. 
Ordinary theologians since Kabisch had remained with 
out influence had simply designated as Greek everything 
which they could not understand from Late Judaism, and de 
scribed as Late- Jewish what ever they could not understand 
as Greek. Reitzenstein, the unconscious ? antipodes of 
Kabisch, would like to make an end of this simple game 
and compel people to choose one horn or other of the 
dilemma. Instead of entering on theoretic discussions, 
full of " not only, but also," and " either . . . or," he goes 
straight forward as far as he thinks he can feel firm ground 
under his feet, and has thus contributed, to an extra 
ordinary degree, to the clearing up of the situation. 

Contrary to his intention and conviction, however, the 
outcome is not positive but negative. 

Like Dieterich and others, Reitzenstein takes it for 
granted that Paulinism makes use of the conception of 
Re-birth, and he feels that that is in itself a sufficient 
reason for not regarding it as a product of Judaism. 2 

The assumption being unsound, all the discussions and 
arguments based on it fall to the ground. In particular, 
the fine parallels from the Hermetic literature must be 
given up. Further, it is not legitimate to treat the 

1 Reitzenstein takes much pains to render intelligible, by a series of 
examples from ancient and modern times, the " dual personality " 
which often seems to manifest itself in Paul (pp. 53-57, 207, 208). He 
overlooks the fact that in the form in which it occurs in Paul it is 
taken for granted by eschatology, and appears in Jesus and the disciples. 
It is much more primitive than anything found in Hellenistic mysti 
cism or in any form of romanticism, since the distinction of outer 
appearance and inner being which occurs in Paul, depends upon the 
contrast of the two worlds which are struggling together for existence. 
The dual self-consciousness of Paul is, in contradistinction to all other 
cases, not subjectively but objectively conditioned. Besides, it de 
pends on the temporal opposition of " then " and " now," as naturally 
results from the ardent eschatological expectation. On the " doubling " 
of one s own personality, such as is possible for Greek sensibility, see 
Rohde, Psyche, vol. ii. (1909), pp. 413, 414. 

2 See pp. 57, 58. 



PAUL S "CHRIST-MYSTICISM" 223 

mysticism of the Mystery-religions and that of Paul as 
directly corresponding to one another. The former is a 
God-mysticism, the latter a Christ-mysticism. The re 
sulting differences are greater than at first sight appears. 
In the Graeco-Oriental conception, what is in view is the 
" deification " of the individual man. As the divinity of 
the particular Mystery which is being celebrated is always 
thought of as the highest divinity, the mortal enters into 
union with the being of God as such. 

The Pauline Christ, however, even though He is called 
the Son of God, is not God, but only a heavenly Being. 
The renewal which is effected by fellowship with Him is 
not a deification the word never occurs in the Apostle s 
writings but only a transference into a state of super- 
sensuous corporeity, which has to do with a coming new 
condition of the world. 

Greek thought is concerned with the simple antithesis 
of the divine world and the earthly world. Paulinism 
makes out of this duality a triplicity. It divides the 
super-earthly factor into two, distinguishing between 
God and the divine super-earthly, which is personi 
fied in Christ and made present in Him. God, and 
therein speaks the voice of Judaism, is purely transcend 
ent. A God-mysticism does not exist for the Apostle or, 
at least, does not yet exist. A time will come no doubt 
in the future, after the termination of the Messianic 
Kingdom, when God will be "all in all " (i Cor. xv. 28). 
Until then there is only a Christ-mysticism, which has to 
do with the anticipation of the super-earthly life of the 
Messianic Kingdom. 

To treat Graeco-Oriental and Pauline mysticism as 
corresponding factors, is to perform a piece in two-four 
time and a piece in three-four time together, and to 
imagine that one hears an identical rhythm in both. 

Another point of difference is that Graeco-Oriental 
mysticism works with permanent factors ; the Pauline 
with temporal and changing ones. The Messianic-Divine 
drives out the super-earthly angelic powers which previ- 



224 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

ously occupied a place between God and the world. It 
is in the very act of coming. But in proportion as it 
advances, there passes away not only the super-sensuous 
angelic element, but also the earthly and sensuous. 
Christ-mysticism depends upon the movement of these 
two worlds, one of them moving towards being, the other 
towards not-being, and it continues only so long as they 
are in touch with one another as they move past in 
opposite directions. The beginning of this contact is 
marked by the resurrection of the Lord, the end by His 
parousia. Before the former it is not yet possible to pass 
from one to the other, after the latter it is no longer 
possible. A mysticism which is thus bound up with 
temporal conditions can hardly be derived from the Greek 
timeless conceptions. 

The act, moreover, by which the individual becomes 
partaker in the new being is in the two cases quite differ 
ent. The Mystery-religions represent the " transfigura 
tion " of the living being as effected by his receiving into 
himself a divine essence, by means of the gnosis and the 
vision of God. It is thus a subjective act. According to 
Paul s teaching the " transfiguration " is not brought 
about by the gnosis and vision of God. These are 
rather the consequence of the renewal, the efficient cause 
of which is found, not in the act of the individual, and not 
in the inherent efficacy of the sacrament, but in a world- 
process. So soon as the individual enters by faith and 
baptism into this new cosmic process he is immediately 
renewed in harmony therewith, and now receives spirit, 
ecstasy, gnosis, and everything that these imply. What 
according to the Greek view is the cause, is for Paul the 
consequence. Thus, even though the conceptions show 
a certain similarity, they do not correspond, because they 
are connected with the central event of the mysticism 
in each case by chains which run in opposite directions. 

A figure which exactly illustrates one s meaning may 
claim pardon even for somewhat doubtful taste. In the 
Mystery-religions, individuals climb up a staircase step 



WHERE THE SOLUTION LIES 225 

by step towards deification ; in Paulinism they spring in 
a body into a lift which is already in motion and which 
carries them into a new world. The staircase is open to 
all ; the lift can only be used by those for whom it is 
especially provided. 

So far as Comparative Religion is concerned, there 
fore, the case is exactly the same in regard to the 
" physical " element in the mystical doctrine of re 
demption as it was in regard to that of the sacramental 
doctrine. On close examination the historico-eschato- 
logical character of the Pauline conception is in both cases 
so all-pervading that it invalidates any parallel with 
the Mystery-religions, and leaves them with nothing in 
common but the linguistic expression. The mystical 
and sacramental aspects of the " physical " element in 
redemption do not for him stand on the same footing with 
the eschatological, which is immediately given with the 
conceptions of transformation and resurrection, but must 
be in some way capable of being derived from it. Only 
when that is done will the Pauline doctrine of redemption 
be explained. 

It is to be noted that Reitzenstein tries in vain to 
render intelligible either the connexion of the soteriologi- 
cal mysticism with the facts of the death and resurrection, 
or the fellowship which is therein presupposed between 
the believer and the Lord. In his exposition of Rom. vi. 
the parallels with the Mystery-religions force him into a 
wrong line, and compel him to think of the objective 
process as a subjective one. He assumes that everything 
becomes clear and simple if once the Apostle is under 
stood to speak of a voluntary dying, which is neither 
purely physical nor merely metaphysical, but is based 
upon the thought that we must not sin any more because 
we have taken upon us Christ s person and lot, and have 
crucified our natural man. 

But in Paul it is not a question of an act which the 
believer accomplishes in himself ; what happens is that 
in the moment when he receives baptism, the dying and 

15 



226 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

rising again of Christ takes place in him without any co 
operation, or exercise of will or thought, on his part. 
It is like a mechanical process which is set in motion by 
pressing a spring. The minute force employed in pressing 
the spring bears no relation to that which thereon comes 
into play ; only serves to release a set of forces already 
in existence. 

In the Mystery-religions the thought is : We desire not 
to sin any more, therefore we will undergo initiation. 
Paul s logic is the converse of this, and takes the objective 
form : Christ s death and resurrection is effectually pre 
sent in us ; therefore, we are no longer natural men and 
cannot sin any more. 

The whole distinction lies in the fact that the mysticism 
of the Apostle of the Gentiles is based on historico- 
eschatological events, whereas the Mystery-religions are 
in their nature non-historical. Where they make use of 
myths they use them in the last resort merely as pictures 
of that which the " mystes " performs or undergoes, 
not as events charged with a real energy, as the death and 
resurrection of Jesus are for Paul. 

But the fact of the far-reaching outward and inward 
resemblances of language between the Graeco-Oriental 
and the Pauline mysticism are not affected by that. 
As though by a pre-established harmony in the history 
of religion, it came about that the mysticism which 
developed out of eschatology was able to find com 
plete representation in the language of the Mystery- 
religions, and found there ready to its hand conceptions 
and expressions which facilitated, suggested, and in 
some cases were even indispensable to its fuller develop 
ment. 

Reitzenstein s merit is that of having determined 
exactly and unmistakably the meaning of Paul s 
language, and having at the same time shown that 
Jewish Hellenism and Greek philosophy had practically 
no part in him. 

Of course, it is not possible to decide how much of this 



LOOSE TERMINOLOGY 227 

religious language Paul found already in existence, and 
how much he created for his purpose. It must not be 
forgotten that the Oriental Mystery-religions did not 
receive their complete development under Greek influence 
until a considerable time after the appearance of the 
Apostle of the Gentiles. Perhaps it would be more 
correct to say that he and they found in existence the 
same Greek religious vocabulary, laid hold of it, and 
perfected it. 

One error of the students of Comparative Religion 
deserves particular mention, for it is typical. In conse 
quence of the parallelism which they maintain between 
the Mystery-religions and Paulinism, they come to ascribe 
to the Apostle the creation of a " religion." l Nothing of 
the kind ever entered into his purpose. For him there was 
only one religion : that of Judaism. It was concerned 
with God, faith, promise, hope and law. In consequence 
of the coming, the death, and the resurrection of Jesus 
Christ, it became its duty to adjust its teachings and 
demands to the new era thus introduced, and in the process 
many things were moved from the shadow into the light 
and others from the light into the shadow. " Christi 
anity " is for Paul no new religion, but simply Judaism 
with the centre of gravity shifted in consequence of the 
new era. His own system of thought is certainly for him 
no new religion. It is his belief, as fully known and 
WOTlce3Tout in its implications, and it professes to be 
nothing else than the true Jewish religion, in accord 
both with the time and with the Scriptures. 

Another remark that has to be made is that the students 
of Comparative Religion are inclined to make an illegiti 
mate use of the word eschatology when it suits their 
purpose. They think themselves justified in applying 
it wherever in the Mystery-religions there is mention of 
death, judgment, and life after death, but they forget that 
in doing so they are using it in a much more general sense 
than that which we have to reckon with in the Pauline 

1 See e.g. Reitzenstein, p. 209. 



228 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

doctrine. The term eschatology ought only to be applied 
when reference is made to the end of the world as 
expected in the immediate future, and the events, hopes, 
and fears connected therewith. The use of the word to 
designate the subjective future end of individuals, in 
connexion with which no imminent catastrophe affecting 
all mankind is in question, can only be misleading, since 
it creates the false impression exempla docenttlia.t the 
Pauline eschatology can be paralleled and compared with 
an eschatology belonging to the Mystery-religions. Of 
eschatology in the late Jewish or early Christian sense 
there is not a single trace to be found in any Graeco- 
Oriental doctrine. 1 

Therefore, the Mystery-religions and Paulinism cannot 
in the last resort be compared at all, as is indeed con 
firmed by the fact that the real analogies both in the 
mysticism and the sacramental doctrine are so surpris 
ingly few. Reitzenstein s attempt has not succeeded in 
altering this result, but only in confirming it. What 
remains of his material when the circle of ideas connected 
with the thought of " re-birth " is eliminated, and the all- 
pervading eschatological character of the fundamental 
ideas and underlying logic of Paulinism are duly con 
sidered in making the comparison ? 

Finally, the question may be permitted, What would 
have been the bearing of the result if Dieterich and 
Reitzenstein had really proved the dependence of the 
Apostle s doctrine upon the Mystery-religions ? The 
simple declaration of the result would have been only 

1 That Greek " eschatology " and early Christian are mutually 
exclusive appears clearly in Albrecht Dieterich s Nehyia (1893, 238 pp.). 
The fantastic torments of hell as portrayed in the Apocalypse of Peter 
have nothing to do with the Jewish and primitive Christian eschatology, 
since the latter are concerned with the in-coming of the new world, and 
not with the special punishment of individuals. Dieterich is quite 
right when he explains this detailed description of torment as due to 
influences from the Orphic literature. Greek religious feeling was 
concerned with the fate of individuals after death. The thought of a 
coming world which dominates Jewish and primitive Christian eschato 
logy is alien to it, because its " eschatology " was not created, like the 
former, by the historico-ethical conceptions and aspirations of successive 
generations of prophets. 



TUBINGEN DIFFICULTIES AGAIN 229 

the beginning of things, for immediately the problem 
whether, understood in this way, the Apostle s doctrine 
could still have belonged to primitive Christianity would 
have arisen and called aloud for solution. The theory that 
Paul personally transformed the Gospel on the analogy of 
the Graeco-Oriental Mystery-religions is menaced by the 
same difficulties which previously brought about the 
downfall of the theory held by the Baur and post-Baur 
theology, that he Hellenised the Gospel. The hypothesis 
advanced by the students of Comparative Religion is only 
a special form of that general theory, and can do nothing 
to minimise the a priori difficulties, or those -raised by 
the history of dogma in connexion with it. 

How does Paulinism as understood by Dieterich and 
Reitzenstein fit into the history of the development of 
Christianity ? 

If the Apostle during the first generation had intro 
duced such a tremendous innovation as the Greek " physi 
cal " mysticism of redemption and the sacraments into 
primitive Jewish Christianity, could the latter have 
permitted this and continued to keep him in its midst ? 
How was it possible for it to admit without a struggle^ 
indeed unnoticed, something so entirely alien, and to 
raise no objections either to the Christology or to 
the mysticism or to the sacramental doctrine of the 
Apostle, but simply and solely to his attitude towards 
the law ? 

And how, on the other hand, could the later Hellemsing 
theology pass over in silence the man who had been its 
precursor in uniting the conceptions of Graeco-Oriental 
religion with the Gospel ? The inexplicable fact that 
Paulinism played no part in the subsequent development, 
but is left to lie unused and uncomprehended, becomes 
still more inexplicable if Dieterich and Reitzenstein are 
right. They assert that the Hellenising force did not 
issue from philosophy but from the Graeco-Oriental 
religious movement, and found expression in Paul not 
less than in the Johannine and early Greek theology. 



230 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

Why, then, are the results so different in the two cases 
that they have no kind of outer or inner relation to one 
another ? If the same force is applied at different times 
to the same object and in the same line, can the resultant 
movement vary so much in direction ? How is it possible 
that Paul represents a Hellenisation of Christianity which 
is so unique in character and so unnoticed by others ? 
How could two different types of Greek transformation 
of the Gospel come into existence, and in such a way, 
moreover, that the second discovered nothing Hellenic 
in the first ? 

According to the theory of Dieterich and Reitzenstein, 
Paulinism ought to be detached from early Christianity 
and closely connected with Greek theology. The contrary 
is the case. It stands in undisturbed connexion with the 
former, whereas it shows no connexion whatever with the 
latter. 

Any one who thinks of the Apostle s doctrine as in any 
sense a Hellenisation of the Gospel, whether he owes 
allegiance to ordinary theology or to Comparative Religion, 
has gone over to the radicalism of the Ultra-Tubingen 
party, and must, like it, go forth with his Paul out of 
primitive Christianity into a later period, unless, indeed, 
as the Comparative method admits, he is prepared to 
consider the faith of the early Church as Graeco-Oriental, 
or Paul as the founder of Christianity. 

In any case the hypothesis of a Hellenising of the Gospel 
in early Christianity carried out by Paul as an individual 
is a historic impossibility. From the dilemma, either 
early Christian or Greek, there is no escape, however 
one may twist and turn. 

If the students of Comparative Religion had been better 
acquainted with the attempt of the Ultra-Tubingen critics, 
and had had a more accurate understanding of the differ 
ence between Paulinism and the Johannine and early 
Greek theology, they could hardly have retained the 
open-mindedness necessary to the commencement of 
their undertaking ; for in that case they would have been 



HARNACK S ATTITUDE 231 

forced to reflect on the inconvenient consequences of their 
possible victory. 

Since they did not enter on such considerations it 
was difficult for them to do justice to Harnack. Here 
and there they took occasion to accuse him of being 
behind the times and reproach him with having given 
too much importance to the influence of philosophy 
in relation to the Hellenising of Christianity, and too 
little to that of the Mystery-religions. They are not 
wholly wrong in this. He does not give sufficient, re 
cognition to the " physical " and sacramental elements 
ifr~PanTinism, and does not work out sufficiently fully 
the parallel between the Mystery-religions and the 
Johannine and early Greek theology. In laying the 
foundations of his history of dogma he is too exclu 
sively interested in the development of the Christology, 
instead of starting from the curious complex of Christ 
ology, soteriology, and sacramental doctrine which is 
characteristic of the Pauline as well as of the Johannine 
and early Greek theology, and determines the course of 
the history of dogma. 

But this somewhat one-sided view of primitive and 
early Christianity is far from affording the complete 
explanation of his attitude of reserve in regard to the 
results arrived at by the students of Comparative Religion. 
If he forms a low estimate of the influence of the Mystery- 
religions upon Paul and the earliest period of Christianity, 
he is led to that result by pressing considerations from the 
history of dogma, by which the consequences of the theory 
put forward by the students of Comparative Religion are 
made clear to him. Like Anrich, he recognised from the 
beginning the weaknesses of the theory, which remained 
hidden from the champions of the method. 

It is not possible for any one who holds that Paulinism 
shows the influence of the Mystery-religions to stop 
half-way ; he has to carry his conclusion back into primi 
tive Christianity in general and to explain even the . 
genesis of the new faith as due to syncretism. The latter ! 



232 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

stand-point is taken up by Hermann Gunkel 1 and Max 
Maurenbrecher. 2 

They hold that the belief in a redeemer-god, such as 
was present in Jewish Messianism, was also widely current 
in the Graeco-Oriental religions, and that subsequently, hi 
consequence of the historic coming of Jesus, these two 
worlds of thought came into a contact which generated a 
creative energy. From the process thus set in motion 
primitive Christianity arose. This account of its genesis 
also explains, they think, why it goes much beyond the 
" teaching of Jesus " and the religious ideas which formed 
the content of Late Judaism, and includes mystical and 
sacramental beliefs. 

The historic Jesus did not, according to Gunkel and 
Maurenbrecher, hold Himself to be the " Redeemer." 
Therefore, the real origin of Christianity does not lie with 
Him but with the disciples. They, having been laid hold 
of by the power of His personality, and finding themselves 
compelled to seek a solution of the problem of His death, 
referred to Him the already existing myth of the Saviour- 
God, and thereby gave to the set of ideas which had 
hitherto only existed as such a point of historical attach 
ment, both for Orientals and Jews. From this time 
forward the religious ideas which attached themselves in 
the one case and the other to the conception of a 
redeemer-god flowed into a common bed and formed the 
stream which, as Christianity, overflowed the world. 

Maurenbrecher, who seeks to work out the hypothesis 
in rather fuller detail, holds that in Galilee, which in view 
of its history had certainly not always been a purely 
Jewish country, the Messianic idea and the non- Jewish 
belief in redemption were already present and had to some 
extent intermingled, and that it was, therefore, no accident 
that the new religion which after the death of Jesus took 

1 Hermann Gunkel, Zum religionsgeschichtlichen Verstdndnis des 
Neuen Testaments, 1903, 96 pp. 

2 Max Maurenbrecher, Von Jerusalem nach Rom, 1910, 288 pp. 
This work is the continuation of Von Nazareth nach Golgatha, 1909, 
274 pp. 



MAURENBRECHER S SYNTHESIS 233 

its rise in the revelation made to Peter should have gone 
forth from Galilee. The advantage, he goes on to explain, 
which the young Christianity possessed among a purely 
heathen population in comparison with the other com 
peting Oriental religions, arises from the Jewish element, 
" which in consequence of the peculiar intermixture of 
which Christianity was the outcome had entered into the 
universal Oriental religion of redemption." " Conversely, 
however, it was precisely the non- Jewish element in the 
Christian faith which for the Jews made this new religion a 
really new and higher stage of their religious life." 

This hypothesis is unable to recognise any unique 
character in Paul. What Dieterich and Reitzenstein 
claim for him, it finds already completely realised in the 
primitive community. The result is that Maurenbrecher 
hardly knows what to make of him, and emphasises 
his Jewish side much more strongly than his Graeco- 
Oriental aspect. 

The solution of the problem worked out by Gunkel 
and Maurenbrecher is not based purely on Comparative 
Religion, but, as the latter writer justly points out, is a 
kind of synthesis between the views of liberal theology 
and that of its opponents. The fundamental idea comes 
from the latter ; but in agreement with the former the 
existence of a historical Jesus is retained. 

The retention of this remnant of critical history 
is, however, unnecessary and illogical. If the origin of 
Christianity essentially depends on the intermixture of an 
Oriental belief in a redeemer with the Jewish expectation 
of the Messiah, and, given a contact and interpenetration 
between the two, must necessarily have arisen, it is not 
obvious why the role of a historical Jesus should be or 
whether it can be retained in connexion with it. 

In Gunkel and Maurenbrecher it is only a stop-gap, 
which is brought into a wholly external connexion with 
the growth of the new religion. They retain His coming 
as the phenomenon by which the contact of the two 
religious worlds is set up, but not as a fructifying element. 



234 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

There is no obvious reason for continuing to take into 
account this by no means indispensable auxiliary force. 
If the Oriental belief in a redeemer and the Jewish 
Messianic hope were inherently adapted to one another, 
and destined to produce by their fruitful union a new 
religion, then, after all, any kind of impulse, even a mere 
train of thought, might have set the process in motion. 
The assumption of the existence and the death of the 
/ j Galilaean Rabbi becomes superfluous if once it ceases to 
supply the efficient cause for the arising of Christianity. 
Since Comparative Religion finds the latter in the mutual 
interpenetration of Jewish and Graeco-Oriental elements, 
it can get along just as well with myth as with the ques 
tionable history of the Synoptists. Such is the teaching 
of William Benjamin Smith, 1 and Arthur Drews. 

Both these writers make a rather extravagant use of 
the privilege of standing outside the ranks of scientific 
theology. Their imagination leaps with playful elegance 
over obstacles of fact and enables them to discover 
everywhere the pre-Christian Jesus whom their soul 
desires, even in places where an ordinary intelligence can 
find no trace of him. 

Smith takes it for granted that the " Naasenes, whose 
origin goes back to the most remote antiquity, worshipped 
a Jesus as a divinity." How Christianity grew out of 
this cult he does not tell us, but consoles us with the pro 
mise of later revelations. In the preface he betrays the 
fact that he is now only publishing " the first quarter of 
the evidence which he has collected," and intends to go 
on quietly collecting and arranging his material " until 

1 W. B. Smith, Der vorchristliche Jesus, nebst weiteren Vorstudien 
ZUY Entstehungsgeschichte des Urchristentums, 243 pp. It was issued 
in German in 1906 with a preface by P. W. Schmiedel. The 
author is Professor of Mathematics in Tulane University, New 
Orleans. The book consists of five somewhat disconnected essays : i. 
" The Pre-Christian Jesus " ; ii. " The Significance of the Nick-name, 
The Nazarene " ; iii. " Anastasis " ; iv. " The Sower sows the Logos " ; 
v. " Saeculi silentium." (Behind this title masquerades a study of the 
external arguments for the historicity of the Pauline Epistles, in which 
Smith stammers out confusedly what Steck and van Manen had 
clearly expressed before him.) 



DREWS "CHRIST-MYTH" 235 

the whole irresistible host can take the field together," 
and further, that it is not the inevitable victory which 
is his main concern, but the stimulus imparted to others. 

Drews 1 does not play the amateur quite so completely, 
but endeavours on the basis of his belief in the pre- 
Christian Jesus to present a coherent picture of the 
way in which Christianity arose ; and he makes Paul its 
creator. " The Jesus-faith," so runs his thesis, " had 
long existed in numerous Mandaean sects in Western 
Asia, in many respects distinct from one another, before 
the belief in the Jesus-religion acquired a fixed form and 
its adherents became conscious of their religious differentia 
and their independence of the official Jewish religion." 
This ancient faith first meets us as a new religion in the 
letters ascribed to Paul. The citizen of Tarsus, trained 
as a Pharisee, heard of a sect-god named Jesus, and 
brought this conception into connexion with the belief 
in the death and resurrection of Adonis and the thought 
of the suffering " servant of the Lord " in Isaiah liii., and 
thus arrived at the idea that a god had appeared in human 
form, and had by his death and resurrection become the 
Redeemer, and had enabled men " to become God." This 
was the birth-hour of Christianity. For a historic per 
sonality, " to serve, so to speak, as the living model for 
the God-man," there was no need in order to produce this 
Jesus -religion, which then entered on its world -wide 
career of victory. 

Drews thesis is not merely a curiosity ; it indicates 
the natural limit at which the hypothesis advanced by the 
advocates of Comparative Religion, when left to its own 
momentum, finally comes to rest. 

Paulinism, in the judgment of the adherents of this 
much- vaunted method, is to be regarded as a synthesis 
between primitive Christianity and the conceptions 
current in the Mystery-religions. If this be taken as 
the starting-point, it is necessary to proceed to the con 
clusion since the synthesis cannot be conceived as ac- 

1 Arthur Drews, Die Christusmythe , 1909, 190 pp. 



236 PAULINISM & COMPARATIVE RELIGION 

complished by an individual that Christianity itself is a 
product of syncretism. And if the constitutive factor 
in the new faith is seen in the combination of the Jewish 
Messianic expectation with a Graeco-Oriental belief in 
a redeemer-god who dies and rises again, the assumption 
of the existence of a historic Jesus who was not Himself 
touched by Hellenic ideas becomes a worthless subsidiary 
hypothesis. It becomes quite a natural step to leave it 
on one side and to regard the synthesis as either develop 
ing gradually, by an impersonal process, or as coming to 
birth in the brain of the author of the Pauline Epistles, who 
thus becomes the creator of early Christianity. Drews is 
justified in appealing to Gunkel, and asserting that he is 
only offering his ideas with a logically necessary correction. 
Of course, every further logical step in this direction 
involves further sacrifice of historical understanding 
and an increasing necessity to indulge in imaginary 
constructions. But all these consequences are already 
present in germ in the mere assertion that Paul is to be 
understood from the Mystery-religions, even though those 
who maintain this view do not want to proceed any further 
than the facts which have to be explained seem to them 
to warrant. As between the students of Comparative 
Religion and Drews the relation is similar to that between 
the legitimate and illegitimate Tubingen schools. Here, 
too, the alternative lies between " scientific and in 
consistent, and consistent and unscientific." That means 
that an absolute antinomy appears between the logic of 
the attempted solution and that of the data of fact ; 
which is as much as to say that the problem has been 
wrongly grasped, and that this way, whether it be followed 
for a certain distance only, or right to the end, can never 
lead to the goal of a satisfactory solution. 



VIII 

SUMMING-UP AND FORMULATION OF 
THE PROBLEM 

THE study of Paulinism has nothing very brilliant to 
show for itself in the way of scientific achievement. 
Learning has been lavishly expended upon it, but thought 
and reflection have been to seek. 

Writers went to work with an almost inconceivable 
absence of plan, and wanted to offer solutions before they 
had made clear to themselves the scope of the problem. 
Instead of seeking a definite diagnosis, they treated the 
symptoms separately, with whatever means happened to 
come to hand. 

It was inevitable, therefore, that the study of the subject 
should move along intricate and continually recrossing 
paths, and engage in long and devious wanderings, only, 
in some cases, to arrive back again at the point from 
which it started. That Paul s doctrine of redemption was 
thought out on the lines of a physical nature-process had 
been asserted by Liidemann as long ago as the year 1872. 
Nevertheless, theology hit on the plan of " spiritualising " 
it, and took very nearly thirty years to get back to 
this discovery. 

The account which we have given of the history of the 
subject has revealed the structure of the problem and 
given it room to develop itself. The inner connexion 
of the questions determines in advance what the individual 
solutions can and cannot effect, and at the same time 

237 



238 SUMMING-UP 

shows what must be provided for in any solution which 
professes to offer a really historical explanation. 

To neglect this structure, this schematism of the 

problem is not permissible. It has not been independently 

invented and imposed from without upon the past history 

of research, but represents its actual results, and points 

the way for all subsequent attempts at a solution. 

The problem consists in the two great questions : what 
. Paul s doctrine has in common with primitive Christianity, 
*? and what it has in common with Greek ideas. 

It is complicated by the fact that our only informa 
tion about the beliefs of the primitive Church comes 
from Paul. His writings are the first and indeed the 
only witnesses which we possess upon the point, since 
the First Epistle of Peter and the Epistle of James give 
us information at best about a non-Pauline, certainly 
not about a pre-Pauline Christianity. 

The standard by which the primitiveness of Paul s 
Christianity has to be measured and tested has, therefore, 
in the first place to be arrived at by the method of arguing 
backward from itself. Nevertheless, the difficulty is not 
so great as it appears when thus theoretically stated. 
The most general features of the earliest dogma can be 
found without difficulty in the Epistles. These consisted 
... in the belief in the Messiahship of the Jesus who had 
died and risen again, and in the expectation of His 
parousia in the immediate future. 

Moreover, the problem as a whole is simplified by the 
fact that the second of the fundamental questions has 
been clearly answered by the history of Pauline study. 
i The answer is this : Paulinism and Hellenism have in com 
mon their religious terminology, but, in respect of ideas, 
nothing. The Apostle did not Hellenise Christianity. 
His conceptions are equally distinct from those of Greek 
philosophy and from those of the Mystery-religions. 

The affinities and analogies which have been alleged 
cannot stand an examination which takes account of their 
real essence and of the different way in which the ideas 



SOME DEFINITE RESULTS 239 

are conditioned in the two cases. Neither Baur nor the 
theology which owes allegiance to him, nor the students 
of Comparative Religion, have succeeded in proving their 
assertions. It is also interesting to observe that those 
who undertake to explain Paul by the aid of the Graeco- 
Oriental Mystery-religions, entirely deny the philosophic 
Hellenism which a more conventional theological opinion 
has found in him ; so that it is a case of Satan s being 
driven out by Beelzebub. On the other hand, the Com 
parative study of Paulinism has the merit of having made 
an end of the " spiritualising " and " psychologising " 
which were practised for a whole generation. 

The impossibility of anything in the nature of a 
Hellenic gospel being present in Paul appears from the 
fact, that every view of this kind when thought out in its 
logical implications must arrive at a point where it 
has to do violence to historical tradition. It became 
apparent that it is impossible for a Hellenised Paulinism 
to subsist alongside of a primitive Christianity which 
shared the Jewish eschatological expectations. One 
must either, as the Ultra-Tubingen critics did, trans- Jid, 
plant the Epistles and the doctrine from the primitive 
period to the second century, or, as some of the votaries 
of Comparative Religion have endeavoured to do, explain 
primitive Christianity as a product of Graeco-Oriental 
syncretism. 

That only a very few investigators have drawn these 
inferences is not due to the fact that they are not justified. 
It was want of courage, of logical consistency, and of the 
necessary contempt for the rest of the facts which pre 
vented them from making the venture. So they offered 
compromises, imposingly dressed out in words but in 
wardly untenable, and talked themselves and others 
into believing the impossible, namely, that a Hellenisation 
of the primitive Christian belief effected by Paul as an 
individual is really conceivable. 

The half-and-half theories which represent Paulinism 
as consisting partly of Greek, partly of Jewish ideas, are 



240 SUMMING-UP 

in a still worse case than those which more or less neglect 
the former element. Encumbered with all the diffi 
culties of the Hellenising theory they become involved in 
the jungle of antinomies which they discover or imagine, 
and there perish miserably. 

The solution must, therefore, consist in leaving out of 
the question Greek influence in every form and in every 
combination, and venturing on the " one-sidedness " of 
endeavouring to understand the doctrine of the Apostle 
of the Gentiles entirely on the basis of Jewish primitive 
Christianity. That implies, in the first place, that the 
Pauline eschatology must be maintained in its full com 
pass, as required by the utterances of the letters. But 
merely to emphasise it is not everything. The next point 
is to explain it. What was the scheme of the events 
of the End, and what answer was given by eschatological 
expectation to the fundamental questions which could not 
be avoided ? Are_ there two resurrections or one ; one 
judgment or two ? Who are to rise again at the parousia ? 
Does a judgment take place then ? On whom is it held ? 
What are its standards and its subject ? Wherein do 

! ire ward and punishment consist? What happens to the 
men of the surviving generation who are not destined to 
the Messianic kingdom ? What is the relation between 

. judgment and election ? What is the fate of believers 
who are elect and baptised but who have fallen from 
grace by unworthy conduct ? Can they lose their final 
blessedness, or are they only excluded from the Messianic 
kingdom ? Does Paul recognise a general resurrection ? 
If so, when does it take place ? Is it accompanied by a 
judgment, or do only the elect rise again ? When does 
the judgment take place at which the elect judge the 
angels ? 

Not until Pauline eschatology gives an answer to all the 
" idle " questions of this kind which can be asked will it be 
really understood and explained. And it must be some 
how possible, by the discovery of its inner logic, to recon 
struct it from the scattered statements in the documents. 






ESCHATOLOGICAL MYSTICISM 241 

We have no right to assume that for Paul there existed 
in his expectation manifest obscurities, much less that he 
had overlooked contradictions in it. 

Is there, then, any possibility of explaining the mystical 
doctrine of redemption and the sacramental teaching on 
the basis of the Jewish eschatological element ? 

The attempt is by no means so hopeless as it might 
seem in view of the general consideration that Judaism 
knew neither mysticism nor sacraments. It is not really 
a question of Judaism as such, but of apocalyptic thought, 
which is a separate and independent phenomenon arising 
within Judaism, and has special presuppositions which are 
entirely peculiar to it. 

We saw in analysing the " physical " element in the 
doctrine of redemption and the sacraments that the 
conceptions connected therewith are conditioned by the 
underlying eschatology which everywhere shows through. 1 
It needs no special learning to make this discovery. 
Any one who ventures to read the documents with an 
open mind and pays attention to the primary links of 
connexion will soon arrive at this conclusion. That 
Paul s mystical doctrine of redemption and his doctrine 
of the sacraments belong to eschatology is plain to be 
seen. The only question is in what way, exactly, they 
have arisen out of it. The future-hope, raised to the 
highest degree of intensity, must somehow or other have 
possessed the power of producing them. If the impulse, 
the pressing need to which they were the response, is 
once recognised, then Paulinism is understood, since in its 
essence it can be nothing else than an eschatological 
mysticism, expressing itself by the aid of the Greek 
religious terminology. 

Theoretically, too, it is possible to form an approximate 
idea how the intensified expectation of the future might 
take a mystical form. In apocalyptic thought sensuous 
and supersensuous converge, in such a manner that the 
former is thought of as passing away into the latter. Thus 

1 See above, p. 173 f. 

16 



242 SUMMING-UP 

there is present in it the most general presupposition of all 
mysticism, since it is the object of the latter to abolish 
the earthly in the super-earthly. The peculiarity of the 
mysticism which arises out of Apocalyptic is that it does 
not bring the two worlds into contact in the mind of the 
individual man, as Greek and medieval mysticism did, 
but dovetails one into the other, and thus creates for the 
moment at which the one passes over into the other 
an objective, temporally conditioned mysticism. This, 
however, is only available for those who by their destiny 
belong to both worlds. Eschatological mysticism is 
predestinarian. 

That a mysticism of this kind existed before Paul is 
not known. It may be conjectured that the conditions 
under which it could develop were not present until after 
the death and resurrection of Jesus. 

But sacramental tendencies already make their ap 
pearance in the future-hope which was to lead up to 
Christianity. The usual view is to the effect that Paul 
was the first to introduce the mystical element into 
baptism and the Lord s Supper. There is nothing to 
prove that. How can we possibly tell that these cere 
monies were previously purely symbolic acts ? Any one 
who reads with an open mind the Synoptic accounts of 
John s baptism must recognise that it was not only a 
symbol of purification on repentance, but is thought 
of as in some way or other guaranteeing salvation. 1 A 
transaction, however, which itself gives and effects such 
a result is to be regarded as a sacrament. 

The manner in which Paul speaks of early Christian 
baptism and of the Lord s Supper does not make the 
impression that he is asserting for the first time the 
effectual working of the ceremony ; it is rather as if 
he took it for granted as something given and self-evident. 
This would agree with the observation noted above that 
the baptism of John, from which primitive Christian 

1 Hence John s indignation at seeing the " viper s brood " approach 
ing to take advantage of it ? TRANSLATOR. 



ESCHATOLOGICAL SACRAMENTS 243 

baptism was derived, was already thought of as a sacra 
ment. 

Whether the Lord s Supper in the intention of Jesus 
Himself directly conveyed something to the partakers, 
or whether it only became a sacrament in primitive 
Christian times, must be left undecided. 

That the intensified eschatological expectation should 
go so far as to produce sacramental conceptions is in 
itself intelligible. Those who stood on the threshold of 
the coming glory must have been eagerly anxious to gain 
an assurance that they themselves would be partakers 
therein and to obtain tangible guarantees of "deliverance" 
from the coming judgment. The conception of " marking 
out" and "sealing" plays in apocalyptic thought a very 
important part. Similar provisions are a characteristic 
product of any intense expectation of the future. 

It is, therefore, highly probable that the Baptist, and 
primitive Christianity, created eschatological sacraments 
which, as already established and accredited, Paul had 
only to take over. 

The bearing of these statements and considerations 
must be shown from the Epistles. How far it is possible 
to trace the genesis of the mysticism and the sacramental 
doctrine from the eschatological beliefs of the Apostle 
cannot be determined a priori. The one thing certain is 
that no other way of explanation is possible than that 
which leads from the circumference of his future-hope 
to the central idea of his " theology." All other inter 
pretations hang in the air. 

Theology has heretofore found itself rather helpless in 
presence of the votaries of Comparative Religion. It 
could not accept their results as correct, but on the other 
hand it was not in a position to explain Paul s sacramental 
views, because it had never taken into consideration the 
possibility that they might have arisen out of the Jewish 
and primitive Christian future-hope. There was thus 
no course open to it but to engage in an inglorious 
guerilla warfare with the new science and skirmish with 



244 SUMMING-UP 

it over particular passages and statements. It is only the 
acceptance of the fact that the Apostle s doctrine is 
integrally, simply and exclusively eschatological, which 
puts it in a position to assume the offensive in a systematic 
way and with good prospect of success. 

The Apostle s most general views must be taken as 
the starting point from which to explain how he 
arrives at the paradox that the believer is united with 
Christ, experiences along with Him death and resurrection, 
and becomes a new creature, emancipated from fleshly 
corporeity. The assertion that these statements are 
meant in a " physical " sense does not carry us very far. 
The reason which explains their "reality" must be shown. 
Simply in and by themselves they are not explicable. 
What has been advanced regarding the solidarity of Jesus 
with the human race is far from sufficing to make it in 
any degree intelligible, especially as Paul has not in view 
Christ and humanity, but Christ and the elect. 

The mistake in the attempts at explanation hitherto 
made consists in the fact that they seek to argue from 
the facts of the death and resurrection of Jesus, simply 
as such, directly to that which takes place in the believer. 
In reality, it can only be a question of a general event, 
which in the time immediately preceding the End brings 
about this dying and rising again in Jesus and believers 
as together forming a single category of mankind, and 
thus antedates the future into the present. For that 
which happens both to the Lord and to the elect it must 
be possible to find some kind of common-denominator 
which exactly contains the factors, the forces which are 
at work in the two cases. Since those which produce 
their effect in Christ are the first to become manifest, 
Paul can cast his theory into the form that the believers 
have died and risen again with Him. 

The general fact which comes into question must result 
from the condition of the world between the death of 
Jesus and His parousia. The Apostle asserts an over 
lapping of the still natural, and the already supernatural, 



PAUL AND JESUS TEACHING 245 

condition of the world, which becomes real in the case of 
Christ and believers in the form of an open or hidden 
working of the forces of death and resurrection and 
becomes real in them only. The doctrine of the death 
and resurrection of Jesus and the mystical doctrine of 
redemption are alike cosmically conditioned. 

It is not sufficient, however, to explain the mystical 
doctrine and the sacramental doctrine which is bound up 
with it. To the problem of Paulinism belong other 
distinct questions which have not yet found a solution. 
The primary questions are the relation of the Apostle 
to the historical Jesus, his attitude towards universalism l 
and towards the law, and the nature of his compromise 
between predestinarian and sacramental doctrine. 

Will his views on these points, which it has hitherto 
been impossible to grasp clearly, similarly admit of 
explanation on the basis of the unique cosmic conditions 
obtaining between the death of Christ and the parousia ? 
It is to be noticed that the Apostle does not advance his 
jassertions with reference either to earlier or to subsequent 
times, but simply and solely for this short intervening 
period. Their explanation is therefore doubtless to be 
looked for here. 

Paul must have had more knowledge about Jesus than 
he uses in his teachings and polemics. His procedure is 
deliberate. He does not appeal to the Master even 
where it might seem inevitable to do so, as in regard to 
the ethics and the doctrine of the significance of His 
death and resurrection ; and in fact declares that as a 
matter of principle he desires no longer to " know Christ 
after the flesh." Psychological considerations are quite 
inadequate to explain these facts. It is as though he 
held that between the present world-period and that in 
which Jesus lived and taught there exists no link of con 
nexion, and was convinced that since the death and 
resurrection of the Lord conditions were present which 

1 For the sense of the term here, see above, p. 83, note. 
TRANSLATOR. 



246 SUMMING-UP 

were so wholly new that they made His teaching in 
applicable, and rendered necessary a new basis for 
ethics and a deeper knowledge respecting His death and 
resurrection. 

The case lies similarly in regard to the Apostle s views 
about universalism and the law. 

It was not by his experiences among the Gentiles 
that he was led to universalism. And the thought is not 
simply that mission work among the heathen ought to 
be permitted. He maintains the view that there is a 
pressing necessity to carry the Gospel abroad. It is 
under the impulsion of this thought that he becomes the 
Apostle of the Greeks. 

The sole and sufficient reason for this view he finds 
in the peculiar condition of the world between the death 
and the parousia of Christ. To it are due the conditions 
in consequence of which a share in the privileges of Israel 
is open to the Gentiles without their being obliged, by 
taking upon them the law and its sign, to enter into 
union with Israel. In saying this it is not the Apostle s 
meaning that they merely do not need to do so ; they 
must not do so, on pain of losing their salvation. 

Since Ritschl, the representatives of the history of 
dogma have been concerned to obscure the problem of 
the law in Paul and to turn theology into paths of easiness. 
They assert that it was a purely practical question, which 
did not touch doctrine in the strict sense. This was the 
expedient by which they escaped from the difficulty when 
it was raised by Baur. It is time that it should be 
given up. 

When Paul proclaims that the Greeks do not need to 
submit to the law, he is not led to do so by the experience 
that this was reasonable and practical. He declares 
them free because the logical implications of his doctrine 
compel him to do so. What Jesus thought about the 
matter is just as indifferent to him as His opinion regard 
ing the legitimacy of preaching to the Gentiles. The 
peculiar conditions of the time between His death and 



SACRAMENTS AND PREDESTINATION 247 

His parousia forbid any extension of the law to believers 
outside of Israel. On the other hand, these conditions 
require that believers belonging to the Chosen People 
must continue to practise it as before. The assertion of 
the non-validity of the law is never intended by Paul 
in a sense which would justify the inference of its total 
abolition for all believers. It has received its death-blow, 
but retains its position outwardly up to the time of the 
parousia. For this limited period the watchword is : 
he who is under the law shall continue to observe it ; 
he who is free from it shall on no account place himself 
under it. From one and the same fact two diametrically 
opposite conclusions are drawn ; for so the unique charac 
ter of the time demands. 

What is the relation between predestination and the 
sacraments ? Why do the elect of the final generation 
need a provision which was not made for those of earlier 
generations ? This too must result from the unique 
character of the time. The only logical assumption is 
that to this special provision corresponds a special 
blessedness, going beyond the ordinary blessedness in 
volved in election as such, which is reserved for the 
final generation and cannot be obtained otherwise than 
through baptism and the Lord s Supper. But wherein 
does it consist ? 

All these questions are, like the mystical doctrine, to 
be answered by reference to the special conditions of 
the period between the death of Jesus and the parousia. 
It must be possible to refer back the whole of the teach 
ings to one and the same fundamental fact. It follows 
that there must be no more talking about the " unique 
ness of the event at Damascus " and psychologising about 
Paul s " religious experience," no more spiritualising and 
modernising, no making play with the distinction between 
religion and theology, or with the discovery or conceal 
ment of contradictions and antinomies, or other similar 
exercises of ingenuity. 

All explanations which represent the system of doctrine 



248 SUMMING-UP 

as something arising subjectively in the Apostle s mind 
may be assumed a priori to be false. Only those which 
seek to derive it objectively from the fundamental facts 
of the primitive eschatological belief are to be taken into 
consideration. The only kind of interpretation which 
can be considered historical is one which makes it clear 
how a man who believed in the death and resurrection of 
Jesus and His imminent parousia was, in virtue of that 
belief, in a position to understand the thoughts of the 
Apostle of the Gentiles and to follow his arguments, and 
was logically obliged to accept them. 

And, finally, the solution must explain the enigmatic 
attitude which subsequent generations take up in regard 
to the Apostle of the Gentiles. They know him, but 
they owe no allegiance to him. He created no school. 
The theology of an Ignatius or a Justin does not attach 
itself to him. There is something more in this than a 
simple oversight. If these theologians do not turn to him 
for aid, though he stands like a giant among them, that 
must be due to the fact that it is impossible to do so, and 
that in the course of the natural development of things 
they have been led to follow quite other paths. 

For some reason or other, the conditions under which 
he created his system must be for them unimaginable. 
It is true they are still in the period between the death 
and the parousia of Jesus, but they can no longer in 
terpret it in the same way as the Apostle did. Why are 
they no longer able to bring into play the forces which 
he assumes to be in operation when he refers everything 
to the dying and rising again of Christ and the believer ? 
Which of his presuppositions is for them lacking ? May 
it be that the intensity of the eschatological expectation 
has so declined that the mysticism associated therewith 
can no longer maintain its ground ? 

The Ultra-Tubingen critics demanded of theology 
proof that the canonical Paul and his Epistles belonged 
to early Christianity ; and the demand was justified. 

The question is not to be decided in the domain of 



HONEST CRITICISM " POSITIVE " 249 

literary history, since the only thing we have to deal 
with is the self-witness of the Epistles, which can neither 
be strengthened nor shaken by indications drawn from 
elsewhere. 

Argument and counter-argument must be drawn 
from the contents. The theological scholarship which 
had to meet the attacks of Steck and van Manen had no 
solid arguments to oppose to them. Its Paulinism was 
so complicated, Hellenised and modernised, that it could 
at need find a place in theological text-books, but not in 
primitive Christianity. On the other hand, an explana 
tion which shows that the Apostle s system is based on 
the most primitive eschatological premises, and at the 
same time makes it intelligible why subsequent generations 
could not continue to follow the road on which he started, 
thereby demonstrates his primitive Christianity and, 
to this extent, also the genuineness of his chief Epistles. 
The possibility that they might be primitive-Christian, 
and yet not written by the historic Apostle of the Gentiles, 
hardly calls for serious consideration. 

Any one who works out this solution is the true pupil 
of Baur, however widely he may diverge from him in his 
views and results. By unequivocally determining the 
date of the writings in question on internal grounds and 
excluding all other possibilities he is exercising " positive 
criticism " in the sense intended by the Tubingen master, 
and justifies him in the face of the adversaries against 
whom he can no longer defend himself. 

It may no doubt prove to be the case that this " posi 
tive " criticism will appear distressingly negative to 
those who look for results which can be immediately 
coined into dogmatic and homiletic currency. 

Their opinion, however, is of small importance. 

It is the fate of the " Little-faiths " of truth that they, 
true followers of Peter, whether they be of the Roman 
or the Protestant observance, cry out and sink in the 
sea of ideas, where the followers of Paul, believing in 
the Spirit, walk secure and undismayed. 



INDEX 



Ammon, C. F. von, 3 n. 

Anrich, Gustav, 179, 189, 231 

Aratus, 94 

Aubertin, Charles, 95 n. 

Augustine, 95 n. 

Aurelian, 181 

Baljon, J. M. S., 117, 118, 125 n., 

148 n. 

Bauer, Bruno, 24, 28, 117, 120 ff. 
Baumgarten, Michael, 96 . 
Baumgarten, S. J., i, 3 
Baur, F. C., 12 ff., 20 f., 25, 33, 81, 

n8f. 

Baur, F. F., 20 n. 
Beyschlag, Willibald, 22, 26, 41 
Bousset, W., 48 n., 151, 152, 162 
Brandt, W., 24, 60 n. 
Bruckner, Martin, 152,171,179, 193 n. 
Bruckner, Wilhelm, 118, 134 n. 
Bruston, E., 24, 74 n. 

Caligula, 184 

Calvin, 33 

Claudius, 183 

Clemen, Karl, 118, 179, 189 n. 

Clement of Rome, 119, 128, 135 

Cumont, Franz, 179, 181, 183 n., 

185 n., 192 
Curtius, Ernst, 24, 87, 94 n. 

Dahne, A. F., 2, 10 n. 

Deissmann, Adolf, 23, 60 n., 153, 

172 n., 179, 189 n. 
De Jong, H. E., 181 
Delitzsch, Franz, 23, 47 
De Wette, W. M. L., 2, 10 n. 
Dibelius, Martin, 152, 162 n. 
Dick, Karl, 151, 155 n. 
Dieterich, Albrecht, 179, 186 ff., 190, 

193 n., 194, 195, 228 ., 230 
Dobschiitz, Ernst von, 152, 169 
Domitian, 128 

Drescher, A., 151, 153, 159 n. 
Drews, Arthur, 179, 234 f. 



Eichhorn, Albert, 179, 205 
Eichhorn, J. G., i, 8 f., 15 
Epictetus, 95 

Ernesti, Fr. Th. L., 23, 95 n. 
Ernesti, J. A., i, 3 f. 
Evanson, E., 117, 121 n. 
Everling, Otto, 23, 55 f. 

Feine, Paul, 151, 152, 156 ff., 165 
Fleury, Amedee, 95 n. 
Friedlander, M., 117, 124 n. 
Friedrich (Maehliss), 117, 135 n. 

Gass, J. C., 7 
Gass, W., 24, 95 n. 
Geffken, J., 179, 189 n. 
Gennrich, P., 179, 191 n. 
Gloel, J., 23, 78 n. 
Godet, F., 22, 26 n. 
Goguel, M., 152, 159 f. 
Grafe, E., 23, 44, 90 f., in 
Gressmann, H., 152, 162 n. 
Grotius, Hugo, i, 2 
Gruppe, Otto, 179, 181 n., 193 n. 
Gunkel, H., 23, 78 f., in, 179, 189 n., 
232 f., 236 

Hadrian, 122 

Harnack, Adolf, vi, 25, 63, 69, 81 f., 

83, 84, 90, 113, 114 f., 151, 152, 

160, 173, 180, 189 n., 231. 
Hatch, Edwin, 25, 82 
Hausrath, Adolf, 22 
Haussleiter, J., 152, 172 
Havet, E., 23, 54, 63 
Hegel, 15, 16, 21 
Heinrici, G. F., 24, 45, 63 n., 67, 

80 n., 87, 93, 117, 151, 162 n. 
Heitmuller, W., 152, 165, 180, 204 ff., 

208 n. 

Heliogabalus, 181 
Hepding, H., 180, 182, 184 
Hilgenfeld, A., 129 
Hofmann, C. K. von, 22, 41 
Hollmann, G., 151, 211 n. 



251 



252 



INDEX 



Holsten, K., 22, 23, 35, 38 f., 63, 66 ff., 

105, 113, 114 f. 
Holtzmann, H. J., 22, 24, 25 f., 100- 

116, 149 f., 153, 163 f., 221 n. 

Ignatius, v, vi, vii, 80, 82, 119, 127, 
135, 200, 248 

Jacoby, Adolf, 180, 193 . 
Jakoby, Hermann, 151, 160 f. 
Jerome, 95 n. 
Josephus, 51 
Julian, 181 n. 

Jiilicher, Adolf, 22, 152, 170 w. 
Juncker, Alfred, 152, 160 f. 
Justin Martyr, v, vi, vii, 80, 82, 119, 
128, 132, 135, 136, 200, 217, 248 

Kabisch, R., 23, 58 ff., 74, 76, 108, 

III, l68, 174, 222 

Kalthoff, A., 117, 123 n. 
Kant, 112, 118 
Karl, W., 81 n., 152 
Kautzsch, E. F., 23, 88 
Knopf, R., 152, 172 n. 
Kolbing, P., 152, 170 n. 
Kreyer, J., 95 n. 

Lechler, G. V., 12, 18 

Lightfoot, John, 48 n. 

Lipsius, R. A., 12, 19 f., 24, 64 n. 

Loman, A. D., 117, 124 f., 140, 153 

Loofs, F., 63 n., 173 n. 

Liidemann, H., 23, 28 ff., 34 f., 62 f., 

66, 71, 86, 163 
Luther, 33, 50 

Manen, W. C. van, 117, 125, 129 ff., 

140, 153 

Marcion, 113, 128 f. 
Marcus Aurelius, 96 n., 98, 122 
Mau, Georg, 180, 181 n. 
Maurenbrecher, Max, 180, 232 f. 
Mehlhorn, Karl, 38 w. 
Menegoz, L. E., 23, 31, 35 
Meuschen, J. G., 48 n. 
Meyer, Arnold, 152, 170 n. 
Meyer, G. W., 2, g n. 
Michaelis, J. D., i, 5 n., ^ 
M tiller, I wan, 181 n. 
Miiller, J., 153, 172 n. 
Munzinger, Karl, 152, 154 n. 

Naber, S. A., 123 
Neander, J. A. W., 2, 10 n. 
Nork, J., 48 n. 

Olschewski, W., 152, 171 n. 



Paulus, H. E. G., 2, 10 f. 

Pfleiderer, Otto, 22, 23, 31, 34, 35, 

63, 66 ff., 76, 80, 90, in, 114 f., 

151, 154 

Philo, 51, 91, 98, no 
Pierson, Allard, 117, 123 
Plato, 2ii 
Preuschen, E., 82 n. 
Ptolemy Soter, 184 

Rambach, J. J., i, 3 
Reinach, S., 180, 181 n. 
Reitzenstein, R., 180, 188 n., 208 n., 

212 n., 216 ., 218 ff., 225, 230 
Renan, Ernest, 22, 35 
Resch, A., 23, 42 n. 
Reuss, E., 22, 24, 31, 35 
Ritschl, Albrecht, 12, 16 f., 23, 40 f., 

43, 83, 84 

Rohde, E., 180, 181, 185 n. 
Roscher, H. R., 180 
Rothe, R., 56 

Sabatier, A., 22, 32, 35 

Schettler, A., 152, 172 n. 

Schlager, G., 117 

Schlatter, A., 152 

Schleiermacher, F. E. D., i, 7 f. 

Schmidt, Ernst, 182 n. 

Schmiedel, P. W., 24, 63, 88, 103 

Schnedermann, G., 45 n. 

Schniewind, J., 153, 172 n. 

Scholten, J. H., 117, 134 n. 

Schopenhauer, 118 

Schottgen, C., 48 n. 

Schrader, Karl, 2, 10 n. 

Schiirer, Emil, 24, 45 

Schwartz, E. E., 180, 219 

Schwegler, A., 12, 16 

Schweitzer, A., 170 

Seeberg, R., 152, 173 

Semler, J. S., i, 4 f., 148 

Seneca, 95 f., 122 

Siegfried, K., 24, 91 n. 

Simon, Theodor, 24, 96 n. 

Smith, W. B., 180, 234 f. 

Sokolowski, E., 151, 160 n. 

Soltau, W., 180, 189 n. 

Spiegelberg, W., 212 n. 

Spitta, F., 52 n., 118, 149 

Steck, Rudolf, 117, 125, 128 n., 129 ff., 

140, 141, 153 
Sulze, E., 118, 143 
Surenhus (Surenhuys), W., 48 n. 

Teichmann, Ernst, 24, 74 ff. 
Tertullian, v, 95, 128, 129, 200 
Titius, Arthur, 151, 156 ff., 165 



INDEX 



253 



Usener, H., 180, 181 
Usteri, L., 2, 9 f. 

Vischer, E., 152, 153, 172 n. 
Volck, W., 26 n., 41 n. 
Volkmar, G., 23 
Vollmer, H., 24, 48 n., 88, 91 
Volter, Daniel, 118, 143 ff. 
Volz, Paul, 152, 162 n. 

Walther, W., 152, 170 . 

Weber, F., 24, 45 

Weinel, Heinrich, 151, 154 f., 165 n. 

Weiss, Bernhard, 22, 27 n., 35, 41, 

54, 64, 66, 69 

Weiss, Johannes, 152, 170 n. 
Weisse, C. H., 24, 28, 118, 141 f. 



Weizsacker, Karl von, 23, 35, 64, 

65 f., 69, 128 n. 

Wellhausen, J., 46 n., 152, 159 n. 
Wendland, P., 180, 189 n. 
Wendt, H. H., 23, 30 n. 
Wernle, P., 24, 60 n., 151, 154 f., 180, 

210 f. 

Wieseler, K., 12, 15 
Windisch, H., 152, 161 n. 
Wobbermin, G., 180 
Wolf, J. C., i, 3 

Wrede, William, 100, 152, 166 ff., 177 
Wiinsch, R., 187 n. 

Zahn, Theodor, 22, 25, 96 n. 
Zeller, E., 20 n. 
Ziegler, Theobald, 24, 95 n. 
Zwingli, 33 



THE END 



Printed by R. & R. CLARK, LIMITED, Edinburgh. 



THE LIFE OF 
WILLIAM 

ROBERTSON SMITH 

BY 

J. SUTHERLAND BLACK 

AND 

GEORGE CHRYSTAL 

Demy 8vo, cloth, containing photo 
gravure frontispiece from the portrait 
by Sir GEORGE REID, R.S.A. , in 
Christ s College, Cambridge, and 16 
full -page illustrations from paintings 
and photographs. 

PRICE 15s. NET 
(By post 155. 5^.) 



Uniform with the Life, but published 
as a separate work. 

LECTURES & ESSAYS 

OF 

WILLIAM 
ROBERTSON SMITH 

EDITED BY 

J. SUTHERLAND BLACK 

AND 

GEORGE CHRYSTAL 

Demy 8vo, cloth, containing frontis 
piece portrait from the posthumous 
painting by Sir GEORGE REID, R.S.A., 
now in the Free Church College, Aber 
deen. 

PRICE 108. NET 
(By post 105. 5&lt;/.) 



SOME PRESS OPINIONS 

Aberdeen Daily Journal. "The admirable biography . . . imparts a vivid im 
pression of Professor Smith s personality as well as a clear conception of his well-directed 
and many-sided activities. . . . This remarkable book . . . will be read with the deepest 
interest as the life-story of one whose writings had a far-reaching effect on the Church life 
of Scotland." 

Methodist Times. " A worthy memorial of a great teacher." 

The Nation. " This life of Robertson Smith has been long due and will be eagerly 
welcomed. . . . The writers have done their work supremely well. . . . Their pious care 
and restrained enthusiasm hold the reader from the first page to the last, and have enabled 
them to produce a worthy memorial of a most remarkable man." 

Bookseller. " They have given the world a living and speaking portraiture of a very 
remarkable and attractive personality, while they have also made a permanent contribution 
to the ecclesiastical history of Scotland." 

Glasgow News. "Professor Robertson Smith s biographers have discharged their 
task with praiseworthy restraint and discrimination." 

Jewish Chronicle. " The two volumes ought to be read by all who are interested 
in great movements of thought. They are full of charm for readers of all types." 

Church Quarterly Review. " A welcome memorial of a good man." 
Methodist Recorder." This absorbingly interesting biography." 

Christian Commonwealth. " We welcome this tribute, so finely paid, to a great 
man ; and also the companion volume, the contents of which help us to understand the 
events narrated in the life." 



PUBLISHED BY 



ADAM AND CHARLES BLACK, 4, 5, AND 6 SOHO SQUARE, LONDON, W. 




By GEORGES CHATTERTON - HILL, 
Ph.D., Decent of Sociology in 
the University of Geneva ; Author 
of " Heredity and Selection in 
Sociology." Demy 8vo, cloth. 
Price 7s. 6d. net (by post 73. nd.). 

The title of this book will furnish an idea as to its purpose and scope. The fundamental 
importance of religious belief as a factor of social life is now generally recognized by 
sociologists, especially since the works of Durkheim and the French school of sociology. 
Three main principles constitute the starting-point of the author : (i) That religious belief is 
the primordial factor of social evolution ; (2) that religious belief is not a product of the 
individual intellect, arising out of the want of primitive man to explain the riddle of the 
world and the mystery of things, but a social creation ; (3) that Christianity is the form in 
which the religious belief, indispensable to the continuity of social life, adapts itself to the 
needs of Western society. The author analyzes the nature of Christianity from an ex 
clusively sociological standpoint, and points out that Christianity differentiates itself from 
other religious forms in that it adapts itself to each of the two divergent series of interests 
those of the collectivity and those of the individual. 



THE TWELVE PROPHETS 

A Version in the various Poetical 
Measures of the Original Writings 



By Professor BERNHARD DUHM. 
Authorized translation by Pro 
fessor ARCHIBALD DUFF. Crown 
8vo, cloth. Price 3s. 6d. net 
(by post %s. lod. ). 



This is an English translation of a new German version of the Twelve Minor Prophets, 
prepared by the veteran Professor B. Duhm in connection with the forthcoming new edition 
of his important book on " The Theology of the Prophets," originally published in 1875, 
and with a view to a fresh presentation of the history of the religion of Israel. His effort 
has been to present the Twelve in their chronological order, in their original poetical form, 
and to distinguish as far as possible the text as it left the hands of the writers from all later 
additions, whether by readers, commentators, or editors. There is also an Introduction, 
which will be found interesting and useful. 



LIFE S BASIS AND 
LIFE S IDEAL 

The Fundamentals of a New Philo 
sophy of Life 



By RUDOLF EUCKEN, Professo* of 
Philosophy, University of Jena. 
Author of " The Meaning and 
Value of Life," "The Philosophy 
of Life," etc. Translated, with 
Introductory Note, by ALBAN G. 
WIDGERY. Demy 8vo, cloth. 
Price 7s. 6d. net (by post 75. nd.). 



SOME PRESS OPINIONS 

The Record. "We are indebted to Professor Eucken for stimulating thought, and for a serious 
contribution towards a philosophy that sets aside all merely materialistic theories." 

Church of Ireland Gazette. "Out of these pages a light shines into the darkness, and that 
light is not abstract truth but the very life of men." 

The Presbyterian. "Of great interest, not only to the student of philosophy, but to the whole 
community of those who think." 

The Inquirer. " This book should be a great help to all who are seeking to understand Professor 
Eucken s thought ; its whole arrangement is simple and clear, and there can be no difficulty in following 
Mr. Widgery s lucid translation." 

PUBLISHED BY 

ADAM AND CHARLES BLACK, 4, 5, AND 6 SOHO SQUARE, LONDON, W. 



i r 
T 



fl - 



i, 




V 



. 



